Mind World
Essays in Phenomenology and Ontology
This collection explores the structure of consciousness and its place
in the world, or inversely the structure of the world and the place of
consciousness in it. Among the topics covered are the phenomenological aspects of experience (inner awareness, self-awareness), dependencies between experience and the world (the role of the body in
experience, the role of culturally formed background ideas), and the
basic ontological categories found in the world at large (unity, stateof-affairs, connectedness, dependence, and intentionality). Developing ideas drawn from historical figures such as Descartes, Husserl,
Aristotle, and Whitehead, the essays together demonstrate the interdependence of ontology and phenomenology and its significance for
the philosophy of mind.
David Woodruff Smith is Professor of Philosophy at the University of
California, Irvine.
Mind World
Essays in Phenomenology and Ontology
DAVID WOODRUFF SMITH
University of California, Irvine
  
Information on this title: www.cambridge.org/9780521832038
David Woodruff Smith 2004
For Mary and Wyndham,
whose creative minds complete my world
Contents
Prolegomena: The Terroir of Consciousness and the World page ix
Origins of the Essays xvii
Overview: A Story Line 1
The Picture 8
1 Three Facets of Consciousness 10
2 The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 42
3 Return to Consciousness 76
4 Consciousness in Action 122
5 Background Ideas 147
6 Intentionality Naturalized? 176
7 Consciousness and Actuality 211
8 Basic Categories 242
Coda: The Beetle in the Box 283
Appendix: Background Conceptions of Ontology, Phenomenology,
Philosophy of Mind, and Historical Philosophy 289
Index 305
Prolegomena: The Terroir of Consciousness
and the World
This book explores the structure of consciousness and its place in the
world or, inversely, the structure of the world and the place of consciousness in it. Some essays focus on phenomenological aspects of conscious
experience; others on the world at large, especially the importance of
basic ontological categories. Some develop ideas drawn from historical
figures (e.g., Descartes, Husserl, Aristotle, Whitehead), while looking to
structures of consciousness and the world. I want to put these essays
between the covers of one book because, as I see them, their views work
together like photos of a common field taken from different perspectives.
The ideas gathered here have evolved mostly in the terroir of California,
where ideas and cultures mix uncommonly. California phenomenology.
California ontology. California syncretism. Not without a sense of history
(even in California).
The essays cut across the fields of phenomenology and ontology. The
interdependence of ontology and phenomenology, as well as its signifi-
cance for philosophy of mind, is a running theme of the collection as a
whole. This interdependence I see as part of the systematic character of
philosophy as a whole, a systematic unity rejected by much of twentiethcentury philosophy, not least in separating phenomenology from
wider metaphysics (in the wake of Kantianism, positivism, pragmatism,
existentialism).
Frequently the essays address issues in philosophy of mind, the most
vigorous area of recent philosophy in the analytic tradition. Yet my perspective does not begin with current issues of the relation between mind
and body – issues of physicalism, functionalism, supervenience, and
the like (as in Fodor, Dennett, Searle, Dretske, Kim, the Churchlands).
ix
x Prolegomena
Rather, my perspective begins with more purely phenomenological and
ontological issues: issues of consciousness, intentionality, and ontological
categories.
The essay in Chapter 1 distinguishes three fundamentally different
ontological aspects of consciousness, which separate areas of terrain explored variously in other essays. Subsequent chapters analyze consciousness in its basic phenomenological structure (intentionality, inner awareness, volition, action), in its environmental conditions (brain activity,
physical surroundings, cultural background), and ultimately in its“deep”
ontological structure (basic categorial forms or modes of being, such as
being intentional, being dependent on brain, culture, etc.). The later
chapters explore ontological categories in their own right, while keeping
an eye on consciousness.
The collection affords, I hope, a unified though by no means complete
view of mind-and-world (the unity implied in the book’s title). However,
I do not wish to axiomatize here; I let the essays speak for themselves
after previewing them with a broad story line. I find the essays mutually
reinforcing, although each was written to stand alone, as far as possible.
There are points of overlap, interlocking the essays, yet common themes
may be approached from different directions.
The essays are broadly analytic in style and approach (Austro-AngloAmerican philosophy). They are often phenomenological in content and
method and background (continental European philosophy). They are
recurrently ontological or metaphysical in content (joining a long history
of Western philosophy). And they are sometimes historical in content and
method (reflecting a long and global tradition of philosophy). In this way
the book combines elements of philosophy that are often kept separate.
There is a vision that I hope develops over the course of the present
book: that the structure of consciousness, with all the properties we find
in it through phenomenology, finds its home in the complex structure of
the world, with all the forms we find recounted in a systematic ontology.
Only by working our way into both phenomenology and ontology, in an
integrative way, can we develop this vision.
The term terroir is used by French vintners to incorporate all the elements of the vineyard, including the roles of geology, climate, and culture in the making of wine. The term has caught on in the California
wine country. Now, the philosophical terroir of California has produced
local varietals of phenomenology and ontology, and these essays partake
of those varietals in seeking the terroir of consciousness in the world.
Prolegomena xi
Consciousness: its distinctive experiential characters, its place in the
ground of things, its being in the air in philosophy, its cultural inheritance – these are the things we must attend to in consciousness. The
world: its basic categories, its diverse formal structures, its niche for consciousness – these are the things we must attend to in the world at large.
How shall we study structures of consciousness and the world?
We understand consciousness in the first place by simply experiencing
it. Phenomenology is the philosophical discipline that seeks to describe,
interpret, and analyze our own conscious experience, just as we experience it from our own first-person perspective. But phenomenology alone
does not tell us the place of consciousness in the world.
We understand the world at large by way of everyday experience and
increasingly by what empirical science discovers and hypothesizes. Ontology, or metaphysics, is the philosophical discipline that seeks to analyze
the basic shape of the world. But today ontology is accountable to the remarkable empirical-theoretical results of modern science. Accordingly,
the task of ontology is to frame what we know about the world, including structures of our own conscious experience, structures of the things
we encounter in everyday life, and structures of what we know through
empirical science.
Interestingly, the approach of modern science has left consciousness
itself as one of the most pressing problems of cognitive neuroscience
(the science of mind) and the hottest topic in recent philosophy of mind
cum cognitive science. We philosophers and scientists together have not
found a way to fit the properties of consciousness as we experience it
(featuring intentionality, inner awareness, sensory qualia, volition, etc.)
into the world as we know it in contemporary science (featuring quarks,
quantum fields, evolution of organisms, black holes, etc.). In order to
understand the nature of consciousness and how it fits into the world,
what we need from the side of philosophy is a more careful synthesis of
more careful phenomenology and more careful ontology. Yet the disciplines of phenomenology and (formal) ontology are too little evident in
the exhilarating discipline today called philosophy of mind or, in its more
scientific reaches, cognitive science. Indeed, the thought of bringing together all these fractious disciplines (and their disciples!) calls to mind
an old Bette Davis line: “Fasten your seat belts, ... it’s going to be a bumpy
night!” Nonetheless, that is what lies ahead of us.1
In the following chapters I pursue a particular synthesis of phenomenology and ontology. However, I leave for the Appendix a more
explicit account of how I conceive of phenomenology and ontology and
xii Prolegomena
their integration. These are matters of controversy, reaching into broad
metaphilosophical positions; I try to stake out my territory in these matters in the Appendix.
My conception of phenomenology and ontology and their interdependence, as practiced here, has evolved through several overlapping “eras”
in my philosophical experience. A sense of this background may help to
indicate where I am going as well as where I am coming from, and this
sense calls to mind my gratitude to a number of teachers (including my
students and collaborators).
When I moved from mathematics into philosophy as a graduate student at Stanford in the late 1960s, what crossed my path, after Donald
Davidson’s philosophy of language, was Jaakko Hintikka’s possible-worlds
logic of perception followed by Dagfinn Føllesdal’s development of
Husserlian phenomenology. By 1982 Ronald McIntyre and I had put
together our collaborative interpretation of these things in a book that
took us ten years to write. Here was California phenomenology at work.2
At Stanford I also acquired an appreciation of the history of philosophy
and its contemporary relevance, absorbed from the teaching of John
D. Goheen and two European logicans (Dagfinn and Jaakko) who read
historical texts as seriously as today’s. When I took my first philosophy
courses, at Northwestern while an engineering and mathematics student,
I wanted to know the truth about things, not who said it and when. Slowly,
but surely, I have learned that the genealogy of philosophical concepts, in
texts of bygone years, carries a great deal of their content. Indeed, there
is something phenomenological in understanding an idea by tracking its
historical evolution. With ideas as with organisms, ontogeny recapitulates
phylogeny. In William Faulkner’s words, “The past is not forgotten, it is
not even past.”
In 1982 I got a telephone call inviting me to talk about phenomenology’s relevance to software design. Thus began my twenty-year philosophical discussion with Charles W. Dement. We started by assessing Sartre’s
ontology, and we have been talking ever since about issues in formal ontology cum phenomenology, ranging from Anaximander and Aristotle
to Husserl, Ingarden, Whitehead, and Ernst Mayr (yes, the biologist).
This work was part of a formal research program at Ontek Corporation
(incorporated in 1985): designing systems of computational ontology
cum phenomenology. (Ontek’s work was the first of this kind.) Here was
California ontology in the making. In the late 1980s and throughout the
1990s, our philosophical research – and the iterations of systems built by
Prolegomena xiii
the Ontek team that were based on that research – moved from categories,
states of affairs, and modalities (ontic and epistemic) to basic “modes”
(including manyness, composition, dependence, intentionality) and on
to what we have called “systematics” or “metasystematics” (marking ontological distinctions and their role in the formal genesis of entities, in
a kind of analogy with biological systematics). Our work over the years
also involved close collaboration with logician Peter Woodruff and ontologist Peter Simons (thinkers from the world of academic philosophy)
and with Ontek systems designer Steve DeWitt and master programmer
John Stanley (philosophical thinkers from the real world).
On a parallel track through the 1990s I was drawn back into Husserl’s
Logical Investigations, this time with my eyes focused more closely on formal ontology. Although my results and stance in these essays are often
far from Husserlian, I found in Husserl an important case study in how
phenomenology, ontology, and logic (think of formal semantics) work together. In my current view, Husserl joins Aristotle, Kant, and Whitehead
as the most systematic of philosophers. A series of conferences, with occasions to present papers on these things, has helped me to develop this
new perspective on Husserl and on the synthesis of ontology and phenomenology (and logic). There were conferences in Bordeaux in 1995,
Leeds in 1996, Bolzano in 1997, Copenhagen in 2000, Montreal in 2001,
Memphis in 2001.
For many years I have worked with small groups who gathered in southern and northern California for informal discussions of aspects of intentionality. In these forums I have talked with Ron McIntyre, Dagfinn
Føllesdal, Izchak Miller (until his untimely passing), Bert Dreyfus, John
Searle, Allan Casebier, Martin Schwab, Dallas Willard, Rick Tieszen,
Wayne Martin, Amie Thomasson, Jeff Yoshimi, and others. I have also
enjoyed conversations over the years, often in Europe, with Barry Smith,
Peter Simons, and Kevin Mulligan, Ltd., the threesome British champions
of formal ontology (and its history in Brentano, Husserl, et al.).
Meanwhile, I have been fortunate to work with a string of gifted graduate students at Irvine, expanding my horizons as their dissertations unfolded. In nearly weekly discussions with each, many of the ideas below have circulated in various garbs. Jeff Yoshimi, Paul Livingston, Tim
Schoettle, Linda Palmer, Jason Ford, Kay Mathiesen, Joe Tougas, Dan
Zelinski, Amie Thomasson, John Bickle, Jim Zaiss, Kent Baldner – these
perceptive younger minds have taken very different directions. It has
been fascinating to see, from my office chair, how things are related, from
neuroscience to mysticism, from the ontology of art to the ontology of
xiv Prolegomena
politics, from phenomenology to philosophy of language to philosophy
of mind, and from one historical figure to another.
My kindest thanks to all these good people, without whom ...
The mixing of ideas, ideals, cultures, and peoples is a natural pattern
of human evolution. California in particular presents a form of cultural
confluence demonstrating this fact of life on earth. Today’s “California”
looks toward Asia and Latin America as much as Europe, as well as Africa
and the Middle East. The mix and flux of this California is a daily experience for all who have been fortunate to inhabit the richness of the
University of California in recent decades, not least on the Irvine campus
where I teach.
Yet the modern ethos – from science to human rights – is felt as deeply
threatening to many people across the globe. Science and rationality have
overridden traditions of spirituality and of ethnicity. In this century many
peoples and their values will mix more than ever before. The challenge
is how to honor difference amid sameness – not least in light of the fact
that we are all hurtling through space on a planet that we may obliterate
simply because we cannot sustain our own species along with other life
forms. The events of 11 September 2001 shook the world, in ways we have
yet to understand.
And yet, constant flux is not without history, not without continuity,
and not without form, as Whitehead’s ontology declares. (The essay in
Chapter 7 draws on that ontology of flux.)
Something of the Zeitgeist – the constant flux of different ideas from
different cultural and philosophical origins – is at work in the essays gathered here. Not usually by design, of course, as the spirit moves us mostly
in ways we do not see. California’s openness to new things has encouraged my looking to “other” philosophical traditions. Indeed, the mixing
of ideas in a multicultural way is an important part of the background of
the essays in this book. (Including the one titled “Background Ideas” in
Chapter 5, first published in Italian in Rome.)
My thanks thus to the intellectual terroir of “California.”
Notes
1. The relevance of Husserlian phenomenology for cognitive science has
been explored in two anthologies: Hubert L. Dreyfus (with Harrison Hall),
ed., Husserl, Intentionality and Cognitive Science (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press, 1982); and Jean Petitot, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard Pachoud, and
Prolegomena xv
Jean-Michel Roy, eds., Naturalizing Phenomenology: Issues in Contemporary Phenomenology and Cognitive Science (Stanford, Calif.: Stanford University Press
in collaboration with Cambridge University Press, 1999). From a different
perspective, the analytic tradition in philosophy of mind, in the parts most
relevant to my concerns, has been highlighted in Ned Block, Owen Flanagan,
and Guven G ¨ uzeldere, eds., ¨ The Nature of Consciousness (Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press, 1997); however, the phenomenological tradition, with its rich
panoply of results, is not drawn into the latter volume. Meanwhile, a new collection is imminent, joining results from both classical phenomenology (as
a discipline) and contemporary philosophy of mind: David Woodruff Smith
and Amie L. Thomasson, eds., Phenomenology and Philosophy of Mind (forthcoming). Of course, many analytic philosophers remain uncomfortable with
the first-person, phenomenological approach to consciousness, and a few
reject the existence of phenomena of consciousness. On the other hand,
many phenomenologists remain uncomfortable with the naturalism of scientifically oriented philosophy of mind, often setting “transcendental” phenomenology in opposition to any naturalistic explanation of consciousness,
intentional content, or meaning in general. Stay tuned for my take on such
issues.
2. The school of so-called California phenomenology began with Dagfinn
Føllesdal’s teaching at Harvard and Stanford in the 1960s, joined by
Hubert Dreyfus’s teaching at Berkeley. This conception of phenomenology,
and its Husserlian foundations, is laid out in two volumes: Hubert L. Dreyfus,
ed., Husserl, Intentionality and Cognitive Science (1982, cited in note 1); and
David Woodruff Smith and Ronald McIntyre, Husserl and Intentionality: A Study
of Mind, Meaning, and Language (Dordrecht: D. Reidel, 1982). The latter work
remains the only book-length development of the neo-Husserlian theory of
intentionality that evolved in the “California” tradition (in fact, a particular
variant on the theory emphasizing horizon as well as noema, and detailing
connections with Fregean and possible-world semantic theory as well).
xvi
Origins of the Essays
The essays in Chapters 1, 2, and 4–7 were originally published as indicated
and have been edited here for uniformity of style:
“Three Facets of Consciousness,” Axiomathes 12 (2001): 55–85.
“The Cogito circa ad 2000,” Inquiry 36 (3) (September 1993): 225–54.
“Consciousness in Action,” Synthese 90 (1992): 119–43.
“Background Ideas” appeared in Italian translation as “Idee di sfondo,”
Paradigmi (Estratto da PARADIGMI, Rivista di critica filosofica)
(Rome), Anno XVII, no. 49 (January–April 1999): 7–37.
“Intentionality Naturalized?” in Jean Petitot, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard
Pachoud, and Jean-Michel Roy, eds., Naturalizing Phenomenology: Issues
in Contemporary Phenomenology and Cognitive Science (Stanford, Calif.:
Stanford University Press in collaboration with Cambridge University
Press, 1999), pp. 83–110. The essay has been translated as“L’intentionnalite naturalis ´ ee? ´ ” in Jean Petitot, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard
Pachoud, and Jean-Michel Roy, eds., Naturaliser la phenom ´ enologie: Essais ´
sur la phenom ´ enologie contemporaine et les sciences cognitives ´ (Paris: CNRS
Editions, 2002), pp. 105–42.
“Consciousness and Actuality” appeared as “Consciousness and Actuality
in Whiteheadian Ontology,” in Liliana Albertazzi, ed., The Dawn of the
Cognitive Science: Early European Contributors (Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers, 2001), pp. 269–97 – only the title is changed, for
aesthetic parallel.
I am most grateful to the original publishers for permission to reprint
these essays in the present book: to Taylor and Francis, Ltd., publisher of
the journal Inquiry, in which Chapter 2 appeared; to Stanford University
xvii
xviii Origins of the Essays
Press, publisher of the volume Naturalizing Phenomenology, in which
Chapter 6 appeared; and to Kluwer Academic Publishers, publisher of the
journal Axiomathes, in which Chapter 1 appeared; publisher of the journal Synthese, in which Chapter 4 appeared; and publisher of the volume
The Dawn of Cognitive Science, in which Chapter 7 appeared.
The essays in Chapters 3 and 8 are published here for the first time:
“Return to Consciousness”: this essay aims to update, revise, and amplify my analysis of “inner awareness” in The Circle of Acquaintance
(Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers, 1989) and “The Structure
of (Self-)Consciousness,” Topoi 5(2) (1986): 149–56.
“Basic Categories”: this essay includes material from a series of four lectures I gave in the 1997 Bolzano International Schools in Cognitive
Analysis at the conference “Categories: Ontological Perspectives in
Knowledge Representation” in Bolzano, Italy, 15–19 September 1997;
the essay reflects my work on ontology in collaboration with colleagues
at Ontek Corporation since 1982 and a series of courses and seminars
I taught at the University of California, Irvine, during the 1990s.
Overview: A Story Line
The Background
In a moment I will sketch a line of argument, or rather narrative, that
weaves through the essays gathered here. But first let me recall some
background notions broadly assumed in that story line.
Consciousness is a consciousness “of” something, and this of-ness –
called intentionality – is the tie that binds consciousness and world
together.
Intentionality is itself the structure in which we know about the world.
This structure begins with mental and practical acts on the one hand
and objects of various types on the other. Phenomenology works from
intentionality into structures of experience, or conscious mental activity, whereas ontology works inter alia from intentionality into structures
of the world in general (including mental activity). We do not normally think of ontology as beginning with intentionality. As Quine has
stressed, however, our ontology consists of what we posit in our preferred theories – what we posit, I note, in our intentional activities of
theorizing.
So we may think of working from intentionality into phenomenology
on the one hand and into ontology on the other hand. In one direction
lies “subjective” structure; in the other lies “objective” structure. Both
directions are pursued in the essays gathered in this book, but the subjective and objective, I urge, are part of one world with a unified structure.
(By contrast, Descartes posited two realms of mind and body, and Kant
separated two spheres called phenomena and noumena, or things-asthey-appear and things-as-they-are-in-themselves.)
1
2 Mind World
Since Husserl’s work in the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries, philosophers have come to define intentionality as the property
of a mental state’s being “of” or “about” something – in the sense that
(following Husserl) consciousness is (almost always) a consciousness “of”
something. The concept of intentionality has been developing since at
least Aristotle, but it came into its own in Husserl. In the background
of the essays in this volume lies a reconstruction of Husserl’s basic theory of intentionality.1 What I rely on is mostly an appreciation of the
phenomenon of intentionality, including intentional content and the intentional relation of mental act to object. This much is broadly Husserlian
but shared by other philosophers who take seriously “first-person” consciousness and content.2
Very briefly, the content theory of intentionality, in the form I prefer,
holds that intentionality consists in a complex structure of context, subject, act, content, and object – that is, within a certain context a person
or subject performs or experiences an act of consciousness (thinking,
seeing, willing, etc.) with a certain content (thought, image, etc.) that
represents or “intends” a certain object (individual, state of affairs, event,
etc.). In that way consciousness is intentionally directed toward an object.
Schematically:
context |—— subject — act — content ——> object.
The context includes the background conditions on which the intentionality depends. The subject is the person who is conscious. The act
is the state or event or process of thinking, perceiving, imagining, desiring, willing, or whatever. The content is the ideal or abstract “meaning”
entertained in the act. That content represents something, which is the
object of the intentional act, that which the subject is conscious “of” – in
a certain way defined by the content and conditioned by the context.
A special range of cases that have interested me are those in which
the subject is directly acquainted with the object, as in visual perception.
Here the content is naturally expressed by indexical words such as “this,”
“here,” “I,” “her,” etc. The intentional or semantic force of the intrinsically
“indexical” content of an act of acquaintance depends on the context of
the act: my perception of “this” tree depends on which tree is in my visual
environment as I see “this.” The structure of acquaintance figures in some
studies in this volume, so I point toward it here in preview. What may be
less familiar is how the case of acquaintance is handled in a content theory
of intentionality.3 In this form of intentionality mind and world are most
intimately connected.
Overview: A Story Line 3
The Story Line
The essays to follow tell their stories individually. But these shorter stories
fit into a larger story, a broad philosophical account of mind and world.
I have arranged the essays in a pedagogical order: moving mostly from
more phenomenological to more ontological issues. An alternative pedagogy would move in the reverse order, and one might well read the essays
in reverse, depending on one’s interests. Here, in an overview, I attempt
to weave the larger story line around salient themes in the individual
essays.
Three Facets of Consciousness
In the information age computer scientists have found it useful to distinguish a computing system’s hardware, software, and users: the physical
implementation of the formal computing algorithms manipulated by humans as the computation appears to them on their computer screens. But
this three-schema approach to computation reflects a highly abstract ontological framework. Indeed, the nature of any entity divides into three
fundamental facets that we may call form, appearance, and substrate. An
entity’s form consists in its kinds, properties, relations; its appearance
consists in the way it is known or experienced by a knowing agent; its substrate consists in that on which it depends for its existence (such as deep
physical process in quarks or strings or whatever). Now, the nature of an
act of consciousness divides thus into form, appearance, and substrate. Its
form is intentionality; its appearance is its qualitative phenomenological
character as experienced; its substrate is its neural basis, its cultural background, and more. Keeping this division of essence in mind will change
the way we practice philosophy of mind and indeed ontology in general,
while sharply defining the place of phenomenology in both.
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000
Philosophers have studied intentionality, the basic form of consciousness,
in various guises at least since Aristotle. But it was Husserl’s work circa
1900 that finally produced a sharp model of intentionality. On this model,
an act of consciousness is directed via a conceptual structure of meaning (intentional content) toward an object appropriately represented or
“intended” through that meaning. But how do we come to know the
form of consciousness? The phenomenological turn to consciousness
and its intentional structure began with Descartes’s cogito ergo sum. The
best way to appreciate the “first-person” approach to mind – which has
4 Mind World
returned to center stage in contemporary philosophical-scientific theory
of mind – is to reexamine the cogito from today’s perspective. Consciousness includes, in its very structure, an inner awareness of the transpiring act.
The logic of the cogito follows this form of inner awareness. This inner
awareness grounds our knowledge of our own conscious experience from
our own first-person perspective. That knowledge is not incorrigible (as
Ryle averred of Descartes’s claim). Rather, it is the experientially certain
starting point of our understanding of consciousness. And third-person
studies of mind must accommodate this first-person structure.
The Return to Consciousness
What makes a mental act or state conscious, on the classical view
(Descartes, Locke, Brentano, Husserl, et al.), is a certain inner awareness of the act as it transpires: I am not consciously thinking, perceiving,
and the like unless I am aware of so thinking or perceiving. What is the
form of that inner awareness? It cannot be that of a distinct mental act
of observing or reflecting on the given mental act, because then we have
two acts instead of one and tend toward an infinite regress (of observing observing ... ). Instead, inner awareness must be an integral component of a conscious experience. Roughly speaking, we may articulate the
structure of inner awareness in the following form of phenomenological
description: “Phenomenally in this very experience I see this frog.” The
inner awareness is not, then, an additional and second-order awareness
but rather an integral self-reflexive component of the given act. In this
way we may avoid the problems of recently fashionable “higher-order”
theories of consciousness. Nonetheless, we should recognize a gradation
from elementary sentient consciousness to more complex forms of consciousness, recognizing that it is these “higher” forms that involve inner
awareness.
Consciousness in Action
Since Descartes’s revolution, turning philosophy inward to the subjective
sphere and then arguing for a metaphysical distinction between mind
and body, it has been widely thought that the focus on consciousness
in itself leads to the separation of mind and body. From Locke, Hume,
and Kant to Husserl in his transcendental phenomenology, it has seemed
that the connections of mind and body have been cleanly severed. Yet a
careful phenomenology of the experience of acting – of conscious volitional bodily action – leads instead to a subtle ontological intertwining of
consciousness and body, and so of mind and the world in which it occurs.
Overview: A Story Line 5
Cogito ergo sum leads to ambulo ergo sum: inner awareness in embodied
action leads to discrete awareness of one’s own body and one’s natural
surroundings and to the connections between them. The phenomenology of action thus leads into an ontology of consciousness embedded
in nature, in one’s body, and – with futher empirical studies in neuroscience – in one’s brain. We are beginning to turn our attention in this
regard to the substrate of consciousness, to the natural, physical conditions
on which our own consciousness depends.
Background Ideas
Our conscious experience is not only embedded in our bodily comportment in our natural environment; our experience is also embedded in
our social environment. A close study of intentional content or meaning
shows that our most familiar ideas – everyday concepts and rules of practice – presuppose very basic conceptual and practical structures that are
extant in our surrounding culture. There is thus a deep dependence of
our intentional contents on background ideasthat virtually define the everyday world as we know it. Only by a sort of phenomenological-semantic
archaeology, however, do we begin to appreciate this type of dependence.
We may launch our study of this deep background of our intentional experience by starting with Husserl’s conception of a “horizon” of background
meaning and practice, Wittgenstein’s notion of “ground propositions,”
and Searle’s account of “background” capacities. However, we need to
place these notions of background within a proper ontology of dependence. Here lies a crucial part of the substrate of consciousness – in the
culture surrounding us, rather than in the neural processing within us.
Indeed, background ideas have a life and status of their own, not in a
Platonic or Fregean heaven of ideal meanings but in a realm of ideal
meanings extant in our culture in the life world.
Intentionality Naturalized?
Contemporary philosophy-of-mind and cognitive science are largely wedded to a naturalism that assumes a functionalist physicalist ontology of
mind. But functional-physical analyses of mind – of the physical inputs
and outputs of different types of mental states – do not account for the
crucial phenomenological features of consciousness: intentionality (and
meaning), inner awareness, sensory qualia. What we need instead is a
wider and more fundamental ontology that gives consciousness and nature their proper places in the structure of the world. A worthy start is
Husserl’s distinction between formal and material ontological categories.
6 Mind World
In Husserl’s ontology, for instance, the formal structure of states of affairs applies to entities in the material domains of nature (the physical),
consciousness (the intentional), and culture (the social). We may thus
begin to rethink the basic categorial structure of the world by considering
fundamental categories of mind and world. We must distinguish different material types of properties of mental activity: those of consciousness
(intentionality, etc.), those of nature (the physical causal conditions of
consciousness), and those of culture (the social conditions of consciousness). But we must also distinguish different formal types of properties
of mind: for instance, intentional relations of consciousness to its objects
and causal relations of an event of consciousness to its causes and its effects. Without a fundamental ontology that draws such distinctions we
cannot develop a unified account of mind and the world of nature, an
appropriate phenomenological ontology.
Consciousness and Actuality
To understand the structure of the world in general, and the structure
of consciousness in particular, we need to rethink our most familiar ontological concepts, which began with Plato and Aristotle on universals
and particulars. A radically different type of ontology was envisioned by
Whitehead, an ontology that would replace Aristotelian substance (centered on predication) with a fundamental type of process more attuned
to twentieth-century physics. Today we might look to something like dynamic states in a relativistic quantum field (if we could understand such
entities). Whitehead held that the most basic “actual entities” of the world
are something like point events in a field of constant flux – out of which
everyday objects emerge in great complexity. However, Whitehead distinguished what we may call temporal and ontological becoming. Whereas an
“occasion” is formed by the process of temporal transition, any “entity” is
formed by the process of becoming an entity, wherein an entity is ontologically dependent on a variety of other entities. This highly abstract form of
becoming suggests a more fundamental kind of ontology, which may apply
in instructive ways ultimately to the special case of consciousness.
Basic Categories
The doctrine of ontological categories began with Aristotle’s list of ten.
Husserl’s distinction between formal and material categories ramified the
very notion of ontological category, and of the categorial structure of the
world, with instructive details applied to consciousness, nature, and culture. Whitehead’s ontology of process, especially ontological becoming,
Overview: A Story Line 7
suggests a deeper ontology of levels – or, as I prefer, “modes of being.”
We may begin to specify a more up-to-date category scheme by reflecting on
these types of ontology. Three-facet ontology (distinguishing the form,
appearance, and substrate of any entity) organizes three basic categorial structures, but there is more to the story. Marking various formal
ontological distinctions, and organizing them in a structured system of
categories, we may begin to frame a more systematic account of the order
of things in general and of consciousness in particular.
Such is the story line that I mean to weave through and around the
essays to follow.
Notes
1. That theory of intentionality is detailed in Smith and McIntyre 1982. A shorter
version of the theory is presented by the same authors in 1989.
2. See Searle 1983.
3. Details on “indexical” content are found in Smith 1989. My account there
extends and modifies traditional Husserlian phenomenology. Kindred spirits are at work in two books not directly linked with the phenomenological
tradition: Searle 1983 (see the chapters on perception and action) and Perry
2001 (see Perry’s account of “reflexive” content).
References
Perry, John. 2001. Knowledge, Possibility and Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press.
Searle, John. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
1989. “Theory of Intentionality.” In J. N. Mohanty and William McKenna, eds.,
Husserl’s Phenomenology: A Textbook, pp. 147–79. Washington, D.C.: University
Press of America.
The Picture
Many of us think visually, even when we conceptualize highly abstract phenomena. This is a phenomenological observation about the practice of
phenomenology and ontology (for those like “us”). Indeed, I often draw
pictures on the board while lecturing on the topics pursued in this book:
structures of consciousness (intentionality, background, inner awareness,
self-awareness) and structures of the world (ontological categories, the
form of intentionality itself).
What follows, accordingly, is a pictorial organization of the structures
of world and consciousness that are pursued in the essays to follow.
My students will recognize many of the elements of The Picture.
8
The Picture 9
1
Three Facets of Consciousness
Abstract: Over the past century phenomenology has ably analyzed the basic structures of consciousness as we experience it. Yet recent philosophy
of mind, concerned more with brain activity and computational function,
has found it difficult to make room for the structures of subjectivity and
intentionality that phenomenology has appraised. In order to understand
consciousness as something that is both subjective and grounded in neural activity, we need to delve into phenomenology and ontology. I draw
a fundamental distinction in ontology among the form, appearance, and
substrate of any entity. Applying this three-facet ontology to consciousness,
we distinguish the intentionality of consciousness (its form); the way we
experience consciousness (its appearance, including so-called qualia); and
the physical, biological, and cultural basis of consciousness (its substrate).
We can thus show how these very different aspects of consciousness fit together in a fundamental ontology. And we can thereby define the proper
domains of phenomenology and other disciplines that contribute to our
understanding of consciousness.
The Problem of Consciousness
Lately, philosophers and scientists have been looking for mind in all the
wrong places. Physicalists of all stripes have focused primarily on the physical conditions of consciousness, from neural activity to computational
I am indebted to my colleagues in the PACIS project: Charles W. Dement, President of
Ontek; Stephen DeWitt, John Stanley, and Anthony Sarris, all of Ontek; and Peter M.
Simons of the University of Leeds. Thanks to Tony Sarris for the ISO reference. Thanks
further to Chuck Dement for numerous discussions of systematic formal ontology. I bear
responsibility, nonetheless, for what is made of the three-facet distinction in the present
chapter.
10
Three Facets of Consciousness 11
function.1 Meanwhile, humanists – historicists, postmodernists, culture
critics – have looked primarily to the cultural conditions of our discourse,
as if consciousness did not exist in its own right (expressed in art and literature) but is “theorized” in a cultural tradition of phenomenology or science or humanistic discourse. Obviously, we have much to learn from the
empirical sciences about boson, atom, organism, evolution, and brain –
and from humanistic observations in art, literature, and cultural history
and criticism. But this learning is informed by further disciplines that are
not “empirical” or “naturalistic” or indeed “humanistic” in the received
ways. If we are to understand the mind, we must understand more clearly
the philosophical disciplines of phenomenology and ontology, because
these disciplines define the place of mind in a world further detailed
by the scientific disciplines of neuroscience, evolutionary biology, and
quantum physics, as well as the humanistic disciplines of literary, artistic,
and cultural criticism.
Let us begin with a fundamental principle of ontology. The nature of
any entity, I propose, divides into three aspects or facets, which we may
call its form, appearance, and substrate. In an act of consciousness, accordingly, we must distinguish three fundamentally different aspects: its
form or intentional structure, its appearance or subjective “feel,” and its
substrate or origin. In terms of this three-facet distinction, we can define
the place of consciousness in the world. The aim of this chapter is to lay
out this distinction in the nature of consciousness, and to draw out its
implications for phenomenology and ontology, as distinct from purely
naturalistic philosophy of mind. (I do not focus here on humanistic theory, although I think the morals to follow have relevance for humanistic
as well as naturalistic theory of mind.)
Consciousness is the central concern of phenomenology. Although
there is more to mind than what we consciously experience, our theory of mind must begin with the salient part of mind, conscious intentional experience. Consciousness is characteristically a consciousness
“of” something, as Husserl stressed circa 1900, and this property of directedness he dubbed intentionality. The literature of phenomenology –
in Husserl, Heidegger, Sartre, Merleau-Ponty, Ingarden, Føllesdal, and
others, with roots in Kant, Hume, Descartes, and still earlier thinkers –
has analyzed a rich variety of structures of intentionality in perception, imagination, thought, language, and action, along with properties of subjectivity, intersubjectivity, temporality, and the unity of the
subject or self. For the discipline of phenomenology, there is no problem about the nature or existence of consciousness: we experience it
12 Mind World
firsthand throughout our waking life, and we have ways of studying it
carefully.
For recent philosophy of mind, however, consciousness has seemed
problematic, either in its nature or in its very existence, because it seems
to escape the story told by the physical sciences. “Consciousness is what
makes the mind-body problem really intractable,” Thomas Nagel observed, rightly, wryly, and presciently in 1974 (Nagel 1974). As cognitive
science developed over the next two decades, moving from artificial intelligence into neuroscience, consciousness regained center stage. The
function of mind in mediating behavior, in problem-solving computation, in evolutionary adaptation, and the like did not seem to involve
the subjective qualities of sensation, dubbed qualia, or the felt character of consciousness as directed toward objects in the world around one.
Nonetheless, by 1990 neuroscientists were measuring properties of neural activity (such as spiking frequency) associated with consciousness, and
so consciousness became a respectable phenomenon of scientific investigation.“Consciousness studies” emerged with large interdisciplinary conferences in Tucson in the 1990s. Still, amid the excitement even in popular media, David Chalmers (1996) echoed Nagel’s sentiment in declaring consciousness the “hard” problem for our theory of mind. Chalmers
struck a nerve.
Yet is it not odd to find consciousness problematic? What if someone
declared that we do not know what language is, or that its existence is
uncertain? We all speak a language such as English or Japanese. Grammarians have charted its basic forms such as the verb or noun phrase,
and linguists have analyzed its “deep” structure. How the brain functions in the production and understanding of language is a further matter of empirical neuroscience; how speech and writing emerged in our
species is a matter of evolutionary biology; how our language shapes
our society and politics is a matter of social-cultural theory. But the
syntax and meaning of modern English are familiar, more or less, to
its speakers. Similarly, the shape and meaning of our everyday experiences of perception, thought, and action are familiar to us all, more
or less. These forms of consciousness have been studied by phenomenologists, much as linguists have studied forms of language. How the
brain functions in consciousness, how our forms of experience evolved
in the species Homo sapiens sapiens, how our consciousness is shaped
by our language, culture, and politics – these are further matters. But
how can consciousness itself be thought problematic or its basic forms
obscure?
Three Facets of Consciousness 13
There is a widespread opinion that science alone will explain the workings of the world, including our own minds and thus consciousness. This
idea goes under the positive banner of “naturalism” or meets the pejorative charge of “scientism.” This attitude is expressed with characteristic verve, in his recent book Consilience (1998), by biologist Edward
O. Wilson, famous for his studies of ants and for his conception of sociobiology. Let us quote at length (the only way to evidence “attitude,” albeit
in the way of humanists):
Belief in the intrinsic unity of knowledge ...rides ultimately on the hypothesis
that every mental process has a physical grounding and is consistent with the
natural sciences. The mind is supremely important to the consilience program
[of unity] for a reason both elementary and disturbingly profound: Everything
that we know and can ever know about existence is created there.
The loftier forms of such reflection and belief may seem at first to be the proper
domain of philosophy, not science. But history shows that logic launched from
introspection alone lacks thrust, can travel only so far, and usually heads in the
wrong direction. Much of the history of modern philosophy, from Descartes and
Kant forward, consists of failed models of the brain. The shortcoming is not the
fault of the philosophers, who have doggedly pushed their methods to the limit,
but a straightforward consequence of the biological evolution of the brain. All
that has been learned empirically about evolution in general and mental process
in particular suggests that the brain is a machine assembled not to understand
itself, but to survive. Because these two ends are basically different, the mind
unaided by factual knowledge from science sees the world only in little pieces. It
throws a spotlight on those portions of the world it must know in order to live to
the next day, and surrenders the rest to darkness. (Wilson 1998, 96)
What we have here is failure to communicate, between philosophers and
scientists. (1) It was philosophers – Descartes, Kant, and Husserl – who
taught us the principle, “Everything that we know and can ever know
about existence is created there [in the mind].” (2) The history of modern philosophy includes much more than failed models of the brain;
Descartes and Husserl developed successful models of consciousness, of
mind as experienced, precisely what is now found “hard” for empirical
neuroscience. (3) Although the brain did not evolve to understand itself, in humans it seems to be on the verge of producing, Wilson thinks,
a scientific theory of its own physical and evolutionary function – and,
I think, a philosophical theory of consciousness. (4) Most of the great
modern philosophers – notably Descartes, Kant, and Husserl – theorized in the face of factual knowledge from science cum mathematics
in their day; they also appreciated, however, the importance of introspection when attending to the mind. (5) It is a hallmark of modern
14 Mind World
philosophy – and ultimately philosophy of science – to delimit knowledge
of empirical fact and that of logic and mathematics, and thus to define the
limits of both a posteriori and a priori knowledge; today in philosophyand-science of mind we need to understand the boundaries and interrelations between the more empirical and the more “formal” aspects of
consciousness.
A different view, from the formal side of natural science, is proposed by
mathematical physicist Roger Penrose in Shadows of the Mind (1994). From
Kurt Godel ¨ ’s incompleteness theorem in mathematical logic, Penrose
argues that consciousness cannot be a process of computation in the
technical sense originally defined by Alan Turing; then, from considerations of quantum mechanics and the microstructure of neurons in the
human brain, Penrose argues that we need a noncomputational quantum physics to explain how consciousness can arise in neuronal activity.
I cannot evaluate the controversial speculations in Penrose’s book, but
if he is right then consciousness is defined by a very different kind of
“formal” mathematical structure than anything philosophers of mind
have been considering previously. What I like in Penrose’s vision is this
type of abstraction. The mathematical form of a piece of physical theory is
integral to its content, and mathematical form is suggestive of ontological
form. The subtitle of the Penrose book is A Search for the Missing Science of
Consciousness. When we have finished the “science” of consciousness, its
physics and its evolutionary biology, there will still be something missing
in our account of consciousness. What is missing in all current “naturalistic” thinking about consciousness is the relevant phenomenology and
ontology, and their integration.
The “loftier forms” of naturalism are what attract the philosopher. I
believe in the unity of knowledge. I believe, moreover, in the unity of
the world: one world in which physical, mental, and cultural phenomena
take their interweaving places. And I believe that every mental process
has a physical grounding and is consistent with the natural sciences. (In
fact, I am quite partial to the metaphor of “ground” in ontology, as we
shall see.) So far, naturalism: both methodological and ontological (these
need to be distinguished).
However, the structure of intentionality – call it “formal” or “transcendental” or something else – does not flow easily from empirical, “naturalistic” studies of the brain or bodily behavior or physical system alone.
The “logic” of intentionality in phenomenology, methodically launched
from introspection alone, has a powerful thrust and carries us far (contrary to what Wilson claims in the preceding quotation). However, I must
Three Facets of Consciousness 15
concur, the theory of intentionality carries us in different directions than
empirical science: into structures of consciousness in phenomenology,
and indeed into structures of thought and inference in logic and semantics (concerning how we reason and represent things in thought and language). “Formal” ontology, too, moves in different directions, positing
fundamental categories of existence such as Individual, Property, Relation, Number, Part, and so forth. Both phenomenology and ontology
are crucial to a unified system of knowledge – of a unified world. And
both carry us beyond naturalism: their results should be consistent with
natural science, but the proper results of phenomenology and ontology
are not simply amassed in empirical investigation in the natural sciences
alone.
When we want to see the world as a whole and not in the “little pieces”
so effectively modeled by physics, chemistry, and biology – when we want
to see the unity of the world – we must inform natural science with fundamental ontology. Much as physics needs mathematics to structure its
empirical content, so natural science in general needs ontology – or
metaphysics – to structure empirical content. And when we turn to the
nature of mind itself, the empirical analysis of our own consciousness is
pursued expressly and methodically by phenomenology. Moreover, it is
ontology that must define the type of relation that holds between mind
and its grounding in brain activity. This is a matter of formal ontology
rather than of empirical investigation per se.
Wilfrid Sellars (1963) contrasted two ranges of theory that define respectively the “manifest” image and the “scientific” image of man, that
is, ourselves and our world as understood by common sense and as described by modern science. Similarly, in The Crisis of European Sciences and
Transcendental Phenomenology (1970b/1935–38) Husserl distinguished the
“lifeworld” from the “natural world,” that is, the world as we experience
it in everyday life and as we “mathematize” it in physics. Mathematical
physics (in all its well-earned glory) is an abstraction, Husserl held, from
the world as experienced in everyday life. Consequently, Husserl said, we
must confront “the paradox of human subjectivity”: how can I be both
subject and object of consciousness, both a conscious subject and an object in nature? Husserl did not clearly foresee the “mathematization” of
thought in the computer model of mind. Yet today’s controversy about
mind as computer (whatever the architecture, classical or connectionist) is but the application of mathematical modeling or “mathematizing” to mind as opposed to physical activity like planetary motion. Thus,
Husserl’s “paradox” foreshadowed what today is the “hard” problem of
16 Mind World
consciousness: how can consciousness be both a subjective character of
experience and an objective property of the brain – a computational structure implemented in neural networks evolved over the natural history of
the human species on the planet Earth in the cosmos that took shape
since the Big Bang over 12 billion years ago amid fields of gravity, electromagnetism, and quantum superposition?
Husserl distinguished phenomenology from both everyday knowledge
and scientific knowledge, and he distinguished “formal” ontology from
“material” ontologies of Body, Culture, and Consciousness (as the distinction is reconstructed in D. W. Smith 1995). The point to stress here
is that the world is characterized in different parts and levels in these different ranges of theory, and the philosophy of mind must respect these
differences of theory.
Only by understanding more clearly both phenomenology and ontology, along with the natural sciences (as well as the humanities), can we
understand the place of consciousness in the world. That is the loftier
moral of this essay. The specifics to follow concern the ontology of the
three aspects or“facets” of consciousness, and the role of phenomenology
in such an ontology.
Phenomenology and Ontology
Ontology (or metaphysics) is the science of being: as Aristotle put it,
being as being. Where the special sciences – physics, chemistry, biology,
psychology, and the like – are sciences of particular kinds of beings, ontology is the general science of what it is to be a being (and perhaps of
what it is to be).
Phenomenology is the science of consciousness: as Husserl put it, of
consciousness as we experience it. Phenomenology begins in the description of conscious experience from our own point of view as subjects or
agents: “I feel angry,” “I see that volcano,” “I think that Plato was ironic,”
“I will [to act so that I] stroke this tennis ball cross-court,” and so on. The
intentionality of consciousness is evident in our own experience: I am
conscious “of” or “about” such and such.
Now, ontology and phenomenology interact in our overall theory of
consciousness and its place in the world. For our experience – in emotion,
perception, thought, and action – is informed by our understanding of
the world around us, by our ontology, implicit or explicit. And as we
practice phenomenology, we use our ontology, implicitly or explicitly, in
order to describe our experience, its intentional relation to objects in the
Three Facets of Consciousness 17
world, and the things we are conscious of in perception, thought, and
action. In this way, phenomenology is ontological. But ontology itself
is phenomenological insofar as it recognizes the existence of our own
consciousness, as we must in saying what exists.
It may be surprising to speak of ontology within the practice of phenomenology. For did not Husserl, in Ideas (books I and II, 1969/1913
and 1991/1912ff.), enjoin us to bracket the existence of the surrounding world of nature (and culture) in order to describe the structure of
our consciousness? Here lies confusion. Husserl assumed a good deal of
“formal” ontology – concerning individual and essence, part and whole,
dependence, and so on – precisely as he sought to describe the essence of
intentionality in phenomenology; and bracketing the region of nature
(and the region of culture) leaves the region of consciousness, with the
“material” ontology of consciousness as part of phenomenology (see D. W.
Smith 1995). Heidegger followed suit, in The Basic Problems of Phenomenology (1988/1975/1927), assuming his own formal categories in describing
structures of our existence and comportment; indeed, Heidegger insisted
that phenomenology is “fundamental ontology,” and so fundamental ontology is essentially phenomenological. Philosophy today has lost sight of
the intimate connection between our saying what there is and our saying
how we experience what is.
Let us approach the nature of consciousness and its place in the world
by laying out a very basic ontological distinction, a distinction we rarely
make explicit but assume deep in the background of a good deal of our
theorizing about the world.
Three-Facet Ontology
Everything in the world – every entity whatsoever – has a nature that
divides fundamentally into three aspects we shall call facets: its form, its
appearance, and its substrate. Thus:
1. The form of an entity is how or what it is: its whatness or quiddity –
the kinds, properties, relations that make it what it is.
2. The appearance of an entity is how it is known or apprehended: how
it looks if perceptible (its appearance in the everyday sense), but
also how it is conceived if conceivable, how it is used if utilizable –
how it is experienced or “intended” as thus and so.
3. The substrate of a thing is how it is founded or originated: how it
comes to be, where it comes from, its history or genetic origin if
18 Mind World
temporal, its composition or material origin if material, its phylogenetic origin if biological, its cultural origin if a cultural artifact –
in short, its ecological origin in a wide sense, and ultimately its
ontological origin in basic categories or modes of being.
The three facets of an entity (in this technical sense) are categorially
distinct aspects of the entity, with important relations among them, as we
shall be exploring. This distinction of aspects we may call the three-facet
distinction (Figure 1.1).
Distinctions among form, appearance, and foundation or origin have
been drawn in philosophy since its inception. Plato distinguished concrete things from their forms, and appearance from reality, and posited
forms as the foundation of being. Before Plato, Anaximander assessed
the material composition of things and envisioned their origin or foundation in something more basic (an archaic quantum field?); he even
foresaw biological evolution, 2,500 years before Darwin. In more recent
centuries, epistemologists from Descartes to Kant distinguished things
from the ways they are known, while idealists like Berkeley put mind at
the foundation of reality and materialists reduced mind to matter. What I
am proposing, however, is to unify the distinctions among form, appearance, and substrate, and then to elevate the three-facet distinction itself
to an axiom of fundamental ontology – and so to structure ontology itself
(in one way) along these lines.
The structure < Form, Appearance, Substrate > thus defines a special
system of ontological categories. For the world is structured importantly,
at fundamental joints, by this three-facet distinction. The distinction presupposes that the world includes attributes (of entities), minds (to which
entities may appear), and contexts of foundation or origin (from or within
which entities may come to be). There may be possible worlds that lack
such things, but our world has this much structure, and our ontology and
phenomenology are accountable to this three-facet structure of the world.
These three categories do not form a sequence of mutually exclusive and
collectively exhaustive summa genera of entities, as do the Aristotelian categories (roughly, Substance or Individual, Species, Quality, Quantity, etc).
FORM
|
ENTITY
/ \
SUBSTRATE APPEARANCE
figure 1.1. The three facets of an entity.
Three Facets of Consciousness 19
Rather, the categories of Form, Appearance, and Substrate order or rank
three fundamental ways an entity in our world is defined: by relation to
its form, to its being known or “intended,” and to its ground or origin.
If you think about it, these categories define three fundamentally important and importantly different areas within the nature of any entity (in a
world such as our own). Thus, the entity itself is distributed in its being
through these three aspects of form, appearance, and substrate: that is
its nature or essence.
There are other fundamental divisions in the structure of the world.
But the division < Form, Appearance, Substrate > marks one crucial
ordering in the nature of things. To appreciate its significance, we shall
work through some examples.
Importantly, the division among form, appearance, and substrate is a
division of structure in the nature of an entity rather than a division among
three intrinsically distinct types of property. In principle, the same thing
might be part of the appearance, form, and substrate of an entity. The
green of a leaf – say, of a California Live Oak tree – is part of its appearance
to the human eye, part of its intrinsic form, and part of its evolutionary
history (in the role of chlorophyll). Thus, the property green plays three
differentroles in the form, appearance, and substrate of the leaf, and these
three facets are themselves defined by the roles played. That is, Form,
Appearance, and Substrate are defined by roles played in the nature or
essence of an entity.
An instructive parallel to the three-facet distinction can be drawn in
biology: in systematics, the science of diversity among living things (Mayr
and Ashlock 1991). Thus, biologists today define a species by principled
reference to its character, its observed specimens, and its evolutionary descent. (Exactly how a species is defined in these terms has been vigorously
debated; I abstract the terms of debate only.) Imposing our terminology:
the form of a species is its genotype, its appearance (to the scientific
community) is its phenotype or observable traits (starting with a definitive specimen called its holotype), and its substrate or origin consists in its
path of phylogenetic descent from ancestor species. These three aspects
of a species are given canonical places in defining the species in modern biological theory, and we may see in this empirical theory something
more like a “formal” division in the nature of all things, not just of evolving species of living things. (N.B. In biological systematics, a “category” is
defined not as a high-level grouping or summum genus, as Aristotle originally used the term, but rather as a rank of taxa or groupings. In the long
run I too would define the term “category” in a more special way, but for
20 Mind World
present purposes let us mean by the term simply an important group or
classification of things.)
Insofar as biological systematics provides one model of three-facet ontology, we are abstracting or factoring out from the empirical theory of
species the formal structure of three facets, which we would apply to any
kind of entity at all (in a world such as our own). This kind of abstracting
is the proper work of formal ontology, and the three-facet distinction is
a formal ontological distinction, applying by hypothesis to any kind of
entity whatsoever. The significance of the three-facet distinction lies in
the different ways in which something can be defined in its being, in its
fundamental nature, by its form, appearance, and substrate.
Husserl is one systematic philosopher who recognized what we are
calling the three facets of an object. The form of an object Husserl called
its “essence” (Wesen, from Was-sein). The sensible qualities of a material
object Husserl called its“appearance” (Erscheinung), or more generally its
“way of being given” to consciousness, which aligns with the “object as intended.” And the substrate of an object encompasses what Husserl called
its “horizon,” its Umwelt (surrounding world), and indeed its ontological
“foundation,” that on which it is “founded” (by Fundierung). What is unusual in Husserl’s philosophy is the principle that the essence of any object
includes the ways in which it can be known or intended, the ways it is
“constituted” in consciousness. It was Husserl who first explicitly defined
“formal” ontology, as specifying categories (“formal essences”) that apply to different “regions” (“material essences”) such as Nature, Culture,
and Consciousness. (The details are drawn in D. W. Smith 1995.) The
three-facet distinction belongs to formal ontology in this sense. However,
Husserl himself did not join the three facets into the canonical division
I am proposing.
The three-facet distinction, then, is a higher-order formal structure
that orders the nature or essence of an entity. Because this structure applies to consciousness itself, we can use the three-facet distinction to look
at the ontology of consciousness. But first we must address the distinction
generally.
The Three Facets of Diverse Entities
To see how the three-facet distinction works, and to begin to appreciate
its scope, let us apply it to some very different kinds of entities.
Consider this piece of quartz found in my garden. Its form includes its
shape, its color, and its type, quartz. Its appearance includes what it looks
Three Facets of Consciousness 21
like from various angles and under various lighting. And its substrate
includes its physical crystalline structure, as well as its geological genesis
from great heat and pressure in the crust of the planet Earth.
Consider now an electron. Its form includes its mass, charge, and
spin. Its appearance includes its observable position and momentum,
its electron-microscope image, and so on. And its substrate includes the
matter field (from which it emerges per quantum field theory). So even
a basic physical particle has its three facets.
Now consider this pencil. The form of the pencil is its structure of
graphite in wood plus its function in writing and drawing. Its appearance includes what it looks like and what it feels like in my hand in
writing. The substrate of the pencil is its origin. It is made of certain materials, including wood, graphite, paint, tin, rubber. Each material has its
physical-chemical structure. Moreover, these materials are produced only
in specific parts of the world, in specific cultures, their trade following
established routes. Furthermore, the substrate of the pencil includes the
historical development of writing, writing instruments, and the invention of the pencil. So the pencil’s substrate includes not only its physical
composition (down to quantum structure) but also its cultural genesis.
Next consider the tool of the century: the computer. The International Organization for Standardization has defined what is called the
ISO three-schema architecture for database design, distinguishing a
computer program (“conceptual schema”), its implementation in hardware (plus operating system, etc.) (“internal schema”), and the user’s
presentation of what the program does (“external schema”). These three
aspects of a computer system are precisely what we are calling its three
facets: its form, the program; its substrate, the hardware; and its appearance, the user interface. This familiar distinction, we now begin to see,
reflects a deep ontological distinction in the nature of things far beyond
computers.
Finally, consider a human being, an individual such as Napoleon. His
appearance is well known: his facial structure, his small stature, his posture
with hand in vest. His form is his individual character as a person, an
intentional subject living in a culture in the natural world, his body having
various traits. And his substrate is what makes this individual possible: his
genetic heritage, his birth on Corsica, the French Revolution, and the
army in which he developed his power – as well as the wider physical,
biological, and cultural conditions of humanity.
Observe how naturally the three-facet distinction applies to such diverse kinds of entities. The concepts of form and appearance are relatively
22 Mind World
familiar; the concept of substrate is not. Indeed, notice how wildly different are the things that serve as substrate for different entities: materials
or parts from which an object is composed; the field in which a physical
particle exists; the genesis of an individual through time; the evolutionary
track (or “clade”) of a biological species; the cultural history and use of
an artifact; the hardware that implements a computer program; the life
trajectory of an individual human being; even the cultural genealogy of
our values (in Nietzsche’s idiom) and of our language games and other
forms of life (in Wittgenstein’s idiom). What these things share, what
makes these things play the role of substrate in very different entities, is
the form of ontological derivation or emergence (in different ways!) from
things more fundamental, the form of ontological foundation or dependence on things in the wider context of the entity. Again, the three-facet
distinction belongs to “formal” ontology.
Now let us apply the three-facet distinction to – of all things – consciousness itself.
The Three Facets of Consciousness
An act of consciousness – my experience of thinking, seeing, or doing
such and such – is an entity with three facets:
1. Its form is its structure of intentionality, its being directed from
subject toward object through a content or meaning, with inner
awareness of itself (“apperception”).
2. Its appearance is how I experience it, “what it is like” for me to live
or perform this act of consciousness.
3. Itssubstrateis its origin or background in conditions including brain
activity, psychological motivation, cultural ideas or practices, and
the biological evolution of this form of mind.
The three facets of an act of consciousness are mapped in a diagram in
Figure 1.2.
According to this three-facet ontology, an act of consciousness is distributed in its nature through its form, appearance, and substrate. This is
not to say there are three kinds of entities bound together, say, items of
brain, meaning, and “feeling.” Rather, a particular mental act is one entity
with a nature that divides into three fundamentally different aspects or
facets. There are systematic relations, including dependencies, among
Three Facets of Consciousness 23
 STRUCTURE OF INTENTIONALITY
 SUBJECT ACT CONTENT >OBJECT
 INNER AWARENESS
FORM
|
ACT OF CONSCIOUSNESS
/ \
SUBSTRATE APPEARANCE
NEURAL-PHYSICAL-BIOLOGICAL CONDITIONS PHENOMENOLOGICAL CHARACTERS OF
PSYCHOLOGICAL CONDITIONS PERCEPTION, THOUGHT,
CULTURAL CONDITIONS EMOTION, VOLITION ...
figure 1.2. The three facets of an act of consciousness.
these facets, but that is a further story. First we must appreciate the fundamentally different roles these facets play in defining consciousness.
As we bring out these differences in facets, we can carve out the role of
phenomenology in understanding mind and its place in the world.
The Structure of Intentionality and Inner Awareness
I am assuming a basic theory of intentionality (elaborated in Smith and
McIntyre 1982). This account of intentionality draws on a long history,
but the main ideas were synthesized adequately first by Husserl. In recent
work in philosophy of mind and cognitive science, Searle (1983) comes
closest to this model of intentionality.
Consciousness occurs in concrete states or events called “acts” of
consciousness: when I see that bird overhead, when I think that Plato
was ironic, when I feel angry about the president’s speech, when I run
with the volition to catch a bus, and so on. Such an act of consciousness
is intentional, or directed toward something, called its object (the bird,
Plato, the speech, my catching the bus). As we say, it is“of” or“about”that
object. The object is prescribed by the content of the act. And the act is
experienced or performed by a person, called its subject. This structure
is analyzed by laying out cases and marking distinctions among subject,
act, content, and object (for detail, see Smith and McIntyre 1982). The
point to consider here is where this structure plays in the ontology of the
act of consciousness, in the three-faceted nature of the act.
24 Mind World
The fundamental structure of intentionality, we assume, is this:
subject — act — content ——> object.
The act is distinct from the object (unless the act is self-referential). The
subject is distinct from the act, and from the stream of consciousness
in which the act occurs as a transitory part. The content is an idea,
image, concept, thought (proposition), volition, and so on: a “meaning”
that Husserl called noema, updating the ancient Greek term for “what is
known.” Importantly, the same object can be “intended” through different contents in different acts.
In practicing phenomenology, when I reflect on an act of consciousness as experienced, I“intend”the act in a second act of reflection focused
on the first act. In this reflection the first act“appears”to the second. Classical phenomenology was much exercised about the best methodology
for reflecting on our experience. However we do it, let us assume, I carry
out an act of reflection – or introspection – on my own conscious experience. And in phenomenological reflection the intentionality of the
given act is part of its “appearance” in the reflective act. So the given
act’s intentionality is part of its form but also part of its appearance in
reflection.
Furthermore, we may directly experience the intentionality of an act
of consciousness, without retreating into a reflection on it. For when I
am conscious of something, say in perception, I have a prereflective inner
awareness of this consciousness-of-something. On this neoclassical view,
consciousness is consciousness-of-something and eo ipso consciousnessof-itself. In inner awareness, then, intentionality “appears”to me in having
a conscious experience of such and such. So intentionality is part of the
appearance of the act already in inner awareness. (This form of inner
awareness is analyzed in D. W. Smith 1989.)
By contrast, we do not directly experience (in inner awareness) the
substrate of an act of consciousness, notably its grounding in brain process and cultural history. Nor does the substrate of an experience submit
to phenomenological analysis in reflection or introspection. In modern
times we all have some knowledge of the fact, empirically discovered
and pursued in neuroscience, that what we are thinking, perceiving, or
dreaming depends on what is happening in our brains. And in postmodern times we all have some appreciation of the fact, frequently observed
in the wake of Marx, Nietzsche, and Freud, that what we think and value
depends on long-standing cultural conceptions, assumptions, linguistic
practices, and political institutions. But these background conditions
Three Facets of Consciousness 25
must be distinguished from the intentional structure of consciousness
itself, thus separating the form and appearance of consciousness from its
substrate. (Compare D. W. Smith 1999b on “background ideas” in the
cultural substrate of intentionality.)
The Ontology of Form and Appearance
Given the preceding model of intentionality, we can say more about the
ontological status of the form and appearance of an entity.
The form of an entity, we said, consists of its kinds, properties, and
relations. These are “universals” in the traditional sense. I shall not here
address the full range of issues about the existence of universals (ably
and succinctly assayed by Armstrong 1989, 1997), but a couple of points
stand out in present discussion. First, some universals depend for their
existence on intentional acts of consciousness and associated cultural
practices, although most do not. The property of being a fork, for instance, could not exist unless people had developed the tradition of eating with a utensil of that shape. (See Thomasson 1999, on similar issues
of dependence.) Moreover, if I am using a fork to pry open a box, it is not
in that context bearing the property of being a fork. Second, a universal
is distinct from any concept that represents it. The property of being an
electron does not depend for its existence on anyone’s having a concept
of it; when someone thinks about an electron, the concept “electron” is
part of the content of the act of thinking but is distinct from the property of being an electron. Universals rather than any associated concepts
make up the form of an entity. Third, a universal is distinct from its instance in a particular entity. Aristotle called such instances “accidents”;
Husserl called them “moments”; recent philosophers (following Donald
Williams’s usage) call them “tropes.” Strictly speaking, the form of an
entity – in the three-facet distinction – is realized in a complex comprising moments or tropes that are instances of universals. For simplicity,
however, in this essay I shall simply speak of an entity’s form and its constituent kinds, properties, and relations. (Still, the distinction between
moments and universals, or “ideal” essences, does important work in a
Husserlian philosophy of mind pace D. W. Smith 1995.)
The appearance of an entity, we said, consists of how it is known or,
we may now say, “intended” in appropriate acts of consciousness. This
talk of “how” is ambiguous between the properties that appear or are
intended and the contents through which they appear. (Husserl carefully
distinguished these: see Ideas I, 1913, §42.) When I see that green leaf,
26 Mind World
for instance, the content “green” in my visual experience is one thing,
and the color itself in the leaf is another thing. Science tells us that the
color green is dependent not only on the wavelength of the light reflected
from the surface of the leaf but also on the interaction with the observer.
Nonetheless, the color in the leaf is distinct from the sensory-conceptual
content in my experience. Moreover, as Husserl noted, the same color
will “look” different under different lighting conditions. The properties
in the appearance of the leaf, in its three-facet nature, are distinct from
the concepts or sensuous qualities (so-called qualia) that are part of my
visual experience that intends the leaf and presents it as green.
Clearly, appearance is to be studied in different philosophical disciplines, in phenomenology (addressing its role in intentional consciousness) and in ontology (distinguishing an appearing color itself from the
intentional contents that present it).
Bearing in mind these amplifications of form and appearance in general, we turn to phenomenology as the study of the form and appearance
of consciousness.
“Transcendental” Phenomenology and the Study of Consciousness
Consciousness has seemed difficult to study in a disciplined way because
it is hard to separate in a disciplined way the different features of consciousness. The distinction between three facets of consciousness helps
to define the domains of different disciplines that study consciousness.
Purely descriptive phenomenology describes the appearance of consciousness in our own experience: the character of consciousness as we experience it in different types of experience. Analytic (“eidetic”) phenomenology analyzes the form of consciousness: the formal structures of
intentionality (already noted in description of our experience). Empirical sciences investigate the substrate of consciousness: the conditions in
which it arises in different forms (noted, roughly, in phenomenological
analysis). Neuroscience develops the theory of how neural activity gives
rise to consciousness in different forms, taking these forms somewhat for
granted. Evolutionary biology develops the theory of how different life
forms evolved, including animals (and plants?) with the capabilities of
consciousness, which begins in sentience and response in low-level organisms (perhaps even in DNA structures themselves if we are to believe
some abstractions about the transfer of “information” in very different
levels of physical reality). Cultural history develops the theory of how particular forms of consciousness evolved in human history, including the
Three Facets of Consciousness 27
types of conscious and often collective thinking that we call storytelling,
philosophy, mathematics, and empirical science.
Ontology – formal ontology – distinguishes not only the three facets
of any entity but the fundamental structures of the world, and so ultimately the place of consciousness in the world, including its relation to
brain, species, culture. In this way, ontology defines the parameters of
the different disciplines that study consciousness in very different ways.
In particular, the three-facet distinction in ontology provides a way
of defining phenomenology that preserves its original insights without
contravening the wonders of today’s neuroscience, not to mention evolutionary biology, cosmology, and cultural history. There is no denying
the relevance of brain, biology, physics, and culture to consciousness. Yet
phenomenology is a different discipline than the empirical natural sciences and the hermeneutic “human sciences.” Husserl labored hard to
distinguish phenomenology as a “rigorous science” that is distinct from
both the natural and cultural sciences. He called this discipline “transcendental.”
In practice Husserl (1912–13) defined “pure” or“transcendental” phenomenology as the study of consciousness while bracketing the surrounding world of nature and culture. This methodology Husserl allied with an
ontology of distinct essences or “regions” called Consciousness, Nature,
and Spirit or Culture. To these “material” essences Husserl applied the
“formal” categories of Individual, Moment or Instance-of-Essence, and
State of Affairs. Phenomenology studies intentionality, the central feature in the essence of an act of consciousness (formally an individual).
But what is “transcendental” about this phenomenology and attendant
ontology?
Dagfinn Føllesdal (1969/1982) focuses phenomenology on the “meaning” things have for us in intentional experience. Husserl called this
meaning or content the noema of an act of consciousness.“Transcendental” phenomenology then focuses on meaning. Meaning is, on this view,
an objective content of intentional experience that can be shared by other
acts and, in some ways, expressed in language or in pictures or other
media of expression and communication.
J. N. Mohanty (1985) has expounded transcendental philosophy and
phenomenology, looking to Kant, from whom Husserl appropriated the
term “transcendental.”In the spirit of Kant, phenomenology would study
the basic conceptual and sensory structures of our experience. More
precisely, transcendental phenomenology is “reflection upon consciousness in its object-constituting role” – that is, intentionality, beginning by
28 Mind World
“delineating the structure of a noema” (p. xix). What is “transcendental” are the noematic meaning structures through which consciousness
intends objects. However, we can no longer hold with Kant that such
structures are necessary and a priori (p. xxix).
Robert Sokolowski (2000) traces the definition of “transcendental”
from Kant back to the medieval philosophers. For the Scholastics, “transcendental” categories apply not to concepts but to beings: the categories
of Unity, Being, and the like are “transcendental” because they pertain to
absolutely everything. Kant revised this notion, with his Copernican revolution, so that what is “transcendental” are our fundamental concepts:
the categories of the understanding, through which alone we can conceive of objects in the world. (Kant explicitly revised the AristotelianScholastic categories by pulling them up from objects into concepts.)
Phenomenology then transcends the Scholastic and Kantian conceptions
of “transcendental.” As Sokolowski shrewdly observes, “Transcendental
phenomenology is the mind’s self-discovery in the presence of intelligible objects.” Whence: “to think about intentionality in all its forms... is
transcendental phenomenology.”
I concur that transcendental phenomenology is the study of intentionality. But I propose to rethink the traditional conceptions of “transcendental.” We may say the three-facet distinction in ontology is itself
“transcendental,” radically updating the medieval notion, insofar as this
distinction defines a fundamental formal ontological structure that applies to
any entity in our kind of world (from a biological species to a computer
system). Indeed, in terms of the three-facet architecture we can redefine
the role of phenomenology in studying the nature of mind.
The appearance of an act of consciousness is studied in what Husserl
called “phenomenological description,” description of experience as
lived. The form of an act of consciousness – the details of its intentional
structure – is studied in what Husserl called “eidetic analysis” of the act,
abstracting or factoring out its form or eidos, namely, its being directed
from subject to object via content. These are the two stages of method
Husserl (1913) used in the practice of “transcendental phenomenology.”
Now, the substrate of an act of consciousness is studied not by phenomenology, but by the natural sciences (in neuroscience, evolutionary
biology, physics) and the cultural sciences (in criticism and history). It
is precisely these aspects of substrate that are bracketed in practicing
phenomenology.
What is “transcendental” in phenomenology, then, is its focus on
the form and appearance of consciousness, as distinguished from its
Three Facets of Consciousness 29
substrate. But what makes this focus “transcendental” is its marking the
formal-ontological distinction among form, appearance, and substrate.
For what is “transcendental” in philosophy, in the present scheme, is
“formal” ontology: seeking very basic forms of being. We need not cling
to the term “transcendental”; what is important in the study of consciousness is observing the differences among form, appearance, and substrate.
If we observe these differences, we should not rule out the relevance
of neuroscience and biology for the phenomenological and ontological
study of consciousness: empirical studies of brain activity may reinforce
or even help to clarify phenomenological observations by showing where
in the brain a particular process or quality of consciousness is produced.
Still, the analysis of form and appearance in consciousness is the business
of phenomenology, informed by ontology. (Compare D. W. Smith 2000b
and 2000c.)
“Naturalistic” Philosophy of Mind and the Study of Consciousness
The lessons of classical phenomenology are being rediscovered in recent
philosophy of mind cum cognitive science, which begins with the metaphysics of naturalism, holding roughly that everything, including mind,
is a part of nature and so – turning to epistemology – is to be studied
following the methods of the natural sciences. Within this context we
need to draw out the implications of the three-facet distinction in formal
ontology.
As noted, it is the discipline of neuroscience, not phenomenology, that
must teach us about the inner workings of the brain, how it produces
consciousness, how it implements the structure of intentionality – the
form of consciousness – in human beings and other terrestrials. When
neuroscience-minded philosophers like Patricia Churchland (1986) and
Paul Churchland (1995) eliminate the propositional attitudes of belief
and the like in favor of neuronal activity, or collapse consciousness into
neural flashes, they have limited their view of consciousness to its neural
substrate. But there is more in view: there is form and appearance, where
intentionality and its subjectivity reside.
Casting a wider net, we have a growing scientific story of the network
of causal interactions within which mental activity occurs, interactions
not only within the brain but among brain events and physical events external to the body. This wider causal ecology defines the causal substrate
of consciousness. When philosophers like Fred Dretske (1981, 1995) collapse intentionality into the causal flow of physical“information”through
30 Mind World
environment and organism, they have limited their view of consciousness
to its causal-ecological substrate.
A kindred view of mind is the widespread view that mind is a function, especially a computational function, of the brain. Causal or computational function is a higher-order property of brain activity, of the
brain’s mediation of inputs and outputs of the organism or system. These
functional properties of brain belong to the physical, causal substrate of
consciousness. Philosophers like Jerry Fodor (1975, 1994) and Daniel
Dennett (1991) follow variations on the functionalist theme: Fodor identifies mental activity with a “language of thought” consisting in physical
symbols processed in the brain, whereas Dennett identifies mind with
computational brain function viewed from the “intentional stance” and
consciousness with a particular function (producing “multiple drafts”
of the brain’s “story” about the world and itself). But functionalism is
restricted to a specific view of the causal substrate of consciousness, overlooking the proper analysis of intentionality in the form and appearance
of consciousness. (See D. W. Smith 1999a, calling for a wider ontology.)
The neural and causal grounding of consciousness is not the only sort
of condition on which our conscious experience depends. As we have
come to recognize, our cultural background also constrains or makes
possible, in importantly different ways, the forms of intentionality we
may enjoy. We cannot think about “naturalism” or “racism” or laissez
faire economics except in a historical context in which other persons,
other intentional subjects, have put forth and debated relevant issues.
More basically, we cannot think as we do “in language” unless we have
acquired a language, such as English. (See D. W. Smith 1999b on “background ideas.”) Cultural preconditions, then, define a distinct region of
the substrate of an act of consciousness. When philosophers like Richard
Rorty (1979) reduce consciousness to philosophical “conversations” following Descartes, they restrict their view to the cultural substrate of our
philosophical self-consciousness. But there is more to consciousness than
what we say about it, even if our discourse shapes our awareness of our
own experience. The form and appearance of our experience is distinct
from its cultural background.
Still another kind of precondition of our human forms of intentionality
is our biological heritage. Here is where the evolutionary biologist’s point
takes hold. I quoted Edward O. Wilson (1998) earlier, where I intimated
that in the study of consciousness, physical and biological theory need to
be developed in relation to phenomenology and ontology. Consider the
role of biological evolution. The human organism – its nervous system,
Three Facets of Consciousness 31
indeed its genome or overall genetic footprint – evolved in the natural
environment of the planet Earth, in the planetary system of the star we
call the sun, in this universe which has developed over some 12 billion
years since the Big Bang. These natural conditions are preconditions for
our forms of consciousness: for intentionality in the form of visual perception (by two eyes two inches apart on the front of a head), emotion
(desire, fear, anger), cognition or thought (about water or fire or Plato),
or volition (to run, using two primate legs rather than two differently advantaged lizardly aviary “legs”). Wilson is right that, in some sense, natural
science will “explain” mind, consciousness, even the arts and humanities,
even the natural sciences themselves as disciplines that have evolved in
human cultures in the blink of cosmic time here on Earth. And philosophers such as Ruth Millikan (1984) and Daniel Dennett (1991, chap. 7)
are right that, in some sense, intentionality and human consciousness will
be “explained” by principles of biological evolution. These kinds of studies of consciousness, however, are limited to the biological substrate of
consciousness. The intentional-subjective form and appearance of consciousness must be “explained” in different ways, in a phenomenological
ontology that observes the three facets of consciousness.
The form and appearance of consciousness, featuring structures of intentionality, are simply different from its substrate, physical and cultural.
This was the force of Husserl’s long argument in the Crisis (1935–38); I
resituate the claim, however, in terms of the three-facet distinction in categorial ontology. In recent philosophy of mind, John Searle (1992) has
sharply separated the irreducibly subjective properties of consciousness
and intentionality from their “background” of neural capacities, arguing thus against the prevailing physical-computational models of mind
in cognitive science; again, I would resituate these differences within the
three-facet ontology.
Here I want to stress that the form and appearance of consciousness
are to be studied in their own right in phenomenology cum ontology,
whereas the substrate of consciousness is to be studied in relevant disciplines in the physical, neural, biological, and cultural sciences. Given
the three-facet distinction, we see what is wrong with the familiar ontological proposals in recent philosophy of mind, from reductive to eliminative materialism, from functionalism to computationalism to causal
externalism to evolutionary psychosociobiology. These “naturalistic” theories are all looking for intentionality, qualia, subjectivity in the wrong
places, in parts of the substrate of consciousness, rather than its form and
appearance.
32 Mind World
The Ontology of Substrate
To understand more clearly what counts as the substrate of consciousness,
we need to address the ontological structure of substrate in general.
Every entity, we assume, has a substrate, initially defined as its “foundation” or “origin.” But different entities may be founded or originated in
very different ways, as our examples showed, and this fact may distract us
from the basic ontological form involved. Fundamentally, the substrate of
an entity consists of what it depends on for its existence, where A depends
(ontologically) on B if and only if A could not exist unless B existed. This
notion of dependence we must now consider.
For Aristotle, a quality in a substance cannot exist apart from the substance. Expanding on this notion, Husserl defined a dependent part as a
part that cannot exist outside the whole, so that the part “requires foundation” by the whole.2 But we need to separate part and dependence,
because something may be dependent on an entity of which it is not a
part. Thus, from Husserl’s complicated scheme, we may distill the following definition of dependence:
A depends or is founded on B if and only if A could not by essence exist
unless B exists, that is, necessarily, by virtue of essence, A exists only if
B exists.
We can also say that A is grounded on B, or B is the/a ground of A. While
Husserl often used the term “foundation” (Fundierung) instead of “dependence” (Unselbstandigkeit ¨ ), I prefer to speak of dependence because
the term “founded” suggests one-way dependence, yet two things may
each depend on the other (neither could exist without the other).
There are different kinds of dependence: physical, biological, cultural,
among others. But, on this analysis, the form of dependence is always the
same: A could not exist unless B existed. Husserl adds the qualification
“by essence,” and Kit Fine (1995) further explicates dependence in terms
of his own conception of essence. However, there are different kinds of
conditions on which something can depend – for example, causal physical circumstances, evolutionary biological circumstances, social cultural
circumstances. Moreover, there seem to be different kinds of “coulds,”
different modes of possibility or necessity – for example, what is physically
necessary, biologically necessary, psychologically necessary, legally necessary. On the Husserl-Fine analysis, these differences may be attributed to
essence: “necessarily, if A has essence EA and B has essence EB, then A exists only if B exists.” These details of essence and necessity lie beyond the
Three Facets of Consciousness 33
scope of the present study; for present purposes let us assume the basic
account of dependence as defined earlier. (Remember that “essence” in
Husserlian idiom means what something is, not what it is necessarily or
“essentially.”)
Many of the central problems of metaphysics involve ontological dependence. The in re theory of universals holds, with Aristotle, that a
quality can exist only if instantiated in an individual (or “primary substance”). Causation may be analyzed in terms of dependence, as A is
caused by B just in case A is physically dependent on B, or it is causally
necessary that if B occurs then A occurs. Classical idealism holds with
Berkeley, and realism denies, that material objects depend on their being perceived or otherwise projected by minds: that is to say, a material
object, by its essence, can exist only if perceived or otherwise intended in
consciousness. Kant’s transcendental idealism holds that certain conceptual categories and certain forms of sensibility are the “necessary conditions of the possibility” of our knowledge of the empirical world around
us. I would reconstrue this epistemological claim in the idiom of ontological foundation: our familiar forms of intentionality, or knowledge of
objects in the world around us, could not occur unless we had acquired
or inherited a certain repertoire of conceptual and sensory structures –
that is, our familiar forms of intentionality depend or are founded on
these conceptual-sensory structures. More recent philosophers – from
Husserl (1913) and Heidegger (1927, as interpreted in Dreyfus 1991)
and Wittgenstein (1953) to John Searle (1983, 1992) – have stressed the
background social practices that condition our experience. Searle posits
a “background” of acquired skills or practical capacities (realized in neural structure) on which our intentional states rest; as Searle puts it, these
capacities “enable” our intentional states to represent what they do. I
would explicate this enablement in the idiom of ontological foundation:
our intentional states could not represent or “intend” what they do, our
intentional relations could not obtain, unless these capacities existed in
our “background.” (Compare D. W. Smith 1989, chap. 6, and 1999b.)
An influential view in recent philosophy of mind and cognitive science
holds that mental states are “supervenient” on physical states of the brain
(Davidson 1970 and Kim 1994, 1998). Supervenience has been variously
defined; however, the issues at stake here are covariance and dependence:
the mental varies with the physical so that every mental state occurs along
with an appropriate brain state and could not occur unless such a brain
state occurred.3 The core definition is, I think, best formulated as a doctrine of ontological dependence: every mental state is said to depend on
34 Mind World
some brain state in such a way that mental state types covary with physical
state types.
David Lewis (1986) uses supervenience in the metaphysics of possible worlds. David Armstrong (1997) holds that a state of affairs (that
an individual has a property or that two individuals stand in a relation)
supervenes on its constituents (the individuals and universals involved).
But Armstrong holds that supervenience brings into the world no new
entities beyond those on which the supervenient ride: supervenience offers an “ontological free lunch,” as Armstrong has put it.4 Thus, a state of
affairs would not be an entity in addition to the individuals and universals
of which it is composed. And if mental activity supervenes on brain activity, there would be no new, distinctly mental entities beyond the physical
entities, the brain states, on which mind supervenes. In the theory of ontological dependence outlined earlier, however, there is no free lunch.
It does not follow from the preceding definition of dependence that A
is not another entity beyond B. Quite to the contrary, in the cases that
concern us, A and B are distinct entities between which a relation of
dependence obtains, so that A can exist only if B exists.
An important but neglected form of dependence is one I discern in
Alfred North Whitehead’s ontology. In Whitehead’s Process and Reality
(1929), as commonly interpreted, the Aristotelian notion of substance,
or enduring material object, is replaced by the notion of process (see
Rescher 1996). However, Whitehead himself distinguished what I would
call“ontological” becoming from temporal becoming. Every actual entity,
Whitehead maintains, is constituted by its relations (of “prehension”) to
other actual entities in its process of “becoming,” or “concrescence.” But
Whitehead distinguishes two types of “flux”: the temporal flux by which
a new entity emerges from others in the “transition” to the novel entity, and the “concrescence” of one entity formed out of many on which
it depends. This latter notion I call ontological becoming (D. W. Smith
2000a). Whitehead’s conception of concrescence I want to cast as a very
fundamental form of dependence: one actual entity depends on a number of other entities in its existence, its “internal constitution.” Indeed,
the doctrine of logical atomism in Russell and Wittgenstein affords another instance of ontological becoming: a state of affairs is “logically”
formed out of individuals and the properties or relations they bear. This
complex entity depends ontologically on its constituents. But these are
not like automobile parts, which are put together in a spatiotemporal
relation to make the whole. A state of affairs is rather put together by
“logical” relations of property instantiation. Whitehead did not adopt
Three Facets of Consciousness 35
Russell’s “logical” atomism; instead, he elaborated an “atomism” where
entities are put together by another kind of bond called “prehension.”
Thus, pace Whitehead, the ultimate substrate of any “actual” entity
or occasion, including an act of consciousness, is its “deep” ontological
structure. In this way phenomenological structure rests on ontological
structure (this, on the model adumbrated in D. W. Smith 2000a).
The Substrate of Consciousness
The substrate of consciousness is that aspect of an act of consciousness
which consists not in how it is intentionally directed (its form), or in
how it feels to its subject in inner awareness (its appearance), but in
how it comes to be, how it originates ontologically, how it depends or is
founded ontologically on various conditions in the surrounding world.
In the normal course of events, I could not see or think or will what I do,
in a given act of consciousness, unless certain background conditions obtained. That is, the act could not be directed as it is – from subject through
content to object, with an inner awareness of the act built in – unless these
background conditions obtained. The substrate of the act consists in its
dependence on these background conditions. This pattern of relations
among the substrate, form, and appearance of an act of consciousness
may be depicted as in Figure 1.3 (where the T-bar stands for ontological
dependence and the three facets are given a slightly different look).
As noted earlier, an act of consciousness may depend in different ways
on a wide variety of things in the world. But we seek order in this variety.
It seems that there are certain kinds of background conditions on which
consciousness depends in systematically different ways. Thus, I propose,
the substrate of an act divides into its patterns of dependence upon:
1. The psychological or personal history of the subject, which conditions his or her experience, making it more or less likely that she
will see or think or feel or do things as she does.
figure 1.3. Intentionality and the three facets of consciousness.
36 Mind World
2. The cultural context or social history of the subject, which conditions his or her consciousness, affording her relevant concepts,
values, and “forms of life” including language.
3. The neural activity in the subject’s brain, including processes of
computation in the neural network, which make possible this form
of consciousness, and which in turn depends on appropriate physical and chemical processes.
4. The biological processes of evolution that allow the emergence of
this form of consciousness, which thus condition the consciousness
in still another way, and which in turn depend on the cosmological
processes by which life itself evolved.
I believe these are the most basic, and fundamentally different, realms
of being on which consciousness depends, in different ways. One might
argue for a different organization of the substrate of consciousness, but
my aim is first to organize the nature of an act of consciousness into
form, appearance, and substrate, and then to look into the organization
of the substrate. In fact, the preceding division of substrate – into psychological, cultural, neural, and evolutionary conditions of dependence –
reflects a fundamental division of labor among the disciplines that have
studied mind over the past century or two. Each of these four domains
of study has developed as a rich and even revolutionary field: psychology,
from psychoanalysis to cognitive science; cultural analysis, from social
science to humanistic critical theory; neuroscience, becoming its own
science in recent decades; evolutionary biology, again gaining salience
in recent decades. If you will, this fourfold division in the substrate of
consciousness is simply a classification of the chief empirical results, or
“material ontologies,” in the theory of mind. But these four areas in theory of mind are framed, here, by a distinction in formal ontology: the
three-facet structure of form, appearance, and substrate, applying this
structure to consciousness.
The philosophy of mind in recent decades has divided into theories
that stress particular features of mind that I would systematize in the
preceding division of the substrate of consciousness. Various naturalistic theories, we noted, stress causal, computational, neural, or biological conditions of those mental states we experience as consciousness.
Culturalistic theories stress the origins of mental life in social conditions and human history. And psychologistic theories stress the contingent psychological origins of experience, rather than (as Husserl
demanded) their meaning, or logically formed intentional content.
Three Facets of Consciousness 37
Phenomenological theories have, by contrast, distanced themselves here
and there from precisely these tendencies. Now, all these dialectical crosscurrents fall into place if we adopt a systematic ontology of the nature of
consciousness: first distinguishing its form, appearance, and substrate,
and then distinguishing these four regions of dependence within its
substrate.
This diverse structure of the nature of mind comes into relief only as
we look systematically at form, appearance, and substrate. And the special
roles of ecological conditions of consciousness come to prominence only
when we bring out the role of ontological dependence in the substrate
of consciousness. We must not, then, identify the nature of consciousness
with one of these types of conditions in its substrate, with brain, or computational function, or causal role, or cultural role, or evolutionary role.
To depend on something, even deeply and fundamentally, is not to be
identical with it.
The Return of Phenomenology
Consciousness is indeed what makes the mind-body problem difficult,
when we look to the results of natural science – or indeed cultural theory.
It is also what makes life worth living and philosophy, since Descartes and
Kant and Husserl, so exciting.
We will not fully “understand” consciousness until we see how it fits
into the structure of the world defined by quantum physics, evolutionary
biology, cultural history, and even cosmology. But our understanding of
consciousness must begin with our own experience, as Descartes began
to see. Our understanding will begin with the structure of consciousness
analyzed in phenomenology, and will go on to integrate the results of
phenomenology with those of natural science and cultural analysis in a
unified world picture framed by basic ontology.
Phenomenology will elaborate (part of) the form of consciousness in
the structure of intentionality and will detail the appearance of consciousness in different forms of experience, including our inner awareness of
experience. These analyses of form and appearance will interweave with
logic, mathematics, computer science, and formal ontology, in analyses of
forms of various things including consciousness. This complex of analyses
will ultimately tie into analyses of the substrate of consciousness, comprising conditions under which the extant forms of experience are realized,
conditions mapped out by the empirical natural sciences and the social or
cultural sciences. And the structure of the world in which consciousness
38 Mind World
and its empirical background conditions obtain will be framed by basic
formal ontology.
What is hard about understanding consciousness is getting our mind
around all these different kinds of structure while keeping straight their
differences. We do this as we delimit phenomenology and its kindred
ontology.5
Notes
1. An extensive collection of work on consciousness in the literature of recent
cognitive science is Block, Flanagan, and Guzeldere ¨ 1997. In these essays phenomenological issues arise quite often, including issues about consciousness,
perception, qualia, content, intentionality, temporal awareness, and higherorder thought. Yet there are virtually no references, in this lengthy collection,
to the literature of phenomenology itself, beginning with Husserl, where these
issues have been analyzed with great illumination for a century. (William
James appears, appropriately, the classical psychologist with a phenomenological nose.) Evidently, there is a cultural barrier at work. I shall not here
specifically critique the recent literature in philosophy of mind cum cognitive
science (Fodor, Dennett, et al.). My aim in this chapter is rather to assess
issues of consciousness within the theoretical framework of phenomenology
in the context of a wider ontology. In my “Mind and Body” (1995), I placed
Husserlian theory within the space of ideas framed by recent philosophy
of mind and cognitive science, including issues of reduction, functionalism,
and the like. Meanwhile, issues of cognitive science are addressed in relation
to phenomenology in Dreyfus 1982; Varela, Thompson, and Roesch 1993;
and Petitot et al. 1999. My own essay in the latter volume, “Intentionality
Naturalized?” (1999a), critiques two influential lines of analysis, articulated
by Fodor and Dretske, from a phenomenological-ontological point of view.
2. Husserl’s notion of founding (Fundierung), or dependence, was used in many
later works after being developed in the third of his Logical Investigations
(1900–1), elaborating a conception originating in Aristotle and used by
Brentano. The Husserlian analysis is assayed in B. Smith 1982. A wider discussion of ontological dependence, amplifying Husserl’s conception, is found
in Simons 1987: chap. 8, pp. 290ff. Kit Fine explores an essence-based conception of dependence in Fine 1995. Thomasson (1999) develops a succinct
model of a basically Husserlian conception of dependence, refining distinctions formulated by Roman Ingarden and applying the model to fictional
objects as dependent on authors’ and readers’ intentional acts. D. W. Smith,
(1989: chapter 6) sketches a ramified notion of dependence or ground, specifying different kinds of dependence (physical, psychological, etc.) and distinguishing kinds of dependence involved in direct awareness, or acquaintance, notably dependence on intentional content and different kinds of
dependence on the context of one’s experience. Simons (1987) similarly
distinguished different kinds of ontological dependence, including logical
presupposition.
Three Facets of Consciousness 39
3. See, as noted earlier, Kim 1994, especially the essay “Supervenience as a
Philosophical Concept,” and 1998.
4. See Armstrong 1989: 100, speaking there of internal relations as supervenient
on their relata while being nothing over and above the relata.
5. The roots of the present essay are various. (1) I have assumed, broadly, a
theory of intentionality as mediated by a meaning-content, the theory developed from Husserl in Smith and McIntyre 1982. (2) In D. W. Smith 1989,
I developed a conception of the “ground” of intentionality, including physical, psychological, and cultural conditions on which intentionality depends;
these grounds of intentionality are part of the substrate of consciousness,
according to the three-facet ontology of consciousness discussed here. (3) A
shorter ancestor of this essay is my “Ontological Phenomenology” (2000c).
(4) The three-facet distinction in ontology, featured here, is used systematically in the formal phenomenological ontology of the PACIS project at
Ontek Corporation: what I here call “facets” have been called “complements” in PACIS terminology. The distinction appears also in Simons and
Smith 1993.
References
Armstrong, David M. 1989. Universals: An Opinionated Introduction. Boulder:
Westview Press.
1997. A World of States of Affairs. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Block, Ned, Owen Flanagan, and Guven G ¨ uzeldere, eds. ¨ 1997. The Nature of
Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Chalmers, David. 1996. The Conscious Mind. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Churchland, Patricia Smith. 1986. Neurophilosophy. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
Churchland, Paul M. 1995. The Engine of Reason, the Seat of the Soul. Cambridge,
Mass.: MIT Press.
Davidson, Donald. 1970. “Mental Events.” Reprinted in Davidson, Essays on Actions, Causes, and Events. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1980.
Dennett, Daniel C. 1991. Consciousness Explained. Boston: Little, Brown.
Dretske, Fred. 1981. Knowledge and the Flow of Information. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
1995. Naturalizing the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Dreyfus, Hubert L. (with Harrison Hall), ed. 1982. Husserl, Intentionality and Cognitive Science. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1991. Being-in-the-World: A Commentary on Heidegger’s Being and Time, Division I .
Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Fine, Kit. 1995. “Ontological Dependence.” Proceedings of the Aristotelian Society
95: 269–90.
Fodor, Jerry A. 1975. The Language of Thought. New York: Cromwell.
1994. The Elm and the Expert: Mentalese and Its Semantics. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
Føllesdal, Dagfinn. 1982. “Husserl’s Notion of Noema.” In Dreyfus 1982. First
published in Journal of Philosophy, 1969.
40 Mind World
Heidegger, Martin. 1988. The Basic Problems of Phenomenology. Translated by
Albert Hofstadter. Revised ed. Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1988.
German original, 1975, from a lecture course in 1927.
Husserl, Edmund. 1969. Ideas [Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and a Phenomenological Philosophy, First Book]: General Introduction to Pure Phenomenology. Translated by W. R. Boyce Gibson. London: George Allen and Unwin;
New York: Humanities Press. First English edition, 1931; German original,
1913.
1970a. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. Translated by J. N. Findlay from
the revised, second German edition. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.
New edition, edited with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a
preface by Michael Dummett. London: Routledge, 2001. German original, 1900–1, revised 1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920
(Investigation VI).
1970b. The Crisis of European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology. Translated by David Carr. Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University Press. Original
manuscript from 1935–38.
1991. Ideas Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and a Phenomenological Philosophy,
Second Book: Phenomenological Investigations of Constitution [or as translated:
Studies in the Phenomenology of Constitution]. Translated by Richard Rojcewicz
and Andre Schuwer. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers, ´ 1991. German
original, 1952, drafted initially in 1912, revised in 1915 and again in 1928.
ISO/IEC TR9007. 1987. Information Processing Systems – Concepts and Terminology for the Conceptual Schema and the Information Base. International
Organization for Standardization (ISO), Geneva.
Kim, Jaegwon. 1994. Supervenience and Mind. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.
1998. Mind in a Physical World: An Essay on the Mind-Body Problem and Mental
Causation. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Lewis, David K. 1986. On the Plurality of Worlds. New York: Basil Blackwell.
Mayr, Ernst, and Peter D. Ashlock. 1991. Principles of Systematic Zoology. 2d. New
York: McGraw-Hill.
Millikan, Ruth G. 1984. Language, Thought, and Other Biological Categories: New
Foundations for Realism. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Mohanty, J. N. 1985. The Possibility of Transcendental Philosophy. Dordrecht:
Martinus Nijhoff Publishers.
Nagel, Thomas. 1974.“What Is It Like to Be a Bat?” Philosophical Review 4: 435–50.
Penrose, Roger. 1994. Shadows of the Mind: A Search for the Missing Science of Consciousness. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Petitot, Jean, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard Pachoud, and Jean-Michel Roy, eds.
1999. Naturalizing Phenomenology: Issues in Contemporary Phenomenology and
Cognitive Science. Stanford, Calif.: Stanford University Press in collaboration
with Cambridge University Press.
Rescher, Nicholas. 1996. Process Metaphysics. Albany: State University of New York
Press.
Rorty, Richard. 1979. Philosophy and the Mirror of Nature. Princeton: Princeton
University Press.
Three Facets of Consciousness 41
Searle, John R. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1992. The Rediscovery of the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Sellars, Wilfrid. 1963. “Philosophy and the Scientific Image of Man.” In W. F.
Sellars, Science, Perception and Reality. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul;
New York: Humanities Press.
Simons, Peter. 1987. Parts. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Simons, Peter, and David Woodruff Smith. 1993. “The Philosophical Foundations of PACIS.” Paper presented at the Sixteenth International Ludwig
Wittgenstein Symposium, Kirchberg am Wechsel, Austria. August.
Smith, Barry, ed. 1982. Parts and Moments. Munich: Philosophia Verlag.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl, pp. 323–93. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1999a. “Intentionality Naturalized?” In Petitot et al. 1999: 83–110.
1999b. “Background Ideas.” Translated into Italian as “Idee di sfondo,”
Paradigmi (Estratto da PARADIGMI, Rivista di critica filosofica) (Rome),
Anno XVII, no. 49 ( January–April 1999): 7–37.
2000a. “Consciousness and Actuality in Whiteheadian Ontology.” In Liliana
Albertazzi, ed., The Origins of the Cognitive Sciences, 1870–1930: Theories of
Representation, pp. 1–30. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
2000b. “How Is Transcendental Philosophy – of Mind and World – Possible?”
In Bina Gupta, ed., The Empirical and the Transcendental: A Fusion of Horizons
(Festschrift in Honor of J. N. Mohanty), pp. 169–79. New York: Rowman and
Littlefield.
2000c. “Ontological Phenomenology.” In Mark Gedney, ed., Proceedings of the
Twentieth World Congress of Philosophy, vol. 7: Modern Philosophy. Bowling Green,
Ohio: Philosophy Documentation Center, Bowling Green University.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Sokolowski, Robert. 2000. “Transcendental Phenomenology.” In Mark Gedney,
ed., Proceedings of the Twentieth World Congress of Philosophy, vol. 7: Modern Philosophy. Bowling Green, Ohio: Philosophy Documentation Center,
Bowling Green University.
Thomasson, Amie L. 1999. Fiction and Metaphysics. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Varela, Francisco, Evan Thompson, and Eleanor Roesche. 1993. The Embodied
Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Whitehead, Alfred North. 1978. Process and Reality. Edited by David Ray Griffin
and Donald W. Sherburne. New York: Free Press, Macmillan. First edition,
1929.
Wilson, Edward O. 1998. Consilience: The Unity of Knowledge. New York: Alfred A.
Knopf.
2
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000
Abstract. What are we to make of the cogito (cogito ergo sum) today, as the walls
of Cartesian philosophy crumble around us? The enduring foundation of
the cogito is consciousness. It is in virtue of a particular phenomenological
structure that an experience is conscious rather than unconscious. Drawing on an analysis of that structure, the cogito is given a new explication
that synthesizes phenomenological, epistemological, logical, and ontological elements. What, then, is the structure of conscious thinking on which
the cogito draws? What kind of certainty does the experience of thinking
give one about one’s thinking and about one’s existence? What form of
inference is the cogito, and what is the source of its validity and soundness?
Does the cogito itself lead to an ontology of mind and body like Descartes’s
dualism? The discussion begins with Descartes’s own careful formulations
of some of these issues. Then the cogito is parsed into several different principles, the phenomenological principle emerging as basic. In due course
the analysis sifts through Husserl’s epistemology, Hintikka’s logic (or pragmatics) of the cogito, and Kaplan’s logic of demonstratives, as these bear
specifically on the cogito.
Segue. In “Three Facets of Consciousness” we proposed that the nature of
any entity, including an act of consciousness, divides into form, appearance,
and substrate. Here we explore the form of consciousness – that of self-aware
intentionality – through its appearance within an act, that is, through “inner awareness.” We approach the analysis of inner awareness by a critical
review of the traditional “cogito,” drawing on Descartes’s analysis but from
today’s perspective (without dualism and without incorrigibility). The results provide one type of justification for first-person methodology in the
theory of mind. For phenomenology begins with our awareness of our
own intentional experiences as we experience them from our first-person
For various comments on this essay and ideas expressed in it, I thank Ermanno Bencivenga,
Alan Nelson, Calvin Normore, Martin Schwab, and Amie Thomasson.
42
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 43
perspective. (The substrate of consciousness, in brain and culture, is
addressed in later essays. The terms “form,” “appearance,” and “substrate” are used here in the technical sense introduced in the preceding
essay.)
There is something dead right, and very much alive, about the cogito:
Descartes’s epochal proclamation, cogito ergo sum. A conscious experience
(“I am thinking”) includes an awareness of itself, an awareness that makes
it conscious and gives its subject immediate evidence of the experience
and therein of his or her existence (“therefore I exist”). This principle
is independent of Descartes’s further doctrines (e.g., rationalism and
dualism), and it survives the many refutations and deconstructions of the
wider Cartesian corpus and their animus for the Cartesian animus (spirit).
It tells us something crucial about consciousness. Yes, consciousness and
some form of the self survive the transition from modern to postmodern
philosophy in our century. Indeed, consciousness is something of the
greatest importance not only to epistemology and psychology in the age
of science but to ethics and social theory and practice in this perilous age
on our planet. Without it, what are we?
Several different principles converge in the inference cogito ergo sum,
including phenomenological, epistemological, and logical – semantic or
pragmatic – principles that would ground the inference. Here I shall try to
articulate some of these enduring principles, beginning with Descartes’s
own astute formulations, which I suspect are still not fully appreciated. I
shall use “cogito” as an umbrella term for these several principles.
The Cogito in and out of (Descartes’s) Context
I propose to study the cogito within the context of late twentieth-century
philosophy, drawing on both continental and analytic traditions. I would
start with a careful interpretation of Descartes’s own formulations of the
cogito, but I shall extract it from the wider context of Descartes’s own
times, concerns, and motivations.
Most philosophers – and mathematicians and scientists – would agree
that Descartes’s larger philosophical programs have not panned out. His
beautiful course of argument in the Meditations, including one form of the
cogito, has brought centuries of critique but has not yielded the foundation he sought for all knowledge, a foundation in the absolute certainty of
reason, a certainty as strong or stronger than that he saw in mathematics.
Nor has an alternative, purely rationalist epistemology emerged with
the tremendous growth in mathematics, logic, and the natural sciences
44 Mind World
since his time, despite Descartes’s seminal influence on these fields. His
metaphysics of mind-body dualism seems passe, although the mind-body ´
problem – so sharply defined by Descartes – is still very much with us,
with no convincing solution, resolution, or dissolution in sight. And his
theological assumptions do not seem of our time. Furthermore, his focus
on the individual subject leaves unaddressed the social, cultural, historical side of the self – the subject of insightful work long after Descartes
(for instance, in the writings of Heidegger, Sartre, Merleau-Ponty, and
Foucault).
Nonetheless, Descartes’s writings remain well worth close study. Not
only do they show the genius and precision of a great philosopher at
work at a certain point in history, but they remain admirably clear foils
against which to view our subsequent heritage in epistemology, metaphysics, phenomenology, philosophy of mind and language, cognitive
psychology, and artificial intelligence. In particular, his own discussions
of the cogito are as precise as they are prescient of more recent developments in the logic and phenomenology of the cogito. Accordingly, we
turn to Descartes’s own presentation of the cogito.
Descartes’s Cogito
Different principles are discernible in Descartes’s discussions of the
cogito. In the Discourse on the Method (1637)1 he wrote:
[T]his truth “I am thinking, therefore I exist” was so firm and sure that all the most
extravagant suppositions of the sceptics were incapable of shaking it [i.e., it was
indubitable]. (CSM I, p. 127/AT, p. 32)
By contrast, in the Meditations (1641) he wrote:
[T]his proposition, I am, I exist, is necessarily [i.e., indubitably] true whenever
it is put forward by me or conceived in my mind. (CSM II, p. 17/AT, p. 25;
“proposition” translates the Latin pronuntiatum)
elaborating:
I am, I exist – that is certain [i.e., indubitable]. But for how long? For as long as
I am thinking. (CSM II, p. 18/AT, p. 27)
Thus, the first formulation concerns an inference about thinking,
whereas the second concerns not an inference but a principle about
thinking. What did Descartes count as thinking? All the main types of
mental activity (especially those we today call intentional). As he wrote
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 45
in the Meditations: “What is [a thing that thinks]? A thing that doubts,
understands, affirms, denies, is willing, is unwilling, and also imagines
and has sensory perceptions” (CSM II, p. 19/AT, p. 28).2
Put in the present tense, Descartes’s claim in the Discourse is that the
inference, or inferential proposition, “I am thinking, therefore I exist”
is indubitable (and hence indubitably true). Let us call this claim the
“cogito inference principle.” By contrast, Descartes’s claim in the Meditations – in the first-person, present-tense – is that the proposition “I
exist” is indubitable (hence, indubitably true) whenever I think it. Let us
call this claim the “cogito principle.” Of course, Descartes’s program was
to ground all our knowledge in propositions that are absolutely certain,
where a proposition is certain if it cannot be doubted (it is indubitable,
hence indubitably true). And the cogito was his first principle – formulated first as an inference in the Discourse and then as a principle in the
Meditations.
To be precise, the two passages quoted from the Meditations articulate
two different cogito principles. The first quotation formulates what we
may call the special cogito principle.
Whenever I am thinking the proposition “I exist,” I am certain [I cannot doubt] that I exist, that is, the proposition “I exist” is indubitable
(for me in so thinking).
The second quotation formulates what we may call the general cogito
principle.
Whenever I am thinking, I am certain that I exist, that is, the proposition “I exist” is indubitable (for me in so thinking)
– no matter what I am thinking. Behind both of these principles lies
a different principle that Descartes seemingly took for granted in the
Meditations, what we might call the protocogito principle.
Whenever I am thinking, I am certain that I am thinking, that is, the
proposition “I am thinking” is indubitable (for me in so thinking).3
(As in Descartes’s own formulations, these principles involve secondorder propositions – propositions about propositions. Thus, the special
cogito principle concerns not only the epistemic proposition “I am certain that I exist” but the second-order, semantic proposition “the proposition ‘I exist’ is indubitable [for me . . .].” Differences will emerge between
the claims here separated by “that is.”)
46 Mind World
Because the cogito inference principle does not specify any particular
content of thinking, it aligns with the general cogito principle. But we
might distinguish two cogito inferences too. The general cogito inference
principle would say:
The inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist” is indubitable, that is,
whenever I perform it, it is indubitable (for me in so performing it).
Whereas the special cogito inference principle would say:
The inference “I am thinking the proposition ‘I exist,’ therefore I
exist” is indubitable, that is, whenever I perform it, it is indubitable
(for me in so performing it).
It would be Descartes’s claim, in either case, that what is indubitable is
not only the validity of the inference but also the truth of its premise – the
proposition “I am thinking” or “I am thinking the proposition ‘I exist’” –
and hence the soundness of the inference.
There can be no doubt as to which form of the cogito Descartes took
to be fundamental for his purposes. Even in the Discourse, just a few lines
before declaring the inference indubitable, he had put aside logic (reasoning, demonstrative proof) as open to doubt. Then in the Meditations
what he claimed is indubitable is not the inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist,” but the simpler proposition “I exist.” At that point in his
course of meditation, the evil-demon hypothesis had rendered logic dubitable. Moreover, in his Replies to critics of the Meditations (also 1641), he
explicitly rejected logic as the ground of certainty even for the inference –
at least the Aristotelian logic of his day, namely the theory of syllogism.
He wrote:
When someone says“I am thinking, therefore I am, or I exist,” he does not deduce
existence from thought by means of a syllogism, but recognizes it as something
self-evident by a simple intuition of the mind. This is clear from the fact that if
he were deducing it by means of a syllogism, he would have to have had previous
knowledge of the major premiss “Everything which thinks, is, or exists”; yet in
fact he learns it from experiencing in his own case that it is impossible that he
should think without existing. (Second Replies, CSM II, p. 100/AT, p. 140)
So it is “a simple intuition of the mind” that gives one certainty of one’s
existence: one learns the certainty of one’s existence “from experiencing
[it] in his own case.” This certainty does not come from a logical intuition of the inference “Everything that thinks, exists, and I am thinking,
therefore I exist” (an intuition recognizing the validity of this inference,
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 47
or the logical truth of the inferential proposition). Nor, presumably, does
it come from a logical intuition of the simpler inference “I am thinking,
therefore I exist.” The cogito inference may well be valid and its validity
recognizable in a logical intitution, an intuition bearing the certainty of
logic. But that is not the sort of certainty Descartes was seeking for one’s
own existence. Furthermore, Descartes clearly thought the cogito inference is not only valid but sound, and its lone premise “I am thinking”
indubitable for the thinker. And the indubitability of the proposition “I
am thinking” when one is thinking comes not from logic, or logical intuition, but from the experience of thinking, from a “simple intuition” of
one’s thinking.
Descartes’s fundamental claim is explicit in yet another of the
Replies:
It is true that no one can be certain that he is thinking or that he exists unless he
knows what thought is and what existence is. But this does not require reflective
knowledge, or the kind of knowledge that is acquired by means of demonstrations;
still less does it require knowledge of reflective knowledge, i.e. knowing that we
know, and knowing that we know that we know, and so on ad infinitum. This kind
of knowledge cannot possibly be obtained about anything. It is quite sufficient
that we should know it by that internal awareness which always precedes reflective knowledge. This inner awareness of one’s thought and existence is so innate
in all men that, although we may pretend that we do not have it if we are overwhelmed by preconceived opinions and pay more attention to words than to their
meanings, we cannot in fact fail to have it. Thus, when anyone notices that he is
thinking and that it follows from this that he exists, even though he may never
before have asked what thought is or what existence is, he still cannot fail to have
sufficient knowledge of them both to satisfy himself in this regard. (Sixth Replies,
CSM II, p. 285/AT, p. 422)
So, according to Descartes, even when one performs the (general) cogito inference, one’s certainty of one’s existence comes from one’s “inner
awareness of one’s thought and existence.”It does not come from “reflective knowledge” or, more specifically, from logical inference (“the kind of
knowledge that is acquired by means of demonstrations”). In short, the
source of certainty for one’s knowledge of one’s own existence – and even
for the validity of the cogito inference – is not logical but phenomenological
(to use a term not yet available in Descartes’s day). And that is the point
of the general cogito principle formulated here.4
Having explained the cogito principle in this way, Descartes might
have abandoned the cogito inference as at least misleading. Yet he reiterated the cogito inference in the Principles of Philosophy (1644): “[I]t is a
contradiction to suppose that what thinks does not, at the very time when
48 Mind World
it is thinking, exist. Accordingly, this piece of knowledge [this inference:
French version] – I am thinking, therefore I exist – is the first and most certain
of all to occur to anyone who philosophizes in an orderly way” (CSM I,
p. 195/AT, p. 7). Although this formulation is less precise than the
earlier ones (for one thing, it is cast in the third person), Descartes explicitly endorses the certainty of the cogito inference per se. This should
tell us that he does not want to eliminate the inference in favor of the
cogito principle. And the passages quoted previously tell us why: the principle underlies the inference, in that the principle explicates the source
of certainty Descartes claims for the inference itself.
This prereflective inner awareness of one’s thinking – the source of
certainty in the cogito – is a “perception” of one’s thinking, in a generalized sense of perception. As Descartes wrote in Passions of the Soul (1649,
a year before his death):
Our perceptions are ... of two sorts: some have the soul as their cause, others the
body. Those having the soul as their cause are the perceptions of our volitions and
of all the imaginings or other thoughts which depend on them. For it is certain
that we cannot will anything without thereby perceiving that we are willing it. And
although willing something is an action with respect to our soul, the perception
of such willing may be said to be a passion in the soul. But because this perception
is really one and the same thing as the volition, ... we do not normally call it a
“passion,” but solely an “action.” (CSM I, pp. 335–36/AT, p. 343)
Thus, one’s inner awareness of one’s thinking is “really one and the same
thing as” the thinking itself. Although Descartes’s action-passion distinction is not easy to explicate, his words are echoed in Sartre’s doctrine
of the prereflective cogito, the immediate knowledge one has of one’s
own consciousness, which Sartre says is “constitutive” of consciousness.5
What should we make today of these several principles that course
through Descartes’s discourse about the cogito – from the special and
general forms of the cogito principle to the cognate cogito inferences? I
shall approach these principles from different directions, seeking plausible grounds for them in relevant domains of phenomenology and logic
(including semantics and pragmatics) and addressing the more familiar
issues in epistemology and ontology from those perspectives.
The Phenomenology of the Cogito
The heart of the cogito is the phenomenological principle that we have an
immediate awareness of our own current experience. This type of awareness gives one immediate evidence – and, so far as one can tell, immediate
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 49
knowledge – of the fact that one is so thinking and the fact that, in so
thinking, one exists. Whether this type of evidence yields the kind of
certainty Descartes sought – namely indubitability – is a further issue. This
phenomenological principle I propose to explicate in terms of a structural analysis of this “inner awareness” of experience.
The general, not the special, cogito principle has fundamental phenomenological force. Let us recast the general cogito principle in the
following form, incorporating the protocogito principle, thus making
explicit one’s certainty not only of one’s existence, but of one’s thinking
and indeed the content of one’s thought:
When I am thinking “p,” I am certain that I am thinking “p” and that
I exist.
We must restrict the principle, however, to conscious thought. Thus, the
general cogito principle should say:
When I am consciously thinking “p,” I am certain that I am thinking
“p” and that, in so thinking, I exist.6
(Because Descartes included under “thinking” all intentional mental activities, the principle should be generalized by replacing “thinking” with
a general term ranging over all intentional mental activities. However, for
easy reading, in the spirit of Descartes, we will retain the term “thinking.”)
Descartes did not appear to recognize unconscious mental activities. Indeed, the theory of the unconscious was to develop only later, especially
in Freud’s psychoanalysis and in today’s cognitive psychology. The cogito,
however, applies only to conscious mental activities: I have an immediate awareness – and therewith immediate evidence and arguably a kind
of certainty – of my own mental activity only if it is a conscious mental
activity. Indeed, the inner awareness I have of my current mental activity
is precisely what makes it a conscious mental activity. (Or so the present
author has argued on another occasion.)7 This conception of consciousness was no stranger to Descartes, even if the unconscious was. As quoted
earlier, Descartes himself explained the cogito principle in terms of “inner awareness of one’s thought and existence,” which is an “intuition of
the mind,” a “perception” of one’s own thinking. Moreover, in the Principles of Philosophy (1644) he wrote, “By the term ‘thought,’ I understand
everything which we are aware of as happening within us, in so far as we
have awareness of it” (CSM I, p. 195/AT, p. 7). In E. M. Curley’s translation, this reads: “all those things which, we being conscious, occur in
50 Mind World
us, in so far as the consciousness of them is in us,” drawing on the Latin
immediate conscii simus.
8
Thus, the cogito principle is fundamentally a principle about the nature and structure of consciousness per se, that is, the quality of being
conscious (being a conscious, as opposed to unconscious, mental activity). Elsewhere I have proposed an analysis of the defining structure
of consciousness.9 On that proposal, a conscious mental activity has
the following phenomenological structure (staying with the Cartesian verb
“think”):
Consciously I now am thinking “p.”
The structure of the quality “consciously” may be unfolded further as
follows:
Phenomenally in this very experience I now am thinking “p.”
Here we distinguish four relevant phenomenological features in a conscious mental activity: the phenomenal quality, or “quale,” of the experience; the reflexive character“in this very experience”; the egocentric character “I [think]”; and the temporal character “now.” The phenomenal
quality of an experience is the subjective character of what it is like as
experienced.10 The reflexive character of an experience is its character
of indicating itself as it is experienced. The egocentric character of an experience is its character of indicating its subject as having the experience.
And the temporal character “now” indicates the temporal position of the
experience within the stream of retained past and expected impending
experiences.11 My awareness of my thinking “p” lies in the reflexive character of my thinking, and my awareness of myself in thinking lies in the
egocentric character of my thinking. Fundamentally, it is this reflexive
awareness of my thinking that makes my thinking conscious, and this
awareness is qualified further by the accompanying egocentric, phenomenal, and temporal characters.
Importantly, these four features of an experience of thinking are not
part of “what” is thought, but part of “how” something is thought. What
is thought – the content of the act of thinking – is a proposition; how it
is thought is a modality of thinking. These four “modal” features of an
experience are proper parts of the experience. Thus, they are present in
the experience prior to any reflection on the experience, which takes
place in a separate, further mental act (either at the same time or
shortly thereafter). They are thus, in Sartre’s phrase, “prereflective.” Indeed, as quoted earlier, Descartes said inner awareness is not “reflective
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 51
knowledge” of one’s thought. Accordingly, if introspection is a separate act
of phenomenological reflection, as I think it is usually conceived, then
inner awareness is distinct from introspection.12
In terms of this analysis of phenomenological structure, we can now
explicate the general cogito principle. The principle of awareness – as we
may now introduce it – says:
When I am consciously thinking “p,” I am aware of my thinking “p”
and therein of myself.
My awareness of my experience lies in the reflexive character of the experience, and my awareness of myself lies in the accompanying egocentric character of the experience. These two forms of “inner” awareness ground
the general cogito principle, for they carry my immediate evidence of the
fact that I am so thinking and therewith the fact that I exist in so thinking.
Thus, the principle of awareness may be formulated alternatively as:
When I am consciously thinking “p,” I am aware and it is thereby evident to me that I am thinking “p” and that I exist (in thinking “p”).
And if the evidence of inner awareness amounts to certainty, then we have
here the general cogito principle that Descartes enunciated.
Let us be clear about the role of qualia in “evidence.” We have focused
on thinking in the sense of judgment, but Descartes included under thinking all intentional mental activities, including sense perception. Now, a
visual perception has an evidential character that is grounded partly in the
phenomenal character, or quale/qualia, of the perception. However, one’s
sensory evidence of the world before one is different from the evidence
of one’s experience that is part of inner awareness. And it is the latter
kind of evidence that pertains to the cogito principle.
The temporal character of experience – “I nowam thinking ‘p’”– complicates the issues of the cogito in an interesting way. For this character rings
in one’s sense of personal identity through time. As Husserl observed,13
drawing on his analysis of time consciousness, the “I” of whose existence
one is certain in performing the ego cogito is not a momentary I, but a temporally extended I. Likewise, the act of thinking of which one is certain
is a temporally extended process. In our terms: in my inner awareness
of my current experience, I am aware of my experience as unfolding
through time and I am aware of myself as an enduring subject of that
experience. The span of time so experienced is, however, relatively short:
it is what William James called the “specious present”; only if Husserl was
right does it have a somewhat greater spread owing to the structure of
52 Mind World
time consciousness in one’s fading “retentions” of the passed phases of
one’s experience.
Let us look more closely now at the problem of evidence in the cogito.
The Epistemology of the Cogito
The uncertainty in the general cogito principle, I submit, concerns the
certainty gained in inner awareness. What kind of certainty does one have
of one’s own thinking and existence in virtue of one’s inner awareness of
one’s experience? Descartes sought absolute indubitability. And through
the indubitability of the cogito he sought the defeat of skepticism (the
skepticism he had formulated in the First Meditation, culminating in the
demon hypothesis) and ultimately a rationalist foundation for all knowledge. Here I want to follow a road less traveled, seeking the “certainty”
of the cogito in the phenomenology of evidence.
Husserl understood evidence (Evidenz, self-evidence) as a phenomenological quality in various types of experience, and he distinguished different types of evidence, including the evidence of phenomenological re-
flection (Husserl’s mode of introspection, guided by his methodological
strictures).14 Similarly, we might recognize in inner awareness its own
kind of evidence. Sensory perception is an evident presentation of one’s
physical surroundings. The quality of sensory evidence is epistemically
primitive: our judgments about our surroundings are based on sensory
perceptions in virtue of their characteristic evidence, and such judgments
are revisable in light of further sensory evidence and even further beliefs.
But there is nothing to say about sensory evidence itself beyond a phenomenological description of perception as carrying evidence in varying
degrees, depending, say, on how well one sees something. (What we normally call sensory evidence, then, comprises the propositions that are contents of judgments based immediately on sensory perceptions.) Similarly,
inner awareness is an evident awareness of one’s current mental activity.
This kind of evidence too is epistemically primitive: our judgments about
our own mental activities are based on the evidence in inner awareness,
yet about this kind of evidence itself we can only offer phenomenological
description, including strength or degree. The analogy with perception
is not new. As noted earlier, Descartes himself used a generic notion of
perception, which explicitly included not only sensory perception but
perception of one’s thinking. The outstanding question is about revisability. Are introspective judgments – judgments about our experience
based on the evidence of inner awareness – revisable in light of further
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 53
inner awareness, or further evidence in sensory perception, or in light
of auxiliary beliefs? Is the evidence in inner awareness so strong that the
deliverances of inner awareness are always and forever unrevisable?
It is commonly said that Descartes assumed the “incorrigibility” of the
mental, this interpretation of Descartes deriving from Gilbert Ryle’s The
Concept of Mind (1949).15 As Ryle put it, Cartesian doctrine holds: “The
states and operations of a mind are states and operations of which it is
necessarily aware, in some sense of‘aware,’ and this awareness is incapable
of being delusive. ...It is part of the definition of their being mental that
their occurrence entails that they are self-intimating” (p. 158). Because
not all mental states are conscious (as Ryle observed contra Descartes),
this claim should be restricted to the conscious ones. Then the claim
is that (1) every conscious mental state includes an awareness of itself
and (2) that awareness is infallible, or “incapable of being delusive.” This
claim is the conjunction of two principles, the first being essentially the
principle of awareness formulated previously (for the case of thinking):
When I am consciously thinking “p,” I am aware of my thinking “p.”
The second, which we may call the principle of infallibility (of inner awareness),
would say (for the case of thinking):
When I am aware of my thinking “p,” I am in fact consciously thinking “p.”
This principle is just the converse of the principle of awareness, and it is
equally plausible: consciousness and awareness go hand in hand (in normal adult human consciousness). But this is an ontological claim. And
“incorrigibility” (uncorrectability, unrevisability) ought to be an epistemological feature of introspective, phenomenological judgments about
conscious thoughts and experiences. So our question is, What kind of
evidence does inner awareness give to introspective judgments? Are they
so secure in their evidence that they could not reasonably be revised?
Descartes’s answer we know: it is his Second Meditation. When I am
consciously thinking “p,” the evidence in my awareness of my so thinking
is so strong that I cannot reasonably doubt that I am so thinking – even
under the hypothesis of an evil demon who places the thought in my
mind. Thus, when so thinking I could not reasonably revise my judgment
that I am so thinking (insofar as I could form this judgment at the same
time, in the presence of that thinking).
What did Husserl say when he addressed the cogito in his Cartesian Meditations? Husserl said that the evidence in our reflection on our
54 Mind World
experiences has the three characters of certainty (we do not doubt these
judgments), adequacy (there are no hidden aspects of pure consciousness), and even apodicticity (it is “unimaginable” that we could doubt
these judgments).16 For Husserl, then, the apodicticity of judgments
made in phenomenological reflection – based, let us add, on the evidence
in inner awareness – would seem to rule out any reasonable revision of
these judgments. And yet, the phenomenological character of apodicticity does not entail the ontological character of infallibility: although it
may seem unimaginable to me – in light of my awareness of thinking “p” –
that there could be reason for me to doubt that I am now thinking “p,”
in fact I may not be so thinking.
Indeed, there is much to know about our experiences that is not accessible to phenomenological reflection but is the business of empirical
psychology, from psychoanalysis to experimental cognitive psychology to
neuroscience and psychobiology. The epistemology of inner awareness
and introspection should thus allow that judgments of introspection are,
like all things human, fallible and, in principle, open to revision in light
of appropriate evidence from further introspection and from appropriate empirical investigation, say, about one’s current brain state. By the
same token, empirical theories of mind – in psychobiology and cognitive science – must accommodate the evidence of inner awareness and
introspection.
A proper epistemology of inner awareness and introspection would
assay the types and grades of evidence therein. Such a project is well
beyond the scope of this chapter and probably beyond the state of current knowledge. But note how very strong is Descartes’s criterion of certainty in the cogito. Not only is indubitability the measure of certainty
(whereas Husserl allows a weaker form of certainty than apodicticity
or indubitability). But this indubitability, for Descartes, is measured by
performing a thought experiment in which one imagines a wildly possible circumstance: an evil demon orchestrating one’s experience. This
thought experiment defines something like a logical possibility, raising
the question of what precisely is the logic of the cogito and what kind of
logical possibility the demon scenario exemplifies in regard to the proposition “I am thinking.”
The Logic of the Cogito
Any appraisal today of the logic of the cogito should begin with
Jaakko Hintikka’s perceptive study, “Cogito, Ergo Sum: Inference or
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 55
Performance?” (1962).17 While Hintikka’s exact proposal – the so-called
performative version of the cogito – is neither the most plausible reading
of Descartes’s texts nor the most compelling form of the cogito, his subtly
crafted essay separates many of the key issues concerning the logic of the
cogito. Here we shall pursue those and related issues in light of more
recent results in the phenomenology of inner awareness and the logic of
indexicals such as “I.”
Hintikka rightly observed that if cogito ergo sum expresses a logical inference, it cannot be an inference of the form “a is thus and so, therefore
a exists,” or an implication of the form Fa → ∃x(x = a) in quantification
logic. For these principles merely formalize the presupposition that singular terms in the given language refer to existent entities. And the question
is whether (with Descartes perhaps) we can simply assume a logic with
this presupposition, as there are logics that are free of this presupposition
(they have come to be called “free logics”).18 Moreover, even if this form
of inference is valid, it does not help to explain what is special – or what
Descartes thinks is special – in cogito ergo sum, which concerns thinking.
Similarly, on an ontological level, critics have long charged that Descartes
tacitly assumed a Scholastic ontology of substance and attribute, reflecting a similar form of inference: if something has an attribute, then it is
a substance and so exists. But this interpretation does not explain what
is special about the cogito and its place in Descartes’s epistemology. And
similarly on a semantic level, Jerrold Katz has argued at length for an
updated notion of analyticity, given which cogito ergo sum expresses an
analytic entailment, as the concept or sense “thinking” entails the sense
“exist.”19 But, again, this interpretation does not deal with what is special
about the cogito in Descartes’s program.
Hintikka proposed, accordingly, that cogito ergo sum does not express
an inference of the usual sort but rather reflects the “performative”
character of the statement made by uttering the sentence “I exist,” a
statement whose denial is “curiously pointless” (p. 58) or self-defeating
(p. 60, n. 23). More precisely, where p is a sentence and a a singular term,
Hintikka defined p as existentially inconsistent for the person referred to by a to
utter if and only if the sentence “p; and a exists” is inconsistent (in the ordinary sense) (p. 57). The negation of such a sentence is then existentially
self-verifying for the speaker (p. 60). Thus Hintikka’s appraisal:
Descartes realized, however dimly, the existential inconsistency of the sentence
“I don’t exist” and therefore the existential self-verifiability of “I exist.” Cogito,
ergo sum is only one possible way of expressing this insight. Another way actually
employed by Descartes is to say that the sentence ego sum is intuitively self-evident.
56 Mind World
We can now understand the relation of the two parts of the cogito, ergo sum
and appreciate the reasons why it cannot be a logical inference in the ordinary
sense of the word. What is at stake in Descartes’s dictum is the status (the indubitability) of the sentence “I am.”...Contrary appearances notwithstanding,
Descartes does not demonstrate this indubitability by deducing sum from cogito.
On the other hand the sentence “I am” (“I exist”) is not by itself logically true,
either. Descartes realizes that its indubitability results from an act of thinking,
namely from an attempt to think the contrary. The function of the word cogito
in Descartes’s dictum is to refer to the thought-act through which the existential
self-verifiability of “I exist” manifests itself. ...It serves to express the performatory character of Descartes’s insight; it refers to the “performance” (to the act
of thinking) through which the sentence “I exist” may be said to verify itself.
(pp. 61–62)
So, on Hintikka’s analysis, there is no logical problem with the sentence “I do not exist”; it is not logically false, nor is the sentence “I exist” logically true. But there is a pragmatic problem with the statement
made – the speech act performed – by uttering the sentence “I do not
exist”: “[N]obody can make his hearer believe that he does not exist by
telling him so” (p. 58). Similarly, no one can make himself believe that he
does not exist by thinking he does not, by thinking the proposition “I do
not exist” (if we may here import the notion of propositions as thought
contents). “This transition from ‘public’ speech-acts to ‘private’ thoughtacts,” Hintikka adds, “does not affect the essential features of their logic”
(p. 59). Thus, to interpolate a bit, the proposition, or thought content,
“I do not exist” is not logically false, nor is the thought-content “I exist”
logically true; but the act of thinking “I do not exist” is self-defeating, and
hence the act of thinking “I exist” is self-verifying. Moreover, Hintikka
assumes, the “performance” through which the sentence “I exist” “may be
said to verify itself” is the act of thinking “I exist”: it is only through the
act of thinking “I exist” that the speech act of stating “I exist” – stating
that one exists by uttering the sentence “I exist” – is verified; and only
in that way is the sentence “I exist” self-verifying. Finally, the proposition
“I exist” is self-verifying insofar as its truth is (in Hintikka’s phrase) intuitively self-evident in performing the act of thinking “I exist.” And thus
is the proposition “I exist,” pace Descartes, indubitable for the subject in
the act of so thinking.
If Hintikka’s analysis is on the right track, the logic of the cogito concerns not the validity or soundness of the form of inference “I am thinking,
therefore I exist,” but the self-verification of the act of thinking “I exist”
and on that basis stating that one exists by uttering the sentence “I exist.”
So the purview of logic must be extended to include not only sentences
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 57
(in syntax and semantics), but also speech acts (in pragmatics) and even
thought acts (in phenomenology). I believe this much is quite right and
consonant with the history of logic.20 As noted earlier, however, there
are really two cogito principles (plus two cogito inference principles) to
which this analysis must be applied, and Hintikka’s exact claim applies to
only one.
The special cogito principle, enunciated in Descartes’s Second Meditation (quoted earlier), says:
Whenever I am thinking the proposition “I exist,” I am certain (I cannot doubt) that I exist.
This is precisely the principle Hintikka’s analysis underwrites. By contrast,
the general cogito principle, enunciated in Descartes’s Replies (quoted
earlier), says:
Whenever I am thinking [thinking anything at all], I am certain (I
cannot doubt) that I exist.
This is the principle explicated earlier, based on the proposed phenomenology of inner awareness of thinking. Can this general cogito principle be underwritten by the logic of the cogito, in terms of the broader
conception of logic suggested by Hintikka’s appraisal of the cogito? To
this we shall turn shortly, joining the logic and the phenomenology of the
cogito. But notice that these two principles have very different grounds.
On the one hand, there is something specific to the proposition “I exist” that makes the act of thinking “I exist” self-verifying, and so grounds
the special cogito principle. On the other hand, there is something general about conscious thought (about inner awareness of one’s thinking)
that makes one certain of one’s thinking and of one’s own existence in
thinking, and so grounds the general cogito principle.
Regarding the special cogito principle, we should distinguish two “performative” characters that might ground the principle. Hintikka says the
transition from public speech acts to private thought acts does not affect
their logic, that is, their performative characters. But is that right? If I
say to you, “I exist,” my assertion is curious and self-verifying because I
am already visually before you, so what is the point of my saying that –
why will your hearing me say that help to get you to believe I exist when
you already see me before you? However, if I think to myself “I exist,” my
thought is curious and self-verifying, not because I am in a social circumstance, conversing with another, trying to convey beliefs by speaking, but
because I already have an inner awareness of my thinking and therein
58 Mind World
of my existence – so what’s the point of thinking (judging) “I exist”?
The pragmatics of these two acts, the overt speech act and the inner
mental act, are very different. If Hintikka’s analysis is correct for the public speech act, another analysis is still needed for the private thought
act – namely, analysis of inner awareness itself, not an analysis of the
pragmatics of conversation. And, indeed, as Hintikka himself suggested,
the self-verification of the speech act is grounded in the self-evidence of
the thought act.
Hintikka’s analysis addresses the statement “I exist.” But what of the
inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist”? The cogito, after all, was
supposed to prove something (as my colleague Ermanno Bencivenga remarked to me). Logic would demonstrate the validity of the inference,
on any occasion of performance, by showing somehow that the premise
could not be true and the conclusion false on that same occasion. Its
validity, however, is not grounded simply in syntactically defined rules
of inference (e.g., Fa/ ∴ ∃x(Fx)). The “self-validating” character of the
inference – whence its validity – is not a matter of proof theory, but
a matter of semantics or pragmatics grounded in phenomenology, as
we shall see later. Further, the truth of the premise “I am thinking” –
hence the soundness of the inference – would be a matter of logic only
if this premise were somehow a logical truth, and its truth, as we will
find shortly, is warranted by phenomenology rather than logic as usually
conceived.
There is, moreover, an unusual epistemic feature of Descartes’s use
of the cogito inference (general or special). Descartes used the cogito
inference in his quest for certainty. Thus, in the inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist,” what Descartes sought to preserve – in the move
from “I am thinking” to “I exist” – was not merely truth but certainty,
or indubitability: the indubitability of my thinking (for me in thinking)
is transferred to the indubitability of my existence (for me in so thinking). In this respect (as Calvin Normore wisely observed in conversation),
Descartes’s conception of inference in the cogito was different from our
twentieth-century notion of a truth-preserving movement of thought.
Or, rather, Descartes asked more of this particular inference than truth
preservation, and the indubitability he sought to preserve derives from
the character of evidence in inner awareness of thinking.
Many of Descartes’s readers have thought that introspection – or better,
as argued earlier, inner awareness – is the source of certainty in Descartes’s
cogito. Hintikka played down the role of introspection in the cogito
(pp. 63ff.), stressing the logic. But that was before he had discovered
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 59
phenomenology. In another context he has since quipped, “There is often more logic than phenomenon in phenomenology.” Turning to the
cogito and his appraisal of its logic, however, we might better say, “There
is more phenomenon than logic in the cogito.” The phenomenon of
thinking – the act of thinking as it is experienced – is the ground of the
logic of the cogito. Better still: there is logic in the phenomenology and
phenomenology in the logic of the cogito! And there is linguistics, too,
in the range of speech act theory and language game theory.
Thus, to appraise the logical force of the cogito (principle and inference, special and general), we have to appraise the several lines of
force – phenomenological, semantic, and pragmatic – in the relevant
mental acts, speech acts, sentences, and propositions (thought contents). These
include:
The sentences “I exist” and “I am thinking, therefore I exist.”
The speech acts of asserting, “I exist,” and inferring, “I am thinking,
therefore I exist.”
The propositions “I exist” and “I am thinking, therefore I exist.”
The mental acts of thinking “p,” thinking “I exist,” and thinking “I am
thinking, therefore I exist.”
The Semantics (or Formal Pragmatics) of the Cogito
A lot of water has flowed under the bridge of philosophical logic since
Hintikka’s essay on the cogito. Along came possible-worlds semantics, including Hintikka’s formulations of the logic and semantics of sentences
ascribing intentional attitudes; then came Richard Montague’s extension of possible-worlds semantics to pragmatics, giving formal models of
context-dependent aspects of meaning and reference; and then, along
with the neo-Russellian theory of“direct”reference, came David Kaplan’s
logic – formal semantics or pragmatics – of demonstrative pronouns like
“that” and indexical words like “I,” terms whose reference depends on
the context of utterance.21 Noting the indexical elements in “I exist” and
“I am thinking,” we might now try to explicate the logic of the cogito in
terms of a formal semantics (or pragmatics) of indexicals – enlightened
by the phenomenology of thought and inner awareness. Specifically, in
terms of such a semantics we can explicate the self-verifying character of
a speech act of asserting, “I exist” – or indeed “I am thinking, therefore I
exist.” And in terms of a parallel “semantics” of thought, we can explicate
the self-verifying character of a mental act of thinking “I exist” – or “I am
thinking, therefore I exist.”
60 Mind World
Kaplan’s semantics for indexicals ramifies Frege’s scheme of sense
and reference and reintroduces a neo-Russellian notion of “singular
propositions.”22 In place of Fregean “sense,” Kaplan introduces two levels of meaning called “character” and “content.” Take, for instance, the
sentence “I am tall.” The character of the sentence – something like its
role or rule of use – specifies for each context (or occasion) of utterance
the content of the sentence in that context, and the content of the sentence
in a given context is, for Kaplan, the “singular proposition” consisting
of the individual whom “I” refers to in that context and the property of
being tall – in effect, the putative state of affairs that said referent is tall.
Of course, the character of the sentence “I am tall” depends on the character of the indexical “I,” which specifies for each context of utterance
the content of “I” in that context, which is simply the individual who utters “I” in that context. Indeed, in any context “I” refers to the individual
who utters “I” in that context; for Kaplan, “I” refers “directly,” in that the
referent is fixed by context without the mediation of a Fregean “sense,”
and so the “content” of “I” in a given context is simply its referent in
that context. (Originally, Kaplan modeled character as a function from
contexts to contents, and content as a function from possible worlds to
extensions. Nota bene: I have used the terms “content” and “proposition”
differently, meaning intentional contents of thoughts or experiences, and
I shall resume that usage later.)
What about the cogito? In Kaplan’s semantics, the sentence “I exist”
is true whenever it is asserted, that is, in any context of utterance. If you
will, it is “analytically” true, true by virtue of the level of meaning called
“character,” and in that sense its utterance is “self-verifying.” That is: the
character of “I exist” specifies for any context of utterance the “singular
proposition” consisting of the individual uttering the sentence in that
context and the property of existence;23 and, whatever the context, that
“proposition” is true – since, by hypothesis, the context of utterance includes the speaker, who must exist in that context in order to perform
the utterance of the sentence “I exist.” Thus, Kaplan’s semantics underwrites a linguistic version of Descartes’s special cogito principle: “The sentence ‘I exist’ is necessarily [i.e., analytically] true whenever I pronounce
it.” However, the inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist” is not, in
Kaplan’s semantics, “necessarily true” in every context of utterance (semantically valid and sound) – unless it is assumed, say, that in every context the speaker is thinking and thinking entails existence, which begs the
question of the cogito. Nor does the semantics address that the speaker
is thinking and thinking entails existence, which begs the question of
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 61
the cogito. Nor does the semantics address the speaker’s certainty of
his or her existence in uttering “I exist” or “I am thinking, therefore
I exist”; indeed, Kaplan’s semantics per se sheds no light on the epistemological or phenomenological features of the cogito (nor was it
intended to).
Thus, we need a semantics formulated with an eye to phenomenology, to intentionality theory, to the “semantics” of thought. We need a
semantics that posits levels of meaning coordinate with the intentional
structures of thought, namely, the content and object of thought. Accordingly, let us sketch an intentional semantics (or pragmatics) distinguishing
four levels of meaning called character, sense, intension (or intention),
and extension.24 Take, again, the sentence “I am tall.” The (semantic or
pragmatic) character of the sentence – its rule of use – specifies for any
context of utterance its sense and its intension in that context. Its sense
in a given context is the proposition expressed in that context, namely
the thought content “I am tall.” Its intension (or intention) in the given
context is the state of affairs asserted (or “intended”) in that context,
namely the singular state of affairs consisting of the referent of “I” in that
context and the property of being tall. Its extension in that context is its
truth value in that context. And it is true in a given context of utterance
if and only if the state of affairs asserted by uttering it in that context is
actual: so its character determines its truth conditions. Thus, the proposition expressed by saying “I am tall” (the sense) would be the content
of the speaker’s thinking “I am tall” on that occasion, while the state of
affairs asserted (the intension) would be the object of the speaker’s so
thinking.
Of course, the meaning of “I am tall” depends on the meaning of
“I,” that is, its character, sense, intension, and extension. The character
of “I” specifies for each context of utterance the sense and intension of
“I” in that context: in any context of utterance, “I” expresses the sense
“I,” which embodies the mode of presentation “I” (more on that shortly),
and “I” refers to (or “intends”) the person uttering “I” in that context,
who is thus the intension of “I” in that context. And the extension of
“I” in that context is (also) the referent in that context. Contra Kaplan,
in this intentional semantics, “I” refers “directly” not because it has no
“sense” and is fixed by context, but because its reference is geared to
the speaker’s “direct” awareness of him- or herself in speaking – that is,
because in any context of utterance, “I” expresses the sense “I,” which
embodies the “direct” awareness one has of oneself in thinking or in
acting volitionally, namely in speaking, and accordingly “I” refers to the
62 Mind World
speaker, who is the object of this“direct” awareness of herself in speaking.
It might be proposed, with Frege, that “I” expresses different senses or
modes of presentation on different occasions. That proposal becomes
implausible, however, when we look closely at the mode of awareness one
normally has of oneself in thinking or, indeed, speaking.25 Or it might be
proposed, with inspiration from Wittgenstein perhaps, that“I”is not used
to express any mode of self-presentation, or even to refer to oneself. This
implausible idea loses its clout as we look not only at the phenomenology
of self-awareness but at the remarks of Wittgenstein that prompted it.26
What of the cogito?
On this intentional semantics, the sentence “I exist”is analytically true –
that is, true in any context of utterance by virtue of its semantic character. (The details are the same as in Kaplan’s semantics, except there is
an additional level of meaning involved, namely the propositional sense,
or thought content, “I exist.” This sense is not idle, but its role emerges
properly in the cognate semantics of thinking “I exist,” as opposed to saying “I exist.”) However, this semantics does not in itself properly ground
the inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist.” To be sure, the semantics
might presuppose that in speaking one is thinking and therefore exists.
Specifically, it might be assumed in setting up the semantics that: (a) for
any sentence “p” and any context of utterance, the speaker uttering “p” is
also in that context thinking “p,” where the content of his so thinking –
the proposition “p” – is the sense expressed by his uttering “p” in that
context (in the way language expresses thought); and (b) that act of
thinking requires the existence of its subject, who is the speaker and thus
the referent of “I” in that context. Whence, for any context of uttering
“I am thinking, therefore I exist,” “I am thinking” is true in that context
because the speaker is thinking “I am thinking,” and “I exist” is true in
that context because the referent of “I” is the speaker, who is assumed
to exist in that context. But what is the relation between the speaker’s so
thinking and his existence? That is the question of the cogito, and that
relation is not properly articulated among the system of semantical relations codified in the semantics itself. Rather, that relation is articulated
in the phenomenology, or “semantics,” of thought itself – to which we
now turn.
Hintikka suggested that the logic of speech acts should carry over to
the logic of thought acts. How might this go? Let us sketch a semantics (or
formal pragmatics) for acts of thought (as opposed to speech), formalizing
features of the intentionality of thought. We distinguish for each thought
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 63
type four levels of intentional structure (or meaning) for thought acts
of that type: their intentional character, content, object, and extension.
Take the thought type, thinking “I am tall.” The intentional character of this
thought type – if you will, its role or rule of use – specifies for each context
(or occasion) of so thinking the content and object (and hence extension) of the act of so thinking in that context. The content of this thought
act (its “sense”) is the proposition “I am tall”: we assume that thought
types are individuated by thought contents (they are one-to-one). The object of this thought act (its “intentional object” – if you will, its “intention”
or “intension”) is the state of affairs that consists in the subject of this
thought act having the property of being tall. And the extension of this
thought act is its truth value, where it is true if and only if its “intended”
state of affairs is actual.
Now, an act of thinking “I am tall” includes as a constituent a presentation of “I,” and correlatively the mode of presentation “I” is a constituent
of the thought type “I am tall.” The intentional character of the mode of
presentation “I” specifies for any context of presentation the content and
object (and extension) of the presentation of “I” in that context. The content of the presentation is the first-person mode of presentation “I,” the
object of the presentation is the subject who is having it, and the extension
of the presentation is (also) that subject. Importantly, we assume there
is an essentially indexical content “I,” whose intentional force – as specified by the cognate intentional character – is, where entertained in a
particular presentation in a given context, to prescribe the subject of the
presentation so entertaining it. This mode of presentation is precisely the
phenomenological character of the inner awareness one has of one’s own
experience, as appraised earlier. And in this mode of presentation one
is “directly” aware of oneself insofar as the content “I” directly indicates
the subject who is being presented: the content “I” in a presentation of
this type prescribes the subject of that presentation solely in virtue of the
subject’s “performing” that presentation.27
And the cogito?
According to this semantics of thought, the proposition “I exist” is
analytically (semantically or pragmatically) true: it is true whenever anyone
thinks it, by virtue of the intentional character of that thought type. For in
any context in which someone thinks “I exist,” the content “I” prescribes
the person who is so thinking and that person exists in that context, and
hence in that context “I exist” is true. Now, this pragmatic analyticity
is not the same thing as the indubitability Descartes sought (namely,
64 Mind World
the self-evidence of thinking itself, which comes with inner awareness).
But if in the act of consciously thinking “I exist” the subject intuitively
grasps the intentional (or logical) force of the content “I exist,” then in
that way the proposition “I exist” is indubitable for him in so thinking.
And that is what the special cogito principle proclaims. On this semantic
account, however, the indubitability of one’s existence in thinking “I exist”
comes not from one’s inner awareness of one’s so thinking but from one’s
semantic intuition of the intentional force of the proposition “I exist” in
one’s thinking it. The act of thinking “I exist” illustrates that force for the
subject, by performing it (pace Hintikka).
Furthermore, in any context in which someone thinks “p” (for any
proposition “p”), that person exists in that context, and hence the proposition “I exist” is true of her in that context; or, rather, it would be true
if she were thinking it in that context. In that sense the proposition “I
exist” is analytically true: in any context of thinking, it would be true if
thought in that context. Again, this pragmatic analyticity is not the indubitability Descartes sought for “I exist” (in the subject’s inner awareness
of her thinking “p”). However, insofar as the subject intuitively grasps the
intentional force of the content “I exist” while being aware of thinking
“p,” the proposition “I exist” is indubitable for her in thinking “p.” And
that is the claim of the general cogito principle. Again, on the present
semantic account, this certainty of one’s existence in thinking comes not
from one’s inner awareness of one’s thinking, but from one’s semantic intuition of the intentional force of the proposition “I exist” in the
context of one’s thinking. Similarly, the inferential proposition “I am
thinking, therefore I exist” is true in any context in which someone is
thinking (no matter what she is thinking), or would be true if the subject were thinking it (or performing the inference) in that context (as
opposed to, or in addition to, thinking what she is thinking in that context). And insofar as the subject intuitively grasps its intentional force,
it is indubitable – which is the claim of the general cogito inference
principle.
It should now be clear that we need to distinguish two sources of
evidence that might ground the cogito, and they are appropriate for
different cogito claims. On the one hand, there is the evidence in inner
awareness of thought; on the other hand, there is the evidence in one’s
semantic intuition of the intentional force of the proposition “I exist” or“I
am thinking, therefore I exist.” These two types of evidence give different
grounds for being unable to doubt one’s existence when thinking. Thus,
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 65
the evidence of inner awareness most relevantly grounds the following
form of the general cogito principle.
Whenever I am thinking, I am certain that I am so thinking and that
I exist.
The evidence of semantic intuition most relevantly grounds the following
form of the special cogito principle.
Whenever I am thinking “I exist,” the proposition “I exist” is indubitable (for me in so thinking).
By contrast, the general cogito inference principle holds:
The inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist” is indubitable (for me
in so performing it).
And this claim is most relevantly grounded in semantic intuition, although that semantic intuition is itself grounded in reflection on inner
awareness.
Thus, the semantics (or logic) of the cogito is grounded ultimately
in the phenomenology and epistemology of inner awareness: the verifi-
cation, hence certainty, of the proposition “I exist” – or “I am thinking,
therefore I exist” – occurs in the act of thinking the proposition and in
virtue of the evidence in one’s inner awareness of so thinking. However,
a different kind of evidence, hence certainty, comes with an act of reflection on thought and content, wherein one comes to “intuitively grasp”
the semantics of the propositions “I exist” and “I am thinking, therefore
I exist” – namely, their intentional character and thus their pragmatic
analyticity, or self-verifying character. Notice that we are dealing with a
second-order thought in the reflective, semantic judgment that the proposition “I exist” – or “I am thinking, therefore I exist” – is self-verifying (in
thinking the proposition).28 Not only is the evidence in the second-order
judgment (thought) different from that in the first-order thought, but the
content is different. Accordingly, the special cogito principle is properly
a principle about the proposition “I exist” (in Descartes’s slightly edited
words: the proposition “I exist” is necessarily true whenever I think it).
Whereas the general cogito principle is properly a principle about one’s
certainty of one’s thought and existence in thinking.
66 Mind World
The Ontology of the Cogito
What is the nature of the subject – the “I” or ego – that is revealed in
my inner awareness of my thinking? Am I a purely mental substance (as
Descartes argued in the second and sixth of the Meditations), or am I
a psycho-socio-physical human being (as we assume in everyday life)?
And what is the nature of my thinking itself which is revealed in inner
awareness? Is thinking a purely mental process, a mode of the attribute
of thought in a mental substance (as Descartes assumed in the second
of the Meditations)? Or is it a brain process, or a functional, perhaps
computational process executed in a brain? These are the traditional
issues of the mind-body problem, central to the ontology of the cogito.
We shall not resolve them here (surprise!); I would only point out that
these issues are undecided by the phenomenology, epistemology, and
logic or semantics of the cogito.
Inner awareness does not reveal the nature of thought or subject beyond what is specified in the form of inner awareness (as explicated earlier, “phenomenally in this experience I am thinking ‘p’”). In my awareness of my thinking “Descartes was smart,” it clearly seems to me (with
a certain type of evidence) that I am so thinking and that I exist in so
thinking. And it seems to me that my experience of thinking is just that,
an experience of so thinking, and that I am a being that so thinks. However,
it does not seem to me, in inner awareness, that my thinking is a brain
process. Nor does it seem to me in inner awareness that I am a neural
system in a human body – or, for that matter, a self defined by interaction
of the psychic structures called ego, superego, and id. Yet all this and
more may well be true of me and my thinking, so far as the evidence of
inner awareness attests. Indeed, it does not seem to me in inner awareness
that I am a purely mental substance. Only if Descartes was right in his
doctrine of “clear and distinct ideas” and its application to the ideas “I”
and “I am thinking,” only then does the evidence of inner awareness –
together with these doctrines – dictate that I am a purely mental substance
and my thinking a purely mental attribute (or mode) of that substance.
But all that Cartesian machinery outruns the force of the cogito as explicated here. Still, the question remains whether there is a substantial “I”
in the limited sense of an entity that does the thinking disclosed in inner
awareness.
When Descartes proclaimed the cogito inference indubitable, he was
accused of presupposing the existence of a substance that has the attribute of thinking (in various modes). Does the semantics of the cogito,
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 67
as detailed here, presuppose something similar? According to that semantics, the proposition “I exist” is analytically true, and the sentence
“I exist” self-verifying, just because the relevant context is defined as including a subject or speaker: in defining the semantical relationships, it
is simply presupposed that an utterance of “I exist” is performed by a
speaker, or an act of thinking “I exist” is performed by a subject. Again,
the inference “I am thinking, therefore I exist” is valid (and sound)
just insofar as the semantics presupposes an ontology of subject and
thought. So the phenomenology of inner awareness presents one with
a subject of experience (in the form of awareness “I am thinking ...”),
and the semantics of thought codifies that deliverance of phenomenology. But we need to ask whether the ontology so presupposed – a subject
for every thinking – is a matter of metaphysical as opposed to logicosemantic necessity. Diverse thinkers – Hume, Sartre, and early Husserl,
not to mention the Buddha – have held that there is no substantial
self, that there is only the unified stream of consciousness. Without
here evaluating these claims, I would observe that the ultimate nature
of the “I” outruns the phenomenology, epistemology, and semantics of
the cogito: the cogito principles explicated here can accommodate a variety of metaphysical theories about the ultimate nature of thought and
subject.
The cogito principles leave undecided not only the ontological type of
the “I” and the “I think” (mental, neural, or what have you), but also the
ontology of the relations between the thought or subject and the context,
or environment, of thinking – if you will, the ecology of thought. The environment includes the physical, social, and even linguistic environment;
the relations to environment are sometimes called contextual relations.
Tyler Burge has argued that thoughts (acts of thinking) are individuated,
in psychological type and content, partly by their contextual relations (including relations to language used to express them).29 Thought and content, he argues, are not “individualistic” – individuated by factors solely
within the bounds of the individual thinker – but rather “relational” and
especially social insofar as they are individuated by environment. Addressing Cartesian intuitions, he has allowed that we have access to our own
thoughts such that we cannot be wrong about what we are thinking and
yet we can fail to know how those thoughts are individuated in relation to
the environment. I believe there is something right and something wrong
about Burge’s arguments, as I have explained elsewhere.30 Suffice it to
say here that the phenomenology of the cogito leaves open a good deal of
the ontology, including the ecology, of thought.31 Thus, inner awareness
68 Mind World
reveals the phenomenological structure or content of an act of thinking but leaves open the ways in which the thought itself depends on its
environment – for instance, on how the subject’s perceptions are caused
(where thinking about something one sees), how the thought is produced
in the subject’s brain (or depends on what is produced therein), how the
subject’s culture and language developed so as to shape the content of
the thought, and so on.
The Cogito Postmodern
From our vantage approaching the new millennium, I submit, the cogito
resolves into a number of principles articulating, as detailed earlier:
1. The phenomenology of inner awareness of one’s experience and
of oneself.
2. The epistemology of the evidence of inner awareness and the
reflective-introspective judgments it warrants.
3. The logic/semantics/pragmatics of the relevant speech acts.
4. The cognate “semantics” of the relevant thought acts.
These principles leave open much of the ultimate ontology of thought
and subject.
These principles define (or refine) the Cartesian intuitions of the original cogito ergo sum. Yet their motivations are non-Cartesian (they are not
addressed to the particular epistemic and cultural problems of Descartes’s
day), and they do not entail the rationalist, foundationalist, or dualist
doctrines of Descartes’s wider philosophy. Thus, they define the postmodern cogito. (If they are not congenial to some who seek after “postmodernism,” so much the worse for “isms.”)
Notes
1. In The Philosophical Writings of Descartes, vols. I and II, trans. John Cottingham,
Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald Murdoch (Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press, 1984–85), hereafter cited as CSM I or II. In the margins of the CSM
volumes are page references to the standard edition of Descartes’s works: Oeuvres de Descartes, ed. Ch. Adam and P. Tannery, rev. ed. (Paris: Vrin/C.N.R.S.,
1964–76). Page references to CSM are followed, after a slash, by the page references to the AT edition. Most of the passages quoted here are also found
in the one-volume abridgment of the two CSM volumes: Descartes: Selected
Philosophical Writings, trans. John Cottingham, Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald
Murdoch(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1988).
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 69
2. Emotions belong in this list. In The Passions of the Soul (1649) (CSM I, pp. 325–
404/AT, pp. 323–488), Descartes classified thoughts as either “actions” or
“passions” of the soul (cf. p. 338/AT, p. 349), meaning active or passive
activities of the mind, and he went on to enumerate various mental activities
including many emotions.
3. In the Sixth Replies, Descartes explicitly extends one’s certainty to one’s thinking as well as one’s existence (CSM II, p. 285/AT, p. 422); the passage is
quoted and discussed here below. As Wilson (1978: 53ff.) presents the “naive
interpretation” of the cogito as inference, the indubitability of “I think” is “a
sort of datum.”
4. In fact, Descartes had a rich notion of intuition, connected with his doctrine
of “perceiving” clear and distinct ideas. Logical intuition might then be cast
either as an intuition of a complex idea, namely an inferential proposition,
or as an intuition of a temporal sequence of ideas had in entertaining a series
of propositions while performing a deduction. This form of intuition would
be different from the form of“perception” one has of one’s own experiences,
to be discussed later. In any event, a sufficiently general doctrine of intuition
would allow Descartes to assimilate the intuition that“I am thinking” and the
intuition that “I am thinking, therefore I exist.” I owe this observation about
the cogito to Clotilde Calabi, reflecting on the roles of attention and memory
in deduction as addressed by Descartes in Rules for the Direction of the Mind
(1628). In particular, see Rule Eleven (CSM I, p. 37/AT, p. 407), concerning
“intuiting a number of simple propositions... in a continuous... train of
thought,” and Rule Sixteen (CSM I, p. 66/AT, p. 454), concerning the use
of “concise symbols” so that “[i]t will be impossible for our memory to go
wrong.”
5. See Sartre 1966: introd., sec. III.
6. The content quotes around “p” in “I am thinking ‘p’” entail that expressions
in “p” occur in nonreferential or opaque position, citing contents rather than
objects of thought. The basic issues – concerning intentional acts de dicto and
de re and their attributions – are treated at length in Smith and McIntyre
1982: chaps. 1, 7, 8. Indexical expressions in “p” raise further issues, some of
which are indicated later.
7. See Smith 1989: chap. 2, or, for a shorter version of the analysis, Smith 1986.
I was delighted to find the very words “inner awareness of one’s thought and
existence” in Descartes’s own explication of the cogito – and disappointed
that my own awareness of those words in Descartes occurred after the publication of said book.
8. Curley 1978: 179. Curley does a marvelous job of tracing the notion of consciousness as awareness of thinking through Descartes’s exchanges with various critics. It is abundantly clear that this notion is explicit in Descartes’s
thinking, although he vacillates on whether the awareness we have of our
own thinking is a distinct act of reflecting on thinking, that is, a separate act
of introspection.
9. See Smith 1986, 1989.
10. About the phenomenal quality of an experience little can be said: it must be
shown rather than said. Or, better, it must be experienced, and so indicated
70 Mind World
from the first-person point of view (through a reflexive character), as opposed to described, for the hearer and hence indicated from the hearer’s
third-person, or other-person, point of view. This is why “qualia” have seemed
so mysterious in discussions in philosophy of mind: the attempt to theorize about them takes place in language, which tries to describe them in
“objective,” “theoretical” terms. Importantly, qualia are not restricted to
sensory “feels” in perceptual experiences. That restriction, typical in the
literature, is a hangover from the British empiricist days of “sense-data.”
On the contrary, every conscious experience – even thinking “I exist” –
has a characteristic phenomenal quality: in the quotably phenomenological
jargon of Nagel (1987), “what it is like” to have that type of experience,
a quality that is to be described from the “subjective,” first-person point
of view.
11. The temporal structure of experience – part of its phenomenological structure – was ably chronicled in Husserl’s famous analysis of the structure of
“internal time.” See Husserl 1966; Husserl’s views are reconstructed in Miller
1984.
12. Descartes sometimes treated inner awareness as distinct from introspection,
or reflective thought about thought, and sometimes he treated them as the
same, in part to avoid problems of infinite regress (if thinking requires thinking about thinking, a regress appears to ensue). The vacillation is clearly detailed in Curley 1978: 177–87. Such problems of regress are raised by Sartre,
for instance, and are detailed in Smith 1989: chap. 2.
13. See Husserl 1960/1931: §§9, 18. For a detailed reconstruction of Husserl’s
phenomenology of our consciousness of time and the temporal character of
our experience, see Miller 1984.
14. See Husserl 1960/1931: §§5–6.
15. See Ryle 1965. Ryle himself used terms other than “incorrigible.” Ryle aptly
distinguished the “awareness” that makes a mental state or activity conscious from the attentive act of “introspection.” According to Ryle’s gloss
of “the official doctrine” of Descartes and followers, both immediate awareness and introspection give one a “privileged access” to one’s own mental
states and operations, and both are “immune from illusion, confusion or
doubt” (p. 14). A careful critique of Ryle’s gloss of Descartes in regard to
incorrigibility is found in Curley 1978: 171ff. Suffice it to say that Descartes
was not a “Cartesian” as Ryle reconstructed Cartesian theory. Nor was
Husserl.
16. Cf. Husserl 1960/1931: §§9 and preceding.
17. Hintikka 1962a. The essay is reprinted in Sesonske and Fleming 1965: 50–
76. Page references in text are to this anthology. Hintikka’s essay is a carefully
crafted piece that repays line-by-line reading, even where one would differ
(as I shall). Further essays on the cogito as inference or performance are
found in Curley 1978 and Wilson 1978.
18. A detailed survey of the issues of free logics is Bencivenga 1986.
19. See Katz 1987. Katz raises a host of important issues about the boundaries
and relations between logic and language. I raise still others about the
boundaries and relations between logic, language or linguistic theory, and
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 71
phenomenology. However, I am pressing the phenomenological and logical,
or semantic/pragmatic, sides of the cogito inference.
20. In this century it has proved useful – extremely useful – for logic to focus on sentences, in formally defined languages, studying their structure
and interpretation and relations of inference or entailment between sentences. In earlier centuries, however, logic often focused on judgments,
and indeed Frege’s semantics took sentences to express “thoughts.” Today we need to extend the logic of sentences to a formally precise logic
of not only speech acts but also thought acts and other forms of intentional mental activity such as volitions and desires. Of course, we already
have many studies in the logic of sentences about such activities, but I am
calling for studies in the logic of these activities themselves. Such a logic
(or logics) would be part of phenomenology and cognitive science, suitably
defined.
21. The more relevant sources for my purposes here are Hintikka 1962b, 1975;
Montague 1972; and Kaplan 1977, 1979. Relations between the logic or
semantics of sentences ascribing intentional attitudes and the theory of the
intentionality of the attitudes are appraised in Smith and McIntyre 1982.
What are the boundaries of the disciplines we call logic, semantics, and
pragmatics? Hintikka’s appraisal of the cogito called for widening the boundaries of logic to include speech-act theory and even mental-act theory (thus
phenomenology). Katz’s (1987) appraisal of the cogito called for widening
the boundaries of logic to include semantics, in particular, the theory of
sense and entailment. Kaplan’s appraisal of indexical language widens the
boundaries of logic (along lines charted by Richard Montague and Dana
Scott) to include the context-sensitive language of indexicals. Logic had
already widened, with the logic-cum-semantics of modal expressions, to include formal semantics, especially possible-worlds semantics. Pragmatics is
traditionally defined as that part of linguistic theory that concerns the use
of language, including the influence of the context of use. Kaplan’s and
Montague’s systems carry the bounds of logic through formal semantics into
formal pragmatics. Let us count as part of the logic of the cogito all the issues
indicated, broadening logic to include relevant issues of the form, meaning,
and use of language (normally assigned to the domains of syntax, semantics,
and pragmatics) and parallel issues of the form, content, and performance of
mental activities (normally assigned to phenomenology and epistemology).
If it seems strange today to think of logic as concerning mental activities, we
need only recall that inference is a movement in thought as well as language,
and in earlier centuries logic was primarily concerned with judgments rather
than sentences. Today, after a long and fruitful semantic ascent to the realm
of sentences and their“logic,” we can begin to return to the realm of thought
or judgments and their“logic.” Here I speak of the “semantics” of the cogito –
in language or in thought – because the issues addressed concern the meaning of the sentence “I exist” as used in a speech act or the proposition
“I exist” as used in a mental act. If you will, we are here addressing issues of pragmatics that fall within semantics, although other aspects of use
may not.
72 Mind World
22. As is well known, Russell’s semantics posited only one level of meaning, while
Frege’s semantics posited the two levels of sense and referent. Take the simple
sentence “I am tall.”In Russell’s system:“I” means (or refers to) the individual
a who utters it, “tall” means the property of being tall, and “I am tall” means
the fact or “proposition” that a is tall – in effect, the state of affairs consisting
of the individual a and the property of being tall joined by instantiation. By
contrast, Frege’s semantics posited two levels of meaning: the “sense” and the
“referent” of an expression are distinct, the sense determines the referent,
and the sense embodies the “mode of presentation” of the referent. Thus,
in Frege’s system: “I” expresses a sense that determines the individual a who
utters it, “tall” expresses a predicative sense that determines the “concept”
(in effect, the property) of being tall, and “I am tall” expresses the “thought”
that is formed by combining the sense of“I” and the sense of“tall” and which
determines the truth-value True (as opposed to the state of affairs that a is
tall). For Frege, the indexical “I” expresses on each occasion of utterance an
appropriate descriptive sense (e.g., that of “the tallest Irvine philosopher”)
that determines the individual who utters “I” on that occasion. We cannot
here go into the many questions raised in the interpretation of Frege’s and
Russell’s systems, but the preceding gloss can serve as a foil for Kaplan’s
system.
23. Let us assume that existence is a property of individuals. There are, of course,
many problematic features of existence. Is it a bona fide property, or a different category altogether, as suggested by Kant’s dictum, “Existence is not a
predicate”? Is it a property of properties rather than individuals, `a la Frege?
Is it paralleled by the property of nonexistence, `a la Meinong? Is it an indexical property, namely, that of occurring in “this world,” a la David Lewis? Is it `
not a property (kind, quality, etc.), but a process, in our case – as Heidegger
stressed – the process of Being carried out by human beings? In order to
assess the cogito fully, we would ultimately have to develop an ontology of
the property of existence and its instantiation in thinkers and speakers. But
for our purposes here let us adopt a minimal assumption that existence is a
property of individuals.
24. An “intensional” logic is usually characterized as a system in which substitutivity of identity fails, for example, in contexts like “Necessarily ” or “s
believes that ,” and an “intensional” semantics is one which appeals to “intensional” entities, for example, properties or propositions (whatever the
latter are taken to be). The present “intentional” semantics invokes “intentional” contents of intentional activities like belief, thought, perception, or
intention. Cf. Smith 1981. The semantical scheme sketched here differs in
some ways from what I proposed there. (1) Here I make the character, or
rule of use, explicit as a level of meaning; there I left it implicit in the semantical system. (2) Here I use the term “proposition” for the sense (= content
of thought) expressed by a sentence; there I capitulated to Kaplan’s neoRussellian use of “singular proposition” for singular states of affairs, which
would be misleading in this essay, given Descartes’s use of “proposition” (in
translation in CSM), not to mention the wider phenomenological traditions
that differ from the Russellian use. (3) Here I sketch a parallel semantics
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 73
of thought; there I did not. (4) Here I skirt the use of “possible worlds” in
the semantics, which would take us too far afield from the Cartesian issues;
there I gave them an explicit place in the semantics.
25. The first-person mode of awareness “I” is studied in detail in Smith 1989:
chap. 2. Frege (1967) proposed that “I” expresses a different descriptive
sense on each occasion of utterance. Perry (1979) argued effectively against
Frege’s view. My account of the word “I” and the sense, content, or mode of
awareness “I” would join Perry’s suit against Frege’s claim.
26. Anscombe (1975) has argued, with inspiration from Wittgenstein, that “I” is
not a referring expression, from which one might infer that it does not serve
to express any mode of presentation of oneself. She argued basically that if“I”
refers, it must refer to a Cartesian mental substance, which is objectionable,
hence “I” is not a referring expression. Wittgenstein’s own remarks were
more subtle. Wittgenstein (1958: §410) said “I” is not the name of a person
(cf. §§398–428 on “I” and pain). In “The Blue Book” Wittgenstein (1965)
had argued, in more detail, that “I” is used in two ways: the use as object
in, for example, “I have grown six inches”; and the use as subject in, for
example, “I see so-and-so,” “I think it will rain,” “I have toothache,” and so
on (pp. 66–70). Wittgenstein referred explicitly to the cogito, writing:
We feel that in the cases in which “I” is used as subject, we don’t use it because we
recognize a particular person by his bodily characteristics; and this creates the illusion
that we use this word to refer to something bodiless, which, however, has its seat in
our body. In fact this seems to be the real ego, the one of which it was said, “Cogito,
ergo sum.” (p. 69)
More recent accounts of indexicals would grant that “I” is not used as a
name and does not rely on the speaker’s recognizing his bodily traits. A
cognate issue is the logic of sentences like “I believe that I have grown six
inches,” in which “I” is used once “as subject” and once again “as object.”
Castaneda ( ˜ 1966) stressed the special logic of “he himself” in “John believes
that he himself is a Wittgensteinian,” which ascribes a belief the subject would
report by saying, “I am a Wittgensteinian.” Perry (1979) followed Castaneda ˜
in arguing the irreducibility of indexicals. Although the issues are complex
and would take us far afield, I believe Wittgenstein’s remarks on the uses of“I”
are not inconsonant with an account of “I” geared to the phenomenology of
self-awareness: see the account sketched in the text, and consider a thought
whose phenomenological structure is articulated by “Consciously I now am
thinking that I have grown six inches,” which involves awareness of oneself as
subject (“I am thinking...”) and as object (“I have grown...”). The reader
who thinks Wittgenstein is wholeheartedly antiphenomenological should
study Hintikka and Hintikka 1986.
27. Again, this mode of presentation “I” is studied in Smith 1989: chap. 2. To be
exact, the distinction is there drawn between being presented oneself as in
thinking “I am tall” and being aware of oneself in inner awareness proper,
as “In this very experience I am thinking ‘Kareem is tall.’”
28. The term “second-order” is used in different ways. Thoughts about thoughts
are called second-order thoughts, propositions (= thought contents) about
74 Mind World
propositions are called second-order propositions, and quantifiers (linguistic
items) are called second-order quantifiers if they range over propositions,
whence sentences about propositions might be called second-order if they
involve second-order quantifiers.
29. Cf. Burge 1979. Burge (1988) later seeks to accommodate some Cartesian
intuitions.
30. See Smith 1990.
31. This “leaving-open” is precisely the role of what Husserl called the “horizon”
of an experience. Cf. Husserl 1960/1931: §§18–20 and Smith and McIntyre
1982: chap. 2.
References
Anscombe, G. E. M. 1975. “The First Person.” In S. Guttenplan, ed., Mind and
Language, pp. 45–65. Oxford: Clarendon Press.
Bencivenga, Ermanno. 1986. “Free Logics.” In D. Gabbay and F. Guenther, eds.,
Handbook of Philosophical Logic, 3:373–426. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Burge, Tyler. 1979.“Individualism and the Mental.”In Peter A. French, Theodore
E. Uehling, and Howard Wettstein, eds., Midwest Studies in Philosophy, IV:
Studies in Metaphysics, pp. 73–121. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota
Press.
1988.“Cartesian Error and the Objectivity of Knowledge.”In Robert H. Grimm
and Daniel E. Merrill, eds., Contents of Thought, pp. 62–76. Tucson: University
of Arizona Press.
Castaneda, Hector-Neri. ˜ 1966.“‘He’: A Study in the Logic of Self-Consciousness.”
Ratio 8: 130–57.
Curley, E. M. 1978. Descartes against the Skeptics. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press.
Descartes, Rene.´ 1984–85. The Philosophical Writings of Descartes. Vols. I and II.
Translated by John Cottingham, Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald Murdoch.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1988. Descartes: Selected Philosophical Writings. Translated by John Cottingham,
Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald Murdoch. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.
Frege, Gottlob. 1967. “The Thought: A Logical Inquiry.” In P. F. Strawson, ed.,
Philosophical Logic. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Hintikka, Jaakko. 1962a.“Cogito, Ergo Sum: Inference or Performance?” Philosophical Review 71: 3–32. Reprinted in Alexander Sesonske and Noel Fleming, eds.,
Meta-Meditations: Studies in Descartes, pp. 50–76. Belmont, Calif.: Wadsworth,
1965.
1962b. Knowledge and Belief. Ithaca: Cornell University Press.
1975. The Intentions of Intentionality. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Hintikka, Merrill B., and Jaakko Hintikka. 1986. Investigating Wittgenstein. Oxford:
Basil Blackwell.
Husserl, Edmund. 1960. Cartesian Meditations. Translated by Dorion Cairns. The
Hague: Martinus Nijhoff. German original, 1931.
The Cogito circa a.d. 2000 75
1966. The Phenomenology of Internal Time-Consciousness. Translated by James S.
Churchill. Bloomington: Indiana University Press. German original, from
lectures of 1905–10.
Kaplan, David. 1977. Demonstratives. University of California, Los Angeles. Typescript. Revised and updated version appeared as “The Logic of Demonstratives,” in Joseph Almog, John Perry, and Howard Wettstein, eds., Themes from
Kaplan. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1989.
1979. “On the Logic of Demonstratives.” Journal of Philosophical Logic 8:
81–98.
Katz, Jerrold J. 1987. Cogitations. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Miller, Izchak. 1984. Husserl, Perception and Temporal Awareness. Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press.
Montague, Richard. 1972. “Pragmatics and Intensional Logic.” In Donald
Davidson and Gilbert Harman, eds., Semantics of Natural Language.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Nagel, Thomas. 1987. The View from Nowhere. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Perry, John. 1979. “The Problem of the Essential Indexical.” Nous 103: 3–21.
Ryle, Gilbert. 1965. The Concept of Mind. New York: Barnes and Noble.
Sartre, Jean-Paul. 1966. Being and Nothingness. Translated by Hazel Barnes. New
York: Washington Square Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1981. “Indexical Sense and Reference.” Synthese 49:
101–27.
1986. “The Structure of (Self-)Consciousness.” Topoi 5(2): 149–56.
1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
1990. “Thoughts.” Philosophical Papers 19 (3): 163–89.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Wilson, Margaret Dauler. 1978. Descartes. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.
Wittgenstein, Ludwig. 1958. Philosophical Investigations. Translated by G. E. M.
Anscombe. New York: Macmillan.
1965. The Blue and Brown Books. New York: Harper Torchbooks.
3
Return to Consciousness
Abstract. What makes a mental state conscious, according to the classical
view (in Locke et al.), is a certain self-consciousness, or (as I prefer to put
it) an inner awareness of the state. What is the form of that inner awareness?
This is a difficult question, as we see by studying neoclassical models in
Brentano, Husserl, and others. In recent philosophy of mind it has been
proposed that this awareness of our experience consists in a higher-order
monitoring. Yet there are problems with all higher-order theories of consciousness, as Brentano well observed. Here I pursue and partly revise my
own earlier analysis of inner awareness as a “modal” character of mental
acts. On that analysis, inner awareness is an integral part of an act of consciousness; it is not a higher-order act of any type (such as observing one’s
current thought or perception). On a particular account, this inner awareness may itself be grounded in the temporal flow of consciousness (extending Husserl’s analysis of time consciousness). Yet, in the end, we should
allow that lower forms of consciousness do not include the form of inner
awareness typical of everyday human experience. Consciousness does not,
then, reduce to inner awareness; instead we need a systematic classification
of types and levels of consciousness, and we sketch the beginning of such a
classification.
Segue. In “The Cogito circa a.d. 2000” we appraised the core elements of
the Cartesian account of how consciousness is eo ipso a consciousness of its
object and an awareness of itself. Here we pursue the form of that inner
awareness, and we consider limitations on the classical view of consciousness as self-consciousness. This exploration is purely phenomenological
and focused indeed on the most “inner” aspect of conscious experience.
Later chapters, however, lead from phenomenology into ontology, expanding the horizons of our own consciousness.
I thank Amie Thomasson and Jason Ford for comments on the penultimate version of this
chapter.
76
Return to Consciousness 77
Some years ago (in The Circle of Acquaintance [1989] and, tersely, in “The
Structure of (Self-)Consciousness” [1986]), I proposed a model of the
phenomenological structure that makes a mental act or state conscious:
what I called an inner awareness of the act taken as a modal structure distinguished from any higher-order reflection or judgment or recollection or
perception of the original act. Since that time, consciousness has come
center stage in philosophy of mind cum cognitive science. Philosophy
has returned to consciousness, after the dark ages of behavioristic theory (from Skinner to Ryle to Dennett). And now I return to the story of
consciousness, seeking to refine a neoclassical analysis of consciousness.
Here I hope to deepen and widen – and, in some ways, revise – my
earlier modal analysis of inner awareness by contrasting it with alternative
views drawn from both phenomenology and cognitive science. The discussion addresses observations of blindsight and theories of higher-order
monitoring, in contemporary philosophy of mind allied with cognitive
science; the analysis of inner consciousness and time consciousness, in
Brentano’s psychology and Husserl’s phenomenology; and my own earlier account of modality in intentionality. Finally, we consider certain
limits on inner awareness.
In this way I hope to bring out the uniquely modal form of inner
awareness in consciousness.
Consciousness in Historical Contexts
The theory of consciousness, like most things modern, took root with
Descartes.
In his Meditations on First Philosophy (1641), in the Replies to Objections,
Descartes held that each thought includes a certain “internal thought”
(cognitione interna) of itself.1 This form of cognition is internal to the
original thought: it cannot be a second, reflective thought on pain of in-
finite regress (entailing thought of thought of . . .). (See my appraisal of
Descartes’s view in “The Cogito circa ad 2000” [1993], reprinted in Chapter 2.) The problem of how to understand this inner cognition, or inner
awareness, is the central motif in all that follows in the present essay.
Locke (1694) developed the conception of inner cognition much
more explicitly, in the following terms, which set the problem in a rich
phenomenological context:
[T]o find wherein personal identity consists, we must consider what Person stands
for; which, I think, is a thinking intelligent Being, that has reason and reflection,
78 Mind World
and can consider it self as it self, the same thinking thing in different times
and places; which it does only by that consciousness, which is inseparable from
thinking, and as it seems to me essential to it: It being impossible for any one
to perceive, without perceiving, that he does perceive. When we see, hear, smell,
taste, feel, meditate, or will any thing, we know that we do so. Thus it is always as to
our present Sensations and Perceptions: And by this every one is to himself, that
which he calls self. ... For since consciousness always accompanies thinking, and
’tis that, that makes every one to be, what he calls self; and thereby distinguishes
himself from all other thinking things, in this alone consists personal identity, i.e.,
the sameness of a rational Being: And as far as this consciousness can be extended
backwards to any past Action or Thought, so far reaches the Identity of that Person.
(1975/1694: 335)
Here in an early form are just the issues we shall be treating as we proceed,
not least as we turn to Brentano and Husserl.
Leibniz (1714) called inner cognition “apperception” or “consciousness,” implying a unique form of cognition: “[I]t is important to make
a distinction between perception, which is the internal state of a monad
[or mind] which represents external things, and apperception, which is
consciousness, or the reflective knowledge of that internal state.”2 Notice
that Leibniz calls this apperception “reflective knowledge” of the internal
state, and here is how he characterizes the mind:“Each monad [or mental
substance], together with its own body, makes up a living substance. ... A
living thing of this kind [with appropriate complexity of organs and feeling, memory, and reason] is called an animal, since its monad is called
a soul. And when that soul is at the level of reason, ... we count it as a
mind.”3 Leibniz’s words are eerily familiar today despite his seemingly
quaint notion of “monad.”4
In classical philosophy and psychology, however, the sharpest and
most detailed statement of the problem of consciousness as inner awareness is found in Franz Brentano’s Psychology from an Empirical Standpoint
(1874). And recall that Brentano was well versed in Aristotle, the medieval philosophers, the empiricists, Kant, and nineteenth-century psychology (English as well as German). Reviving the medieval notion of
intentio, Brentano put forth his famous thesis: every mental act contains
an object intentionally within it or (better) is directed toward an object
(pp. 88ff.). As we say today, every mental act isintentional. But Brentano adjoined to this thesis a second principle: every mental act also includes an
“inner consciousness” of itself (pp. 139ff. 160). Accordingly, Brentano
argued (in great detail) that every mental act is conscious and that each
act is a consciousness of its object and also of itself. Brentano struggled
valiantly to articulate this secondary inner consciousness as a dependent,
Return to Consciousness 79
inseparable part of the given act, and not a separate higher-order act
directed toward the act. Thus, “without any further complication and
multiplication of entities,” Brentano held (p. 154), my hearing a sound
is, in different respects, both a consciousness of the sound and a consciousness of the hearing. It has been argued accordingly (in Thomasson
2000) that Brentano’s position should be read and further developed as
a one-level theory, rather than a higher-order theory, of consciousness.
Here we have the modern problem of consciousness, which hovers with
us today: how to articulate such an inner awareness. We take a closer look
at Brentano’s analysis shortly.
Edmund Husserl extended his teacher Brentano’s analysis of
both intentionality and inner consciousness. In Logical Investigations
(1970/1900–1) Husserl drew (in fine detail for the first time) the fleet of
distinctions that characterize intentionality (Husserl introduced this term
of art): an act of consciousness, experienced or performed by a subject or
ego, is directed via a content or meaning toward an object (if such object
exists) – where the meaning characterizes the object “as experienced,”
resting on a background or “horizon” of associated meanings, variously
shaped by one’s culture and increasingly by the results of empirical science. But Husserl also held, like Brentano, that every act has not only
a primary intentionality but also a secondary intentionality: in the first form
of intentionality, the act is directed toward its object; in the second, toward itself. This secondary intentionality Husserl analyzed further, as we
consider later, in terms of one’s consciousness of the temporal flow of
experiences.
Recently, philosophers, psychologists, and neuroscientists working in
the tradition of cognitive science have rediscovered the classical range
of issues about consciousness, including issues about inner sense, apperception, or secondary intentionality gathered under the banner “higherorder monitoring.” A valuable and extensive compendium of writings in
this genre is the anthology The Nature of Consciousness (Block, Flanagan,
and Guzeldere ¨ 1997). It is important to stress that the problem of consciousness is phenomenological – a word, crystallized in the work of Husserl,
that appears with increasing frequency in recent philosophy of mind cum
cognitive science (as in Block et al.). Yet rarely is this citation of the phenomenological supported by either careful phenomenological analysis
or any reference whatsoever to the extant discipline of phenomenology, which has been a rich and going concern at least since Husserl’s
Logical Investigations of 1900, after the psychology of Brentano and also
William James (whose work Husserl had also read). Although James’s
80 Mind World
views are sometimes discussed and Brentano is occasionally cited, the rich
results of Brentano, Husserl, and subsequent phenomenologists are generally ignored (see Block et al.). An important exception is an emerging
European-American tradition that combines phenomenology with cognitive science, well represented in the substantial anthology Naturalizing
Phenomenology: Issues in Contemporary Phenomenology and Cognitive Science
(Petitot et al. 1999).5 Here I join in that spirit.
It should be tautological that consciousness is what makes the mindbody problem difficult. Yet it was not obvious as Thomas Nagel (1973)
laid out this challenge at the beginning of the cognitive-science revolution. Subsequently, John Searle (1992) has argued doggedly for the irreducibly subjective character of consciousness and its first-person ontology.
David Chalmers (1996) has argued in close detail that the phenomenal
character of consciousness is the “hard” problem for cognitive science
today. And Charles Siewert (1998) has argued carefully and at length for
a “first-person” approach to consciousness. Because phenomenology is
classically defined as the study of consciousness“as we experience it,”from
the first-person perspective, we need today to return to phenomenology
as its own discipline within the wider theory of consciousness that includes
much recent work in philosophy of mind and cognitive science.
But what makes consciousness the really hard problem for the theory of
mind is the problem of inner awareness. Without our own inner awareness of our passing experiences, we might plausibly identify mental states
with neural activities whose essence lies in physical properties of neurons
and their causal interactions with their physical environs. The character of inner awareness, however, calls out for analysis in its own terms.
We need to understand the form of inner awareness, which is not the
same as the form of its neural implementation, or its causal interactions,
or other functional properties of a mental state. And the formal analysis of inner awareness, amid other forms of consciousness, is a task of
phenomenology.
From Blindsight to Consciousness
The problem of consciousness has been brought to the fore dramatically
by the empirical observation of what is called “blindsight.” Indeed, the
phenomenon of blindsight puts the character of consciousness itself in
sharp relief, and we begin the present discussion there.6
Studied in cognitive science in recent years, blindsight is commonly
characterized as follows.7 Some people, having suffered damage to the
Return to Consciousness 81
visual cortex, say they see nothing but are able to answer questions about
objects placed before them. They often resist the questions, saying, “I
can’t see anything” but then go on to say correctly that the object before
them is, say, a vertical rather than horizontal line, or perhaps a book
rather than a frog. The subject in such experiments, we naturally observe,
sees the book before him or her but is not aware of seeing it. Her visual
state is one of blindsight: she sees, but her seeing is not conscious.
In the reported cases, blindsight is not very good at articulating what
is before the subject.8 Still, there is an important aspect of mental structure in the subject’s seeing (taking in information visually) without being
aware of seeing anything. Ideally, by extrapolation, we should note the
possibility in principle that for any conscious visual experience there is a
corresponding type of vision that lacks the character of consciousness but
is otherwise the same in structure. To be sure, we should be cautious in
basing theory on thought experiments that far outrun “real” possibilities.
And yet the ideal structure that distinguishes conscious from unconscious
vision is just what phenomenological analysis is after. At least on the classical Husserlian approach (in Logical Investigations), phenomenological
analysis is a kind of “logical” analysis of ideal mental types or “meaning”
structures in familiar forms of experience.9 So let us recognize a particular aspect of mental structure, the character of consciousness, which we
naturally ascribe with the adverb “consciously.”
In blindsight, then, one sees but does not consciously see. Accordingly,
we distinguish two forms of visual perception, whose intentional structure
(in a simple example) is ascribed as follows:
Consciously I see this frog.
Unconsciously I see this frog.
The first form of perception is conscious; it is conscious sight. The second
is not conscious; it is blindsight, or unconscious sight. The difference is
that the first has and the second lacks the character of consciousness:
the character “consciously” – to give it a name and a basic category to be
further examined.
What is this character of consciousness, this quality that makes a visual
state conscious? More generally, what is the character of consciously seeing
or thinking or wishing or willing: the character that makes a conscious
mental act (of whatever type) conscious?
First and foremost, the character of consciousness is a phenomenological form of a mental act: something we each experience in our own firstperson conscious experiences – and to which we give voice in first-person
82 Mind World
phenomenological descriptions like “Consciously I see this frog.” In fact,
it is only by experiencing conscious sight myself that I can project the
character of consciousness into your vision, namely, by empathy.10 And I
so gather that you and others also experience consciousness in conscious
vision. Now, in the blindsight experiment we make third-person claims
about another’s mental state, taking the other’s experience in conversing
with us to have consciousness but taking her perception to lack the character of consciousness. Here we practice “heterophenomenology,” analyzing another’s experience. By contrast, in classical phenomenology –
“autophenomenology” – we each analyze our own experience, from
the first-person perspective, and we assume others have similar forms
of experience.11 Here we see an interaction of method between phenomenology and cognitive science.
Because blindsight is so uncommon, the sentence “I see this frog” in
everyday English normally carries a presupposition of consciousness. Distinguishing conscious and unconscious sight, however, allows us to parse
off that presupposition for the purpose of our present analysis. We then
add the modifier “consciously” to ascribe the character of consciousness,
and we use “unconsciously” to mark the lack of that character.
So the phenomenological character“consciously”is, to begin with, the
property that distinguishes conscious sight from blindsight. Generally, it
is what makes a conscious mental state conscious.
According to the classical analysis, from Descartes and Locke to
Brentano and Husserl, consciousness essentially involves an “inner” cognition of one’s mental state. Classically, that form ofinner awareness defines
the character of consciousness and makes the state conscious. Indeed, on
that analysis, the difference between conscious vision and blindsight is
precisely the fact that in conscious vision one is aware that one is seeing,
whereas in blindsight one is not aware that one is seeing. The experimental observation of blindsight places in sharp relief this property of inner
awareness, which is otherwise so familiar that we lose sight of it. Having
brought it to salience, we go to work in further analysis.
I choose the term of art “inner awareness,” rather than “inner cognition” or “inner perception” or “introspection,” for reasons that will
unfold. Later we shall ask whether all states of consciousness essentially involve inner awareness, allowing that lower levels of consciousness do not.
But in the meantime we focus on the form of inner awareness where it is
present in familiar forms of consciousness.
Generally, we should allow that there are different types and degrees of consciousness. Freudian psychoanalysis distinguished among
Return to Consciousness 83
the dynamic unconscious (forced by repression), the merely static unconscious (not so forced, arguably with a different character), the preconscious (ideas or emotions awaiting prompting), the strictly conscious,
and even the verbalizable conscious.12 Leaving psychoanalysis to the side,
however, there seem to be degrees of consciousness even in human vision.
Our everyday experiences of clear and attentive vision include a standard
character of“full” consciousness, which arguably includes a form of inner
awareness. By contrast, the reported cases of blindsight lack this character.
In principle there are gradations of consciousness between these ideals
of fully conscious and quite unconscious vision. However, by focusing on
ideal cases of conscious and unconscious sight, those which have and lack
inner awareness, we turn our attention to the question of the proper analysis of such inner awareness – in paradigm cases where it characterizes
conscious visual experience.
The Form of Inner Awareness
What is the form of this inner awareness? That is the central question
before us. It is a phenomenological question.
Although we shall use the logical or grammatical form of phenomenological descriptions as a tool to express or articulate forms of experience,
it is the phenomenological – and ultimately ontological – form of the
experiences described that is our concern. This style of phenomenological analysis has been developed elsewhere in greater detail.13 I stress that
forms of language are not the issue at hand, even though we use words
to capture (however imperfectly) forms of mind. I interject this remark
because there has long been a tendency to conflate forms of language
with forms of world – and so, in philosophy of mind, first to conflate
intentionality with intensionality (the logic of our language about intentionality), and then to conflate intentionality with computationality
(the logic of computer simulations of intentionality, formulated in computer languages). (Perhaps that tendency even defines a certain narrow
conception of “analytic” philosophy, of philosophy as logical or linguistic analysis, sometimes assuming we never get beyond our language to
reality, mind, politics, or what have you.)
According to my own prior analysis of the structure of consciousness
(in Smith 1986, 1989), the form of inner awareness defines consciousness
per se, or makes a mental act or state conscious, in familiar forms of thinking, perceiving, desiring, willing. Following that analysis, we articulate
84 Mind World
the form of consciousness (staying with the simple example) in the phenomenological description:
Consciously I see this frog.
The character of consciousness, as assumed earlier, finds first-person phenomenological description here in the modifier “consciously.”
Importantly, on my analysis (1986, 1989), the character “consciously”
is not part of the mental act’s intentional relation to an object or its character of object presentation. That is, it is not part of the mode of presentation
of the object, embodying the content through which the act is directed
toward its object, the content “this frog” or perhaps “this poisonous red
tree frog.” Rather, “consciously” is part of the modality of presentation or
intentionality: the way the perceptual act is executed with its mode of
presentation and so its intentional relation to its object. The act’s modality (what Husserl called its “thetic character”) includes its act character
of seeing, as distinct from hearing, thinking, willing. The character “I
[see] ...” is a further character in the act’s modality, an egocentric character, its being directed from subject toward object. Now, on my proposal,
the character “consciously” is a further part of the act’s modality, modifying the act’s perceptual character so as to make it conscious. The significance of this claim will unfold along our way, distinguishing this modal
theory from alternative theories of consciousness.
In closer detail, my prior analysis factored the character “consciously”
into two characters ascribed as follows:
Phenomenally in this very experience I see this frog.
The character “phenomenally” embodies the phenomenal or qualitative
character of the experience, commonly now called its quale or (in plural detail) qualia. The character “in this very experience” embodies the
reflexive character of the experience, its self-reflexive character. The form
of inner awareness consists in this reflexive character modified by the
phenomenal character. Together they define the character“consciously,”
which modified the whole mental act. As we proceed we shall look more
closely at the reflexive character, contrasting it with various forms of highorder monitoring.
We schematize the form of the mental act in Figure 3.1, factoring its
overall intentional character into several intentional categories. The form
of inner awareness, on this analysis, is that of“in this very experience” modified by “phenomenally.” These characters together define the character
Return to Consciousness 85
INTENTIONAL CHARACTER
PHENOMENAL REFLEXIVE EGOCENTRIC
OBJECTACT-TYPE PRESENTATION
Phenomenally (in this very experience) (I) (see) (this frog)
MODALITY MODE
figure 3.1. The form of an act of consciousness.
“consciously,” on the present analysis, all within what I have called the
modality of intentionality or presentation as distinguished from the mode
of presentation. Let us be clear that inner awareness need not be infallible or incorrigible. Although Descartes sought demon-proof certainty in
the cogito, in my consciousness of my own thinking, we need not follow
him in that quest. (This I argued in “The Cogito circa ad 2000” [1993],
reprinted in Chapter 2.)
Of course, consciousness is present in many types of experience: in
seeing a frog, in thinking about Paris, in swinging a bat at a baseball, and
so on. Moreover, there are degrees and varieties of consciousness, issuing
in variations in the character “consciously.” If I am concentrating on this
frog and its movement, my perception is more vivid and more salient than
is my perception of a frog I am leaping over in a stream. Still less vivid
and salient in my experience are my passing feelings of annoyance at
my friend’s all-too-familiar mannerism. And psychiatry has long posited
feelings that are only vaguely conscious or even wholly unconscious and
repressed. For simplicity, and present purposes, let us stay with a familiar
case such as consciously seeing this frog or consciously thinking that this
frog will jump.
Inner Consciousness
The problem of inner awareness comes to maturity, we noted, in
Brentano’s account of what he called “inner consciousness” (inneren
Bewusstsein). (See 1995/1874: book 2, chaps. II and III.) Brentano’s
86 Mind World
critique of numerous arguments in prior psychology and philosophy
leads smoothly into the back-and-forth of today’s debates about the specifics of inner awareness (see Block et al. 1997; Siewert 1998; Thomasson
2000). Moreover, Brentano’s own positive account gives us a clear model
of what is at stake in the form of inner awareness – even if we reject all
the details of his theory.
Brentano distinguished mental phenomena – the domain of psychology – from physical phenomena in the following way:
Every mental phenomenon [or act] is characterized by ... the intentional (or
mental) inexistence of an object, and what we might call ...reference to a content, direction upon an object. ... Every mental phenomenon includes something
as object within itself, although they do not all do so in the same way. In presentation [Vorstellung] something is presented, in judgment something is affirmed or
denied, in love loved, in hate hated, in desire desired and so on.
This intentional in-existence is characteristic exclusively of mental phenomena. No physical phenomenon exhibits anything like it. We can, therefore, define
mental phenomena by saying that they are those phenomena which contain an
object intentionally within themselves. (1995/1874: 88–89)
In other words, every mental act is directed toward an object. But
Brentano’s conception of this directedness follows a theory – derived
from the Scholastics’ notion of intentio – that the object is intentionally
contained “in” the mental act itself. In this way he averted the distinction between content and object, which was pivotal in Husserl’s subsequent and much improved theory of intentionality. Brentano’s formal
analysis of mental acts distinguishes presentation, judgment, love, desire, and so on. For Brentano, we do not merely form a presentation of
an object; we also judge that the object exists or that it does not, and
we have feelings toward it, as in love or hate, whence we may desire it,
and so may will to do something with regard to it. Where presentation
presents an object (with certain properties), judgment affirms or denies
its existence, feeling (in love, hate, desire, etc.) colors it with emotion,
and will initiates action concerning it. Brentano’s successors (including
Husserl and Ludwig Wittgenstein) advanced the notion of state of affairs
(Sachverhalt), “that object A has property P” or “that A stands in relation
R to B,” whence Bertrand Russell put the logician’s eye on what he called
“propositional attitudes,” that is, intentional attitudes whose objects are
states of affairs.14 But Brentano, like Aristotle, focused on objects with
properties.
With this structure of directedness behind him, Brentano proceeded
to a lengthy study of “inner consciousness” (inneren Bewusstsein), tracing
Return to Consciousness 87
the notion to Aristotle’s view in De Anima that we perceive our sensations, without perceiving such perceptions, averting an infinite regress.
Brentano argued roughly as follows. We sometimes “perceive” our own
acts of consciousness. This inner perception cannot be “observation,” because observation requires full attention, but we usually cannot attend to
our own consciousness while going through it (as in feeling angry about
something). Nor can inner perception be a second “judgment” to the
effect that the act occurs; for if this judgment were itself to be perceived,
an infinite regress would ensue. Nor can inner perception be a recollection or memory, which again would lead into an infinite regress. Whether
simultaneous with the act or following it, neither a judgment (thought)
about it nor a recollection of it – much less a regress of thoughts or memories – is part of our experience. And, of course, inner perception is not
a kind of sensory perception; it does not consist in a presentation of a sensory object such as a color or a tone, but rather accompanies and is part
of such a presentation. Inner consciousness, then, seems for Brentano to
take a form unto itself. Brentano considered at length whether this inner
consciousness is present in all mental acts, making all mental acts conscious. He concluded that it is because the intensity of inner consciousness is the same as that of the act in which it occurs, say, in hearing a
tone. This is an odd claim (what is the “intensity” of the inner consciousness as distinct from the intensity of hearing of the tone?). Beneath it
seems to lie the presupposition that the inner consciousness is somehow
coextensive with the primary consciousness of the tone. The basic question, then, is what form this inner consciousness takes, if it is somehow
an inseparable part of the act. The details of Brentano’s account are
instructive.
After criticizing previous theories of the form of inner consciousness
(in a tour de force of psychological theories from Aristotle through
the English and German philosophers and psychologists of the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries), Brentano summarized his own positive
account:
Every mental act is conscious; it includes within it a consciousness of itself. Therefore, every mental act, no matter how simple, has a double object, a primary and
a secondary object. The simplest act, for example the act of hearing, has as its
primary object the sound, and for its secondary object, itself, the mental phenomenon in which the sound is heard. Consciousness of this secondary object is
threefold: it involves a presentation of it, a cognition of it and a feeling toward
it. Consequently, every mental act, even the simplest[,] has four different aspects
under which it may be considered. It may be considered as a presentation of its
88 Mind World
primary object, as when the act in which we perceive a sound is considered as an
act of hearing; however, it may also be considered as a presentation of itself, as a
cognition of itself, and as a feeling toward itself. In addition, in these four respects
combined, it is the object of its self-presentation, of its self-cognition, and (so to
speak) of its self-feeling. Thus, without any further complication and multiplication
of entities, not only is the self-presentation presented, the self-cognition is known
as well as presented, and the self-feeling is felt as well as known and presented.
(1995/1874: 153–54, emphasis added)
A lot of structure is subtly crafted into this analysis of inner consciousness.
Recognizing this type of structure guides our investigation, even if we
reject the specifics of Brentano’s analysis.
Consider an experience in which I hear the tone middle C played on
a Steinway piano. The structure of this act of consciousness might be
articulated in a phenomenological description something like this, if we
assume for the moment Brentano’s analysis of four distinct elements in
consciousness:
I am conscious in presentation
[1] (externally) of the object Middle C and
[2] (internally) with a feeling of delight in a judgment affirming existence of this consciousness of that object.
Thus, the act of consciousness is directed (externally) toward the primary
object, Middle C, and (internally) with feeling and with judgment toward
the secondary object, the act itself. Notice that the character of aural
sensation is absorbed into the object, the sound middle C (with the special
timber of a Steinway grand piano, as it happens). In this simple act of
hearing there is a presentation of middle C, and that is all there is to
the consciousness of middle C. However, in real life this simple act is
part of a more complex act in which I judge that the heard tone exists
(as Brentano prefers to say, I affirm its existence) and, further, I feel a
soaring delight in the affirmed heard tone. There may be a problem
lurking here, as to whether the feeling attaches to the object or the act
or both. The point to note, in any event, is that we need to articulate
the structure of this consciousness into several components. And the act
itself plays two roles: first, it is that which is directed externally toward
middle C; second, it is itself that toward which it is directed internally.
Thus, the act of consciousness includes a consciousness-of-itself “without
any ... further multiplication of entities,” that is, without a second act
directed toward the first.
Return to Consciousness 89
Strictly speaking, on Brentano’s analysis, the object of consciousness is
a complex, a “double object,” comprising as primary object (here) the tone
and as secondary object the act of consciousness itself. The act of consciousness consists in its directedness toward this complex object. Because the
act intentionally “contains”its object, the act intentionally contains itself –
in a specific way. That way is the way of inner consciousness.
Brentano’s analysis is awkward because he treats directedness as
“containing”-an-object. Suppose instead we treat it, as I prefer, as an intentional relation with different modes and modalities of presentation
defining “content.”15 Then the component characters of the act of hearing are distributed over the intentional relation in certain ways, and not
over the object of consciousness. We might then revise Brentano’s analysis
into a form closer to my own analysis as follows:
Consciously I
[1] (am aurally presented this middle C tone and
judge that it exists and feel that its Steinway resonance is delightful) and
[2] (am herein presented this very act of consciousness and
judge that it exists and feel that it is pleasurable).
Inner consciousness, in this neo-Brentanian analysis, consists in the
act’s reflexive directedness through the indexical content “this very act
of consciousness” in the position of internal presentation marked as
“herein presented.” The full character [1] of the consciousness of the
tone is indicated by this internal presentation of the act itself. But the full
character [2] of inner consciousness includes, for Brentano, not only
that presentation of the act but also the judgment and feeling about the
act – because inner awareness takes the act itself to exist and (in the
case described) to be pleasurable. And the full character of the act,
comprising [1] and [2], is indicated by “this very act of consciousness”
within [2]. (The problem remains of whether there is pleasure both in
the consciousness-of-the-tone [1] and in the consciousness-of-the-hearing
[2]. But that problem is not our present concern.)
What should we learn from Brentano’s study of inner consciousness?
The key lesson, I think, is this: by parsing consciousness into several features of intentional structure, Brentano has shown that inner consciousness may be built into the structure of consciousness itself, as he says,
“without any further complication or multiplication of entities.” He has
given us a model of how this might work, even if we reject the details of
90 Mind World
his analysis (as we shall see). With that model in mind, let us turn to more
recent efforts to analyze consciousness.
Higher-Order Monitoring
Today’s philosophy of mind – in the tradition of analytic philosophy since
the 1950s and of cognitive science since the 1970s – is rediscovering the issues of consciousness that so engaged Brentano, James, and Husserl. This
latest phase of consciousness theory is surveyed (sans phenomenology)
in the anthology The Nature of Consciousness (1997), edited by Ned Block,
Owen Flanagan, and Guven G ¨ uzeldere. Our purpose here is well served ¨
by the contrast of views gathered there in the section on “Higher-Order
Monitoring Conceptions of Consciousness” and overviewed by Guzeldere ¨
in the closing essay (pp. 789–806).
In these recent discussions, inner awareness (imposing the term I prefer) is analyzed as “higher-order monitoring”: the mind monitors its own
activity in a distinct higher-order state – where all this is realized in the
brain. This second state is higher-order because it is about the mental
state it monitors, the latter being of first order, that is, about something
other than a mental state. Two types of higher-order state have been
posited as doing the monitoring: higher-order perception and higherorder thought. Higher-order perception is like perception but directed
toward a given mental state rather than, say, a frog before one’s eyes.
Higher-order thought differs in that it is a propositional attitude of thinking about the given mental state rather than a kind of perception of the
state.
David Armstrong offered this characterization of higher-order
perception:
What is it that the long-distance truck driver lacks [when driving by skill without
“consciousness” of what he is doing]? I think it is an additional form of perception,
or, a little more cautiously, it is something that resembles perception. But unlike
sense-perception, it is not directed toward our current environment and/or our
current bodily state [proprioception]. It is perception of the mental. Such “inner”
perception is traditionally called introspection, or introspective awareness. (Block
et al., 1997: 724)
In the 1950s Armstrong, U. T. Place, and J. J. C. Smart launched today’s
materialist philosophy of mind with the identity theory, holding that a
mental state is identical with a brain state (token states, not state types).
It is natural on this model to suggest that the brain not only processes
Return to Consciousness 91
information about the environment, say, in seeing the road ahead, but
also processes information about its own states, say, the brain’s processing
the sensory information about the road. This higher-order brain process
is, then, what Armstrong proposes as defining consciousness, as when
the truck driver becomes aware of his driving: his brain now “perceives”
its state of seeing the road ahead. As the visual nervous system tracks
interactions of the eyes with light, and the tactile system tracks interactions of the skin with physical pressure, so another part of the nervous
system tracks neural interactions within the brain, which we experience
as introspective awareness.
Since the 1970s, with the rise of the computer model of mind, the
identity theory has given way to functionalism, holding that a mental
state type is a functional state of a brain – or, indeed, of a computational system realized in a physical system different from a brain. Inner
awareness would then be a type of higher-order information processing,
a function of monitoring another mind/brain/computer activity (which
has its own function). (See William G. Lycan in Block et al. 1997: 755–
71.) On this paradigm, what makes a physical state mental is the type of
causal interaction it mediates, as between a human nervous system and
its environment; and what makes a mental state conscious is this type of
higher-order monitoring of its own activity, a type of causal interaction
within its own neural states.
But our concern is phenomenological: what is the form of inner awareness on the higher-order perception model? (We are seeking not a logical
form of words, but a phenomenological form of mental states.) On the
inner-perception model, introspective awareness is a second-order intentional state, which is to say it is directed toward a first-order mental state.
And it is in some way like perception but it is not a sensory experience.
In an idiom closer to my own, we might describe such “inner perception”
as follows:
I now see that stretch of road ahead and (simultaneously)
I nowintrospectively observe that I am now having this very experience.
The content “this very experience” directs the introspective awareness
toward the visual experience it is monitoring, which lies in the immediate mental context of the introspection. In this respect the awareness
is like perception; it is a form of observation. But the character of the
introspective awareness is not seeing or hearing; the sensory character
belongs rather to the visual experience. What the truck driver lacks when
92 Mind World
driving along “unconsciously,” on this model, is this further observation
of his seeing the road ahead.
An alternative model distinguishes higher-order thought from higherorder perception, while remaining within the materialist theory of mind
(and presumably specifying the causal functionality of a mental state). In
this vein David M. Rosenthal argues, in discerning detail, for the view that
inner awareness (again imposing my term) is a form of thoughtrather than
perception (Block et al. 1997: 740ff.). Perception is too restrictive, even
inappropriate, for introspection, Rosenthal argues, because its objects
are restricted to what is sensible and has sensory qualities, whereas introspection ranges over all kinds of mental activity, with no such restrictions.
Thus, he writes:
We are conscious of something, on this [higher-order thought] model, when we
have a thought about it. So a mental state will be conscious if it is accompanied by
a thought about that state. The occurrence of such higher-order thought (HOT)
makes us conscious of the mental state; so the state we are consicous of is a
conscious state. Similarly, when no such HOT occurs, we are unaware of being
in the mental state in question, and the state is then not a conscious state. The
core of the theory, then, is that a mental state is a conscious state when, and only
when, it is accompanied by a suitable HOT. (Block et al. 1997: 741)
But what is the form of the higher-order “thought” that makes a mental
state conscious? It is not a sensory perception, describable in my idiom by
something like “I see this very experience” or “I see that this experience
occurs” (we do not sense-perceive mental states). It is instead a propositional
mental attitude. But what type of attitude is it (judgment, imagination,
etc.) and what form of proposition is its content? Rosenthal proposes:
The requisite content is that one is, oneself, in a particular mental state. If one
doubts or wonders whether one is in a particular mental state, or desires, hopes,
or suspects that one is, that plainly will not make the state a conscious state.
... Nor will one’s mental states be conscious if accompanied merely by a dispositional higher-order mental state. ... To be transitively [= intentionally] conscious of something, therefore, we must have a thought about it in a relatively
narrow sense: It must be an assertoric, occurrent propositional state. (p. 742)
Rosenthal’s account may be summarized, then, as follows (condensed
from pp. 741–43):
One’s mental state is conscious (intransitively), and thus may be conscious (transitively) of something, if and only if it is accompanied by an occurrent, assertoric
propositional attitude whose content is that one is, onself, in that particular state
and which is thereby conscious (transitively) of that state but not itself conscious
(intransitively).
Return to Consciousness 93
Let us articulate the higher-order thought model in terms closer to
my own. An assertoric, occurrent propositional state is a judgment – as opposed to a belief, which is dispositional, or a doubt, which is not assertoric,
or a perception, which is sensory. And the relevant content is indexical,
referring to “oneself” and to a particular mental state. In my idiom, the
form of higher-order thought that makes a mental state conscious, on
Rosenthal’s analysis, may be described as follows:
I now judge that I am now in this mental state.
Because this thought accompanies the mental state as it occurs, my overall
mental state may be described, in a simple case, as follows:
I now see this frog and (simultaneously) I now judge that I am now in
this mental state.
The underscored phrasing ascribes the form of higher-order thought
that makes the visual state itself conscious. The adverb “now” emphasizes
that the visual state and accompanying judgment about it are occurring
at the same, the present time. A mental state that is not conscious, then, is
not accompanied by such a higher-order thought. Its description would
be, say, “I now see this frog.”
Compare this analysis with a Brentanian analysis recast, in this case, as
follows:
Consciously I now see this frog and judge that I am now in this very
mental state.
The chief difference is that for Brentano there is only one mental state
and its structure includes a form of inner awareness, ascribed by the underscored phrasing, that is an integral part of that one mental state. The
form “in this very mental state” lies within the scope of both “judge” and
“consciously” (projecting the phenomenological form of the awareness
from the logical form of the description). By contrast, for Rosenthal there
are two mental states, where the second accompanies the first but is not
an integral part of the first. The “and”joins two mental acts on this model,
whereas on the Brentanian model the “and” joins two forms of directedness within one act – the one act is directed primarily toward its object
and secondarily toward itself.
Brentano himself, pressing for a more complete psychology, noted the
feeling that accompanies any mental state (on his hypothesis). Indeed,
this element must be addressed in a fully adequate analysis, but let us
simplify to focus on the form of the inner awareness and how it relates to
94 Mind World
the mental state it makes conscious. Then we note that Rosenthal joins
Brentano in holding that judgment is the type of attitude appropriate
to inner awareness. And, given recent logical theory, we can add the
indexical form of proposition as the content (there is more here than
meets the eye).16 Like Hume, Brentano rejected the self and so would
omit a form like “I am in ...” But there is a self (whatever the ontology,
I exist), and the indexical content “I” represents it. So let us allow, for
present purposes, the content “I am in ...” or “I now see this frog.”
What shall we make of these higher-order monitoring models of inner
awareness? It is indeed natural in the age of neuroscience and computer
science to say that the brain monitors itself in a kind of “perception” of
its own activity. And in the wake of modern logic it is natural to look for
both a form of judgment about the conscious act and an indexical form
of content that represents the act. Indeed, the indexical content “this
very mental state” invokes the respect in which higher-order “thought” is
already “higher-order perception”for Armstrong’s purposes (perception
is a form of indexical awareness).17 So if we follow out the two lines of
analysis drawn from Armstrong and Rosenthal, we find the basic analysis that we compared with an updated Brentanian account. But which
of these two broad views is preferable, the Brentanian model of inner
consciousness or the model of higher-order monitoring?
Inner Awareness without Higher-Order Monitoring
On the modal analysis I proposed originally (Smith 1986, 1989), inner
awareness is internal to a conscious state, as Brentano prescribed, but
does not involve higher-order monitoring (in judgment, perception, or
recollection); it takes a different form. The more recent discussions (in
Block et al. 1997) show what is at stake.
The problems facing the higher-order monitoring theory of consciousness were well detailed by Brentano and are addressed by Rosenthal in
his careful discussion. First, there is the threat of regress. The response
is to declare that only one level of higher-order judgment is needed: the
articulated form of judgment is what makes the mental state conscious,
and there is no further judgment about that judgment. I believe this
is an appropriate response within the higher-order monitoring model.
Second, there is the phenomenological observation that we do not experience a higher-order judgment (or inner perception) as distinct from the
state it is supposed to make conscious. There I think lies the real rub.
Rosenthal accepts this observation and even suggests (Block et al. 1997:
Return to Consciousness 95
742) that the theory predicts it. However, we must be more sensitive to
how we experience inner awareness.
Normally, we do not experience a second mental state of judging or
inwardly perceiving about our ongoing conscious state. Inner awareness
does not accompany a mental act as a second and second-order mental act.
Rather, inner awareness is experienced as an integral part of a conscious
experience: that is how we experience inner awareness. Brentano’s analysis
seeks to account for this fact of experience, while the theory of higherorder monitoring, whether thought or perception, does not capture this
phenomenological fact.
Rosenthal addresses this worry when he asks (p. 744), “Must the relationship between mental state and HOT [higher-order thought] be
closer than mere accompaniment? In particular, must we postulate a
causal connection between the two?” A causal link, he concludes rightly,
is too strong. However, the link we need is not causal; it is formal, a feature of phenomenological form. What is still missing in the higher-order
thought model considered here is a formal structure that places inner
awareness inside the mental state, rather than alongside it by accompaniment (“I see this frog and I judge that I see this frog”).
But the problem with higher-order monitoring is not only that it lies
in a second mental act we do not seem to experience; it is, if present,
strictly unconscious. In my essay (1986) I posed the rhetorical question:
how can an unconscious higher-order state make conscious a state it is
about? Addressing my question explicitly, Rosenthal answers:
A state of consciousness can be a conscious state, that is, a state one is conscious
of being in. Or it can be a mental state in virtue of which one is conscious of
something [= intentional]. Adapting our terminology, we can call these intransitive and transitive states of consciousness, respectively. For a mental state to be
conscious is for it to be a state one is conscious of being in. So a HOT [higherorder thought] can be a source of consciousness for the mental state it is about
because the HOT is a transitive state of consciousness; it does not also need to be
an intransitive state of consciousness. (Block et al. 1997: 743)
Rosenthal is right to distinguish a state’s being conscious from its being
conscious-of-something, or intentional. And, in the model at hand, he
is right to say it is the HOT’s being about the state that makes the state
conscious. And he is right in noting (pp. 743–44), for example, that one
may not be aware of hearing a conversation nearby until one’s name is
heard. But still my question remains, if I may recast it a bit differently:
how can an unconscious intentionality directed toward a second intentionality make the second one conscious? The HOT is not a consciousness,
96 Mind World
or conscious “intention,” of the given state, although it is an intention
of the state. But if it is the HOT that makes that mental state conscious,
then it ought to be somehow integrated into that consciousness. It ought
to be a proper part of the given conscious state and so itself somehow
conscious, something experienced in that mental state. Thus, we still have
not captured something Brentano was onto in his own account of “inner
consciousness.”
Fred Dretske approaches the problem at hand from a different direction. While working very much in the tradition of cognitive science,
Dretske rejects inner awareness as posited by higher-order monitoring
theories of consciousness:
What makes an internal state or process conscious is the role it plays in making one
(intransitively) conscious – normally, the role it plays in making one (transitively)
conscious of some thing or fact. An experience of x is conscious, not because one
is aware of the experience, or aware that one is having it, but because, being a
certain sort of representation, it makes one aware of the properties (of x) and
objects (x itself) of which it is a (sensory) representation. My visual experience of
a barn is conscious, not because I am introspectively aware of it (or introspectively
aware that I am having it), but because it (when brought about in the right way) makes
me aware of the barn. It enables me to perceive the barn. (Block et al. 1997: 785,
emphasis added)
We return later to the possibility that consciousness does not always require inner awareness of the experience. For now, however, I want to
extract from Dretske’s discussion a different claim, a quasi-Brentanian
claim about inner awareness. (Again, a state is “intransitively” conscious
if it is simply conscious, and “transitively” conscious if it is conscious of
something, or intentional.)
Dretske’s theory of mind, here in the background, draws on information theory, holding that a mental state of an organism is a state relating it to its causal history and specifically to its transmission of physical
“information.”18 In this vein, what makes a state mental is the form of
information-transmission it realizes, and then what makes a mental state
conscious is “the role it plays in making one (intransitively) conscious,”
namely, a role involving its causal reception of information from its environment. Overlaying this information-theoretic conception of mind,
however, is a claim about the phenomenology of consciousness. Dretske
holds (with Rosenthal) that consciousness comes in two forms: transitive
and intransitive consciousness. I may be conscious – and this may involve
my mental state’s role in relation to my environment – or I may be conscious of something, say, in perception or thought or anger. The former is
intransitive, the latter transitive. If you will: to be conscious is to be in a
Return to Consciousness 97
state of mind, often with a certain alertness, in which I am ready (say)
to perceive consciously this frog or to judge consciously that this frog is
about to jump.
On Dretske’s non-Brentanian view, then, I may be conscious without
performing any higher-order thought or perception about my mental
state, and I may be conscious of something, as in consciously seeing this
frog or consciously thinking it will jump, without any higher-order introspective awareness of my mental state. What makes my mental state
conscious, on this view, is something else. Dretske recurs to itsrole (vis-`a-vis
environment) in making the state, well, conscious (and so ready for
appropriate causal interactions with its environment). But we must distinguish causal role from phenomenological form. Then Dretske’s contention boils down to the claim that what makes a mental state conscious
is a feature more basic than that of inner awareness of the state. Whatever
the causal role of consciousness, and given that role, its form qua conscious is different from that of transitivity, or intentionality: different, in
particular, from any awareness of the conscious state. At least some conscious states, arguably, are conscious by virtue of this more basic feature.
Fair enough. Still, we should make room in our phenomenological inventory for forms of consciousness that do involve inner awareness, even
if other (perhaps lower-level) forms of consciousness do not. (We return
to this point later.)
Our task, remember, is to analyze the form of inner awareness, the
phenomenological form of the awareness that, by hypothesis, makes a mental
state conscious, a form we experience in living through a conscious mental
state.
Returning to our updated Brentanian model, we can now pose
a question about the phenomenological form ascribed in Brentano’s
analysis – the form (in our idiom):
Consciously I now see this frog and judge that I am now in this very
mental state.
Why isn’t the basic form of consciousness simply the form “consciously”?
Why is an awareness of the state in a judgment that “I am in this very
state” required to make the state conscious? Whether the second-order
judgment merely accompanies the state (as in Rosenthal’s analysis) or
is bound into it structurally (as in Brentano’s analysis), why is an act of
judgment required to make the state conscious?19
Do we experience simply a character of consciousness, or do we experience consciousness embracing inner awareness within it? Brentano
bound inner consciousness into consciousness of an object, as indicated
98 Mind World
in the neo-Brentanian analysis earlier. Brentano’s intuition seems right,
but the form of judgment seems wrong, even when bound into the complex form given previously.
Jean-Paul Sartre described consciousness as“translucent”: I see through
my consciousness, which is a consciousness of its object. Consciousness
is at once a conscious experience of some object: it is “for itself,” a prereflective “consciousness (of) itself,” while being a consciousness of its
object. This “consciousness (of) consciousness of something,” Sartre
says, is constitutive of consciousness, but it is not an additional consciousness. (See Sartre’s doctrine of the prereflective cogito in the introduction to Being and Nothingness, 1943.) Sartre’s description is suggestive
and echoes Brentano’s doctrine without adding an element of judgment. Still, his device of parentheses around “of” marks a distinction
but does not adequately articulate the form of this “consciousness (of)
consciousness.”
As an alternative metaphor, instead of saying consciousness is “seeing”
its object “through” itself, we might say consciousness is “hearing” its object “in” itself: in a medium that includes act and object in one movement.
Hearing places me within the object of consciousness and within the experience, as the sound surrounds me, envelops me, flows through me – I
am not looking at it from a distance. Nodding toward physics, we might
say consciousness occurs in a “field” that ties act and object together so
that the act feels itself in feeling its object.
Such metaphors seem to me on the right track, and they have their
place in phenomenological description, rather like impressionist painting. What we need, accordingly, is an articulate model that places inner
awareness within the consciousness of the object, without making it a
separately focused higher-order cognition of that consciousness.
Inner Awareness as a Modal Character
We can now better interpret the modal analysis of inner awareness (which
may seem rather cryptic in my 1986 and 1989 accounts). On that model,
the form of a conscious experience is (staying with the old example):
Consciously I now see this frog.
It is important to factor the phenomenological structure of an experience
so that “consciously” is articulated as a character distinct in form from
the intentional character of presenting (say) “this frog.” In order to mark
Return to Consciousness 99
out the formal role of this character “consciously,” we need to develop a
phenomenological distinction drawn sharply by Husserl.
Husserl distinguished two basic components in the “content” or phenomenological structure of act of consciousness.20 In our simple case of
seeing a frog, the “content” of the experience divides into the “thetic”
or “positing” character of seeing (as opposed to judging, wishing, etc.)
and the “sense” (Sinn) of the object, embodied in its presentation as “this
frog.” Similarly, Searle distinguishes the “psychological mode” from the
“propositional content,”21 say, in seeing that this frog is jumping. In the
terminology I settled on (1989), the mode of presentation in a mental act
carries the sense of the object (“this frog” or whatever), whereas the modality of presentation in the act carries the mental act type (“see” or “judge”
or whatever). However, there are further qualifications in an act’s thetic
character or modality. I can see clearly or dimly; I can listen attentively or
inattentively; I can desire passionately or casually; I can think quickly or
slowly; and so on. On the modal analysis of consciousness, accordingly,
a specific thetic or modal character “consciously” further qualifies the
character of vision (or judgment or desire, etc.). The point I am pressing
right now is that, within the formal structure of a mental act, the character “consciously” should be placed in the modality of presentation and
not in the mode of presentation. The character of consciousness per se is
then distinguished from the object-directedness of a consciousness. (By
the way, observing this distinction in phenomenological structure helps
us avoid any tendency to collapse the character “consciously” into another form of “consciousness-of-x”22 in some higher-order cognition: the
“of”-ness in the act lies elsewhere.)
In my modal model of inner awareness (as recounted earlier), the
form “consciously” was factored into two components indicated in the
phenomenological description:
Phenomenally in this very experience I now see this frog.
Here we find a way of articulating the form of consciousness that embraces inner awareness without pressing it into the mold of a separate
judgment or inner perception, the mold of higher-order monitoring.
Let me explain.
The form “phenomenally” covers what philosophers call the “raw feel”
of an experience, its subjective quality, “what it is like” to have the experience, the way it is experienced or lived through. Here lie the sensory
qualia in a perceptual experience. However, emotions also have their
own peculiar qualia or subjective character: note the difference between
100 Mind World
feeling joyful and feeling sad. But qualia do not end with sensation and
emotion. Conscious thinking “feels” a certain way. And so does conscious
intention or volition. So every conscious mental act or state, we should
recognize, has its phenomenal character. (Of course, this use of “feels” is
not tied to emotional “feeling.”)
Now, there is nothing in the phenomenal character of an experience that articulates an inner awareness of the act as such. My proposal
is that there is a further reflexive character, the character “in this very
experience” – or“herein” – that articulates awareness of the experience itself. But there is nothing in this reflexivity that articulates phenomenality;
a mental act could intimate itself reflexively without yet being phenomenal. These two characters are interwoven in consciousness, in inner
awareness, on the model at hand. Here lies inner awareness, in the form
“phenomenally in this very experience.”
The character “phenomenally” modifies the form of the whole mental
act. And within the scope of that character, the form “in this very experience” – or “herein” – reflexively indicates or intimates the act itself. But
nowhere in this structure is there the form of separately observing or
judging that the act is occurring, or that I am in that mental state. Thus,
within the overall form of the conscious experience there is a form of
inner awareness of the act, in this reflexive character. Shall we call this
a “secondary intentionality,” with Brentano? That would be misleading,
because it is not a part of the act’s directedness toward its object; nor is
the object of consciousness itself a complex including (here) the frog
and the act. “In this very experience” is not a separate mental act, nor a
component act. Rather, it is a character of the act, of the way the act is
executed.23
The reflexive character “in this very experience” is modified by (falls
within the scope of) the phenomenal character “phenomenally.” In that
way the inner awareness of the act is itself conscious and experienced or
“felt”in living through the act. So inner awareness is neither unconscious
nor a further act accompanying the given act.
On this modal analysis, then, the form “this frog” is part of the mode
of presentation of the act’s object, prescribing the object intended, while
the form “see” is part of the modality of presentation or intentionality in
the act. The character “consciously” is a further part of the modality of
presentation or intentionality. And so the inner awareness articulated by
the form “in this very experience”is part of the modality of intentionality:
part of what makes the act conscious, within the character “consciously.”
Yet“this very experience” does not occur in any form of judgment holding
Return to Consciousness 101
that I am having “this very experience,” whether a separate judgment
(Rosenthal) or an internal judgment (Brentano). Nor does it occur in
any other form of higher-order monitoring.
In short, we have here an analysis of phenomenological form that resonates with Brentano’s view of inner consciousness but avoids the problematic features of higher-order monitoring, including Brentano’s own
version of an internal higher-order judgment.
Temporal Inner Awareness
In lectures published as On the Phenomenology of the Consciousness of Internal Time [inneren Zeitbewusstsein] (1991/1893–1917), 24 Husserl developed a quasi-mathematical analysis of our consciousness of the “inner”
passage of time. According to Husserl, our “inner consciousness” of our
passing experience – what I am calling inner awareness – automatically
falls out of the structure of our consciousness of time: our temporally
flowing consciousness of temporally flowing events both external and
internal to our consciousness. Husserl’s analysis of time consciousness
seems to imply, then, that inner awareness in our sense can be analyzed
more closely in terms of the temporal structure of consciousness. Let us
explore this temporal model of inner awareness in light of our preceding
considerations.
So long as we are conscious, we experience a temporal flow of sensation, a continuous flow of sensory awarenesses in visual, auditory, tactile,
and kinesthetic perception, along with taste and smell. Consider a simple experience of hearing a melody, say, “Yankee Doodle.” Each phase of
this conscious process is complex. For at one moment I hear one present
tone as part of that familiar melody, both retaining the sound of certain
past tones and anticipating the sound of certain future tones to come.
On Husserl’s analysis, the structure of my hearing this tone in “Yankee
Doodle” is a fusion of: (1) hearing this present tone (E above middle C),
(2) retaining some past tones (C, C, D), and (3) anticipating some future
tones (C, E, D). The whole experience includes as concurrent parts my
current hearing of E, the sequence of my “retentions” of past tones just
heard, and the sequence of my “protentions” (Husserl’s neologism) of
future tones about to be heard, if we assume the melody continues. And
there are mutual dependencies among these phenomena: my hearing E
in “Yankee Doodle” depends on those retentions and protentions, and
vice versa. (Husserl’s ontology of dependent parts would come into play
here.) Retention is different from recollection or memory; retention is
102 Mind World
very short term and an integral part of perception, not a distinct act of
recollection. And protention is similarly an integral part of perception,
as distinct from expectation proper.
As former assistant to the mathematician Weierstrass and so attuned
to the infinitessimals of the calculus, Husserl treated the flow of auditory
consciousness as a continuum of point-sounds in a temporal curve presented in a corresponding continuum of point-hearings. A more realistic
account of hearing a melody divides the experience into discrete tone
hearings, each with its presented duration, volume, and thus rhythm.
Needless to say, a conductor’s hearing his symphony’s performance of a
Beethoven work is a very complex perception, and a technician mixing
the sound of a synthesizer in a recording studio is also hearing a highly
structured sound, one that appears with a mix of continuous phrasings.
Husserl’s analysis is thus greatly idealized, yet it remains instructive.
Now, according to Husserl, retention has a “double intentionality”:
each retention of a past tone includes both a retention of the sound
just heard and a retention of the just-past hearing of the sound – that
is, a primary and a secondary intentionality (thus applying Brentano’s
doctrine to retention). And each protention similarly includes an anticipation both of the sound and of the hearing of the sound. (Husserl
distinguished more clearly than Brentano the hearing, the sound, and
indeed the appearance of the sound.) So my experience in hearing E, the
fourth tone in “Yankee Doodle,” is a complex whole consisting of hearing the present tone while interdependently retaining past tones and past
hearings and anticipating future tones and future hearings.
From this complex phenomenological structure, we can carve out a
distinctively Husserlian analysis of inner awareness as temporal awareness,
a successor to Brentano’s effort at appraising “inner consciousness.” The
analysis I see runs as follows.
At the moment I hear E, I have no concurrent secondary intention
of my hearing E. My experience includes at that moment, according
to Husserl, a “primary impression” of E but no secondary intention of
that auditory presentation or hearing of E. Part of my experience of
hearing E, however, is the pattern of secondary retentions of past hearings and secondary anticipations of future hearings. On the Husserlian
analysis I am suggesting: my inner awareness of my experience of hearing that tone is constructed from this pattern of secondary retentions and
protentions. Interestingly, there is a “blind spot” (or “deaf spot”) in this
inner awareness, as my experience includes no current awareness of hearing E. Nonetheless, because this experience is itself part of an ongoing
Return to Consciousness 103
process of auditory consciousness, in the next moment there will occur
a secondary retention of the just-past hearing of E. And so it goes, the
flow of auditory consciousness, including as a dependent part a flow of
secondary awarenesses of the process of consciousness. According to this
Husserlian analysis, my inner awareness of my ongoing experience of
hearing “Yankee Doodle” played on this piano reduces to this ongoing
flow of secondary awarenesses.
Husserl struggled, in the time consciousness lectures (1991/1893–
1917), to articulate this inner consciousness of temporally flowing experience in a way that would avoid suggesting any form of higher-order
consciousness:
There is one, unique flow of consciousness in which both the unity of the tone
in immanent time and the unity of the flow of consciousness itself become constituted at once. As shocking (when not initially even absurd) as it may seem
to say that the flow of consciousness constitutes its own unity, it is nonetheless
the case that it does. ... Every “retention” possesses a double intentionality: one
serves for the constitution of the immanent object, of the tone. ... The other intentionality is constitutive of the unity of this primary memory [of the just sensed
tone] in the flow. (§39, 84)
And still more precisely: In its process of being continously adumbrated in the
flow, it [the retention] is continuous reproduction of the continuously preceding
phases. (p. 390, from a text amplifying the text of a preceding quotation)
Husserl finds his results here “scandalous” (in the words of his translator
John Brough, p. XIX), asking how “constitution”is possible (p. 390). The
scandal being that, on this analysis, temporal consciousness “constitutes”
both its object-in-time and itself-in-time.
In Husserl’s neo-Kantian idiom, consciousness is said to “constitute”
its object: not that it creates the object, but that it “intends” or presents
the object through a certain meaning.25 Here Husserl claims that consciousness also simultaneously “constitutes” itself, that is, its own unity in
time. And yet, later in the text, Husserl insists that this self-“constitution”
does not form a further act:
Every act is consciousness of something, but there is also consciousness of every
act. Every experience is “sensed,” is immanently “perceived” (inner consciousness), although naturally not posited, meant (to perceive here does not mean to
grasp something and to be turned towards it in an act of meaning). ...
This present, now-existing, enduring experience ... is already a “unity of inner consciousness,” of the consciousness of time; and this is precisely a perceptual consciousness. “Perceiving” here is nothing other than the time-constituting
consciousness with its phases of flowing retentions and protentions. Behind this
104 Mind World
perceiving there does not stand another perceiving, as if this flow itself were again
a unity in a flow. (Appendix XII, 130; substituting “inner” for “internal” in the
translation)
Husserl is explicitly responding here to the familiar threat of infinite
regress. Note that he insists on the term “perception” for “inner consciousness,” yet explicitly denies that it is what philosophers today call a
higher-order perception. The “scandal” is really the problem of locating
inner awareness within the unified experience while keeping it from looking like a higher-order“perception” of the experience that steps back and
separately “intends” the experience.
We need a more effective way of articulating the form of “inner consciousness”that Husserl is trying to describe. Along these Husserlian lines,
may I suggest, a phenomenological description of the whole experience
might look like this:
Phenomenally (I now hear this present tone E in “Yankee Doodle” and
[interdependently] retain (i) past tones... and (ii) my past hearings
thereof and [interdependently] anticipate (i) future tones... and (ii)
my future hearings thereof).
The character“phenomenally” distributes over the whole structure of the
experience, and then, in Brentanian fashion, the pattern of secondary
retentions and anticipations makes up my inner awareness of the whole
experience. Thus, in Husserl’s hands inner awareness resolves or decomposes into this pattern of retentions and protentions. Inner awareness
itself is thus reduced to temporal awareness of flowing consciousness.
This analysis is elegant. But is this temporal structure the proper form
of inner awareness as such? I think not, although inner awareness may
rightly be said to supervene on temporal awareness.
Inner Awareness Supervening on Temporal Awareness
When I see a frog, my experience includes a visual presentation of a froglike pattern of colors and shapes and textures. But the salient content in
my experience – the salient structure in the mode of presentation of the
object – is “this frog,” or “this red tree frog.” That content, we may say,
supervenes on the visual registration of details of color, shape, texture –
of the frog as presented. But the content “this red tree frog” does not
decompose semantically into a content specifying the pattern of colors,
shapes, and so on: that is the lesson of the failure of sense-datum theories
Return to Consciousness 105
of perception, and of careful phenomenological analysis. Similarly: when
I hear the melody “Yankee Doodle,” my inner awareness of my perception carries the content – part of the modality of presentation – “in this
very experience.” My inner awareness, bearing that content, supervenes
on my temporal awareness consisting in a pattern of retentions and protentions, but the content “in this very experience” does not decompose
semantically into a content specifying the pattern of retentions and protentions (like temporal sense data). Accordingly, the contents that define
respectively inner awareness and temporal awareness are distinct contents
with different phenomenological tasks.
The phenomenology of my experience of hearing “Yankee Doodle”
should then articulate separately both inner awareness and temporal
awareness. Along the lines we have been pursuing, I propose the following (rather cumbersome) phenomenological description:
Phenomenally in this very experience
(I now hear this present tone E in “Yankee Doodle”
and [interdependently] retain (i) past tones... and (ii) my past hearings thereof and [interdependently] anticipate (i) future tones... and
(ii) my future hearings thereof).
My inner awareness of my experience, in virtue of the modal character
“in this very experience,” spreads holistically over my temporally flowing
experience of hearing “Yankee Doodle” including the present tone E.
But the reflexive content “this very experience” indicates my experience
directly, without articulating the complexity of temporal awareness that
Husserl appraised. Accordingly, the form of inner awareness,“in this very
experience,” is distinguished from the form of temporal awareness in the
pattern of retentions and protentions. Yet the character “in this very experience” itself depends on the temporal awareness comprising retentions
and protentions. For, without that integral temporal awareness of the
ongoing experience, I could not (as Husserl says) “sense” the ongoing
experience, albeit simply as “this very experience.”
Whatever else we experience, we experience a temporally structured
flow of sensory perception along with thinking, imagining, wishing, willing, and the like. This flow of sensory experience (including kinesthesis
and bodily control) is a deep and basic current in our stream of consciousness, above which flow our various other intentional activities. And
that basic sensory flow, let us grant, has a structure very much like that
Husserl analyzed as temporal awareness. Supervening on that temporal
awareness, however, is a distinct formal feature of consciousness, which is
106 Mind World
inner awareness proper. There is the form of “inner consciousness” that
Brentano and Husserl sought to explicate.
That said, the whole experience – bearing the whole content articulated by our complex phenomenological description – is itself flowing
temporally, and its aspect of inner awareness is an integral part of the
temporally flowing experience. Thus, inner awareness is itself temporally
manifest, as the pattern of secondary retentions and protentions points
toward the temporal extent of the whole experience, of which inner
awareness is an integral part. To recognize inner awareness as part of
the modality of presentation, I would suggest, helps to dispel the sense
of mystery about the “self-constitution” of consciousness through “inner
time-consciousness.”26
Consciousness as Modality
When I spoke of the modality of presentation in an intentional act (1986,
1989), I alluded to a conception of intentionality as a form of modality.
In the 1960s Jaakko Hintikka analyzed the logic of sentences like “I believe that p” and “I see that p” as similar to the logic of “necessarily p”
or “it is necessary that p.” Where the traditional metaphysical notion of
modality covers necessity and possibility, Hintikka’s logic brought intentionality into a similar mold. The logical analogy frames the following
truth conditions:
“Necessarily p” is true in a world W if and only if “p” is true in all logically possible worlds logically alternative to W.
“a believes/sees that p” is true in a world W if and only if “p” is true in
all intentionally possible worlds intentionally alternative for a to W.
In Smith and McIntyre, Husserl and Intentionality (1982), this modal semantics was transformed into a modal model of intentionality per se (as
opposed to the interpretation of sentences ascribing intentional propositional attitudes). On that modal model, an act of thought or perception
is intentionally directed not simply toward an object in the actual world
but toward a variety of objects in appropriate situations or worlds defined
by the content (and “horizon”) of the act. That is, the act’s intentionality
consists in this pattern of directedness reaching into a variety of conceptually or intentionally possible situations (while based in a home world
W, normally the actual world).
Return to Consciousness 107
The modal analysis of consciousness begins with the logical form of
the phenomenological description “Consciously I see this frog” or, pace
Hintikka,
“(Consciously I see that) (this is a frog).”
Here the modifier “consciously” is parsed as an adverb within the modal
operator “I see that” and then factored further in
“((Phenomenally in this very experience) I see that) (this is a frog).”
So we use the logical form of the modal operator to articulate inner
awareness, along the lines explained previously. The assumption is that
this form of language articulates the form of experience we are after.
Accordingly, we call the phenomenological form “consciously” a modal
structure of intentionality.27
Looking at the possible-worlds explication of intentionality as modality, we can see a striking difference between the modal model of consciousness and higher-order monitoring models. On the latter, the act A
is itself the object toward which a certain higher-order act H is directed:
that is the relevant fact that makes A conscious. However, on the modal
model, there is only one act A – with no accompanying act H – and A is
directed only (in the case at hand) toward a situation involving a frog.
Thus, the content“this is a frog”in A directs my experience A in W toward
a situation S in a world W (intentionally possible and alternative for me
in A to W), where S consists in a certain object’s being a frog, namely, the
object visually before me in W.28 A’s intentionality consists in this pattern
of directedness toward frog situations in the alternative worlds. Now, the
content “consciously” in A plays a completely different role. It does not
resolve into the intentionality of a second act H (directed toward A in
its alternative worlds). Nor does it prescribe the object toward which A
is directed in a given alternative world (perhaps placing A alongside a
frog situation in a double object of A, as Brentano proposed). Rather,
the character “consciously” modifies, or modalizes, the presentation in
A (whose pattern of directedness is toward frog situations in alternative
worlds).
Assume that “consciously” resolves into “phenomenally in this very experience.” The higher-order content “this very experience” in A in W
reflexively indicates A in W. And A in W serves as an anchor for indexical
presentations such as A’s presentation of “this frog [actually now here
visually before me in this very experience].”29 But while the content “this
very experience” may be implicit in other forms of indexical awareness,
108 Mind World
including presentation of “this” or “this is a frog,” its role in A is not to
place A as part of the object of intentionality in A. Rather, its explicit presence in the modal character of A helps to define the character of inner
awareness in consciousness, according to the theory at hand. But this
role calls for further explication than we can provide within the familiar possible-worlds framework. The extensional analysis of intentionality
in terms of possible worlds is helpful in bringing out the pattern of directedness of a mental act but is not well suited to bringing out this
phenomenological character within the modality of presentation.
To develop the modal model of consciousness further, and so to add
warrant to the modal analysis of inner awareness, we would need to explore the ontology of modality along with that of intentionality. With that
discussion we would move from the phenomenology of consciousness –
our present concern – to its ontology.
Levels and Biases of Consciousness
It seems obvious that there are different levels of consciousness. Just
consider human consciousness as it varies from hunters, farmers, and
carpenters to mathematicians, musicians, and writers to Zen masters.
How does inner awareness distribute across such variations? Does the
form of inner awareness occur in all levels of consciousness?
If we place our own species in the variety of biological species on the
planet (let us not speculate here on extraterrestrial consciousness), it is
obvious that there are different levels of development of mental activity,
and such gradations ought to be found in consciousness itself. Surely then
the lowly snail has a low level of consciousness in its sentient response
to things it encounters: the rock is to climb, the leaf is to eat. Behaviorist and functionalist approaches to animal behavior would discourage us
from speculating on “what it is like” to be a snail. Rightly so, if the consciousness enthusiast were inclined to wonder what the snail is“thinking”
(reflectively?). Moreover, it would be inappropriate to speak of the “firstperson” perspective of a snail, because the snail is not a “person” (and
it will always be the “other”?). Still, the snail is somehow conscious of its
environment and its activity.
Ants and bees perform intricate tasks in a complex society of their
kin. Their specific movements and reactions are surely not founded in
reflection upon the challenges at hand. Biology, nature’s genetic engineer, controls most and probably all of their activity, and their“culture”is
entirely wired into their social activity in building and maintaining their
Return to Consciousness 109
colony. Yet some of their sentience and action surely involves, like the
snail, a low level of consciousness.
And then there are plants, which are said to respond to classical music,
without recognizing Mozart. Is their response to water, light, even sound
imbued with a strain of consciousness? Who knows?
Quite different, in any event, are paradigm human experiences of
consciously thinking, perceiving, desiring, intending. These are the cases
philosophers began with, notably and rightly, in the evolution of rationalism (Descartes), empiricism (Locke), the Enlightenment (Voltaire,
Jefferson), German idealism (Kant, Hegel), Austrian logically minded
phenomenology (Bolzano, Brentano, Husserl), and French existentialism (Sartre, Merleau-Ponty, Beauvoir) – times of high reflection in our
“modernist” era. Philosophy packed into these human forms of consciousness a high degree of self-consciousness. Psychoanalysis (Freud)
articulated still more complex types and levels and dynamics of selfconsciousness: distinguishing conscious, preconscious, unconscious, and
repressed mental states of belief, emotion, and motivation.
And so, surely, in the variety of human activity, we experience forms
of consciousness embracing inner awareness as analyzed previously: that
has been the theme of this chapter.
Still, we must not press every consciousness into the mold of “inner
consciousness,” as important as it is in certain higher activities of consciousness. For we also experience very basic modes of consciousness that
lack “self-consciousness.” Heidegger’s phenomenology featured our habitual everyday “comportment” (Verhalten, or “relating”), as in hammering a nail, and Heidegger resisted Husserl’s emphasis on “consciousness”
(Bewusstsein, or being known). Similarly, Armstrong stressed the mental
state of the “unconscious” truck driver ably driving down the highway.
Now, I think we should not abandon the word “consciousness” in these
cases, even if it came to us originally as a semitechnical term of modern
philosophy. Instead, we should articulate different levels of consciousness.
I am not unconscious when I am unselfconsciously hammering a nail, or
driving down the highway, or choosing to hit the tennis ball crosscourt
rather than down the line, or even when I am moving mentally to the
next step in writing a proof in a logic class, or intently phrasing the
next point in this essay. Nonetheless, in these experiences I am not particularly conscious of my mental activity, or of myself. Inner awareness
seems to be lacking in some of these states of mind, even if they are
conscious. Indeed, we should allow that some of our perfectly human
experiences are, as it were, low-level sensory and motor activities that are
110 Mind World
conscious but lack a proper form of inner awareness. To develop this point
calls for close phenomeno-psycho-neuro-logical analysis, perhaps seeking
corroboration of the phenomenology from studies of our brains and our
evolutionary biology: but let us make room for the point here.
On the view now emerging, inner awareness is an integral part of
higher levels of consciousness, realized in humans and perhaps other
animals, but it is not present in lower levels of consciousness in humans
and other animals. If so, we must distinguish forms of consciousness with
inner awareness from those lacking it. This distinction runs counter to
the traditional Cartesian-Lockean-Brentanian conception (which I have
followed in 1986, 1989). Yet it may be naturally parsed from my initial
analysis (redeployed earlier): lower levels of consciousness have the character “phenomenally” without the character “in this very experience,”
whereas these characters are both present (and fused) in inner awareness at higher levels of consciousness. The problem now is to explicate
appropriate levels of consciousness and to specify where inner awareness
occurs in various levels.30
Whatever the empirical facts of consciousness, in various forms of
life, we may distinguish certain formal features of consciousness that de-
fine four basic levels of consciousness. Thus, we propose the following
(partial) scheme of categories of consciousness in four levels:31
1. Sentient-Motor Activity.
2. Indexical Awareness.
3. Conceptual Intentionality.
4. Symbolic Intentionality.
The snail is engaged in sentient-motor activity, and so am I when I stub
my toe on a rock and instinctively pull it back. Sensory awareness and
purposeful bodily movement at this most basic level are conscious but
lack inner awareness. No doubt my sentient-motor activity at this level is
interlinked with far more complex mental activities than the snail’s, yet
both occur at this formal level of consciousness.
Indexical awareness begins with awareness of the distinctness between
“this” and “that”: between a state or entity “itself,” “this here entity” (“self”
without a sense of person), and an entity over against it,“that there entity.”
This second level of consciousness bears the protoform of intentionality,
the distinction between act and object. Here we find the most basic form
of inner awareness, carried in the consciousness of “that” object over
against and distinct from “this” act.
Return to Consciousness 111
Conceptual intentionality presents an object under a predicative concept, such as “frog” or “rock” or indeed “person.” My simple visual
consciousness of “this frog” involves elements of consciousness from the
first three levels: my experience is a visual sentient activity, it is an awareness of“this/that [entity]” (as distinct from “this very experience”), and it
is a conceptual intention or presentation of“[this] frog.”Indeed, the conceptual presentation depends on the indexical awareness, which depends
on the sentient activity. This level of consciousness assumes a conceptual
apprehension of space-time and the place of experiences and objects
in it.
Symbolic intentionality occurs when a consciousness involves symbolic
concepts (some of them indexical) that have a grammar or syntax in a
logical-linguistic symbol system, notably, a natural language like English
or Chinese. When I consciously think “Brentano launched the phenomenology of inner awareness,” my experience is laden with concepts
that belong to and are expressed only within a proper language, namely,
English – indeed, an ideolect of English philosophical discourse (following translation from German philosophical discourse). Again, when I consciously see “this Macintosh PowerBook G4 computer,” my consciousness
includes concepts that I could not have unless I were familiar with jargon
of today’s computer technology. The fourth-level symbolic consciousness
in my experience depends on third-level conceptual presentations of
shapes and colors and tools familiar in everyday human culture, and both
depend on second-level indexical awarenesses of “this silver box ... ,”
which in turn depends on first-level sentient visual consciousness.
Again, while we choose commonplace examples of these levels of consciousness, we are noting formal structures of consciousness, and the theory of these forms of consciousness is a formal theory that awaits empirical
application. All that we need claim here is that a simple case of human
visual consciousness, for example, can be factored along these lines into
different elements. Where exactly does inner awareness occur in these
levels of consciousness?
Where a mental activity is conscious, it has the character “consciously”
or “phenomenally.” This remains a primitive form of experience, and it
covers the mental structures in the four levels of consciousness distinguished here. Inner awareness enters the form of consciousness most
basically with indexical awareness of “this/that entity” as distinct from
“this act.” If we have a conception of “experiences,” as we do in everyday life, then the form “in this very experience” is indexical and
conceptual; this is the form we assumed in the analysis of our everyday
112 Mind World
awareness of our passing experience. And if one day we are able to discern
our own neural activity, somewhat as an expert winemaker discerns the
“cherry” and “chocolate” and “cassis” overtones in a Stags Leap appellation of California cabernet sauvignon, then inner awareness may include
a symbolic-conceptual content:“Phenomenally in this very neural activity
I see that poisonous red tree frog,” where the form of inner awareness
“in this very experience” is informed with the theoretical concepts of
neuroscience.
The four-level scheme of categories of consciousness helps to explain
some prominent criticisms of classical, broadly Cartesian philosophy of
mind – and to explain where they go wrong. (i) As noted earlier, Fred
Dretske has urged that consciousness is defined not by inner awareness
but by a certain (causal) role. This view finds its natural (and naturalistic)
place at low levels of consciousness, especially in sentient-motor activity.
Indeed, at that level we want to address the causal interaction of a conscious organism with its environment.32 Yet recognizing this level does
not in itself cut inner awareness out of other forms of consciousness, especially at higher levels. (ii) Following Kant, Wilfrid Sellars has argued
that perception cannot present “this” sensuous object without some sortal concept such as (in our example) “frog.” Third-level perceptual consciousness would indeed take such a form, as in seeing “this frog.” Yet
it does not follow that there cannot be a lower level of perceptual consciousness of “this,” where sortal concepts fail. When it is foggy, I may
see “that” ahead (whatever it be), with no sortal concept informing my
experience.33 (iii) Drawing on Heidegger and Merleau-Ponty, Hubert
Dreyfus has championed habitual human actions, describing states of
what I would call “minimalist consciousness,” as when I see a nail and
hammer it in the familiar course of carpentering. I am consciously hammering the nail (I am not a zombie) but without any prominent consciousness – even minimal indexical awareness – of my action, myself,
my hand, my hammer, my will, and without any conscious conceptual or
symbolic judgment or volition about hammer, nail, cabinets, and so forth.
Higher-level consciousness is lacking in this action, and inner awareness
may be largely or even wholly lacking in such actions. Still, it does not
follow that consciousness and inner awareness are lacking in other forms
of human activity, at different levels of consciousness.
(iv) Ludwig Wittgenstein described “fundamental empirical propositions,” contained in basic beliefs that are inaccessible to consciousness –
not because they are repressed `a la Freud, but because they are so basic
to our human existence that we ordinarily have no need for them. Such
Return to Consciousness 113
beliefs would be symbolic or language-bound intentional states, but they
do not involve consciousness, much less inner awareness (see in Chapter 5
the essay “Background Ideas,” extrapolating from Wittgenstein’s concerns in On Certainty). Such “beliefs” do indeed ground our epistemology.
Yet it does not follow that consciousness with inner awareness does not
inform other human thoughts, at the levels of conceptual and symbolic
consciousness. (v) Donald Davidson has argued, on grounds of interpretation of others’ beliefs and desires, that language is a prerequisite
for intentional propositional attitudes. Only at the symbolic level of consciousness, however, do such intuitions and arguments have bite. In any
event, it does not follow that lower levels of consciousness and intentionality require language.
Such observations, against the omnipresence of acute consciousness in
human affairs, should not impel philosophy to abandon consciousness in
an effort to get beyond Cartesianism and into high postmodernism, as a
Richard Rorty might urge. Instead, such observations should lead us into
careful discriminations of forms and levels of consciousness. In that spirit
we proposed a four-level scheme of categories of forms of consciousness.
These four categories do not, however, complete the systematic categorization of forms of consciousness. They define certain forms of awareness, in four levels, but across these levels other categorial differences
apply. A separate dimension of variation is that between three basic forms
of mental act or state, which we might call forms of mental direction or
bias:
34
A. Perception B. Thought C. Volition/Action
In perception a being or organism receives information from its environment and so is affected by its environs. In volition a being or organism
initiates action and so affects its environs. (Or, we may say, in action
a being executes or carries out a volition.) In thought, in either judgment or imagination, a being represents or conceives things, but does
not directly affect things and is not directly affected by the environment.
In ordinary human affairs, thought, perception, and volition or action
are interdependent. For what I see or do typically depends on how I
think about things, and what I think typically derives from what I see and
what I do.
In human perception, information is channeled in one of six sensory
forms: seeing, hearing, touching, smelling, tasting, and kinesthetic sensing (of one’s bodily movement). And these sensory modes of perception
include qualitatively different forms of sensation: visual, auditory, and so
114 Mind World
forth. Sensation, we assume, is not a distinct form of consciousness or
mental activity but is a feature (a dependent part) of an act of perception. And we assume this sensory quality in an act of perception occurs
only where the act is conscious – unlike blindsight.
In human thought, intentional content follows the forms so much
discussed by classical philosophy, featuring conceptual, propositional,
logical forms familiar to us all and often shaped by our language. In
judgment a state of affairs is not only represented but posited as existing
or actual; in imagination, something is merely represented, with no stake
in existence.
In human action, bodily movement is initiated by volition and guided
by kinesthesis, typically framed by background ideas and expectations
that define what one is trying to do. There is considerable intentional
structure in action, beyond the scope of the present study. (See “Consciousness in Action” and “Background Ideas” in Chapters 4 and 5.)
Where does feeling or emotion enter the categorization of mind and
consciousness? Brentano, we saw, held that a character of feeling was
present in every mental act. If so, then emotion defines yet another
dimension of variation in the form of mental states. There will be different types of feeling and different ways in which it enters the form of a
mental act, especially a conscious one. One way emotion appears in consciousness is in connection with volition, as part of the motivation that
leads into a state of volition, which initiates action. Where perception
includes a quality of sensation, volition (and action) includes a quality
of emotion. But emotion also informs thought and perception. We cannot take up these issues here, but we note their relevance to a category
scheme for mind and consciousness.
If we put together the distinctions we have been observing, we may
begin the categorization of forms of mind and consciousness with the
following scheme:
A. Perception B. Thought C. Volition/Action
1. Sentient-Motor Activity
2. Indexical Awareness
3. Conceptual Intentionality
4. Symbolic Intentionality
Then different levels of consciousness characterize different biases of
mental state, as the two dimensions of variation cut across each other.
What I am suggesting in this brief outline is a categorization that organizes
Return to Consciousness 115
the kind of classifications observed in classical works of psychology by
Brentano and James and extended in classical works of phenomenology
by Husserl, Heidegger (terminology notwithstanding), Sartre, MerleauPonty, et alia. But the art of categorization should also reflect a wider
purview, an ontology of mind and consciousness. This purview takes us
much further afield. (A program of ontological categorization along such
lines is outlined in Chapters 6–8.)
Forms of Consciousness in Review
Regrouping results, we can distinguish and organize a variety of forms
of conscious (and unconscious) intentionality that we have encountered
in the preceding discussion. Staying with simple perceptions, where consciousness is palpable, and focusing on forms of awareness, we distinguish
the following forms of mental state or act, assuming their analysis in terms
similar to those in the preceding discussion:
1. Unconscious vision. Blindsight is perception without consciousness, wholly unconscious vision.
2. Conscious vision without retention. The long-distance truck driver
consciously sees the road ahead (and steers accordingly) but has
no immediate memory of his perception (and steering). His perception includes consciousness but little or no retention of his
ongoing vision (and steering) – and no awareness of seeing the
road (and steering) while doing so. In some moments of his trip
he may simply have no retention of what he saw (and did in steering) a few seconds ago, and yet he is and was consciously seeing the
road.
3. Conscious vision without inner awareness. The well-focused carpenter consciously sees the hammer and nail (and hammers the
nail) but has no inner awareness of his seeing (or hammering). His
perception (and action) include consciousness but no inner awareness. However, the perception may include retention even without
inner awareness. For, when asked what he was doing, he replies,
“Hammering this nail,” while of course seeing it, even though in
doing so he has no awareness of seeing (and hammering), no concurrent holistic awareness of “this seeing [and hammering].”
4. Conscious vision with inner awareness. When I see this statuette
beside my computer, I am quite aware of my “regarding” it as I
think of its African origin. My consciousness in seeing it includes an
116 Mind World
inner awareness of seeing it. And my perception includes retention,
which plays a role in grounding the inner awareness as I look at it
progressively from different sides, admiring the craftsmanship.
5. Conscious vision with inner awareness but without conceptual or
symbolic content. When I see something ahead on the road in
the fog, my perception is conscious, imbued with retention, and
endowed with inner awareness. But no interpretation of what lies
ahead is present in the content of my perception; there is no conceptual content and no symbolic content. I merely see “that,” not
“that stone” (conceptually presented) or “that Mercedes on the
Autobahn” (symbolically or linguistically presented).
6. Conscious vision with inner awareness and with conceptual content but without symbolic content. When I see “this gizmo,” part of
the machinery inside my computer, my perception is conscious, imbued with retention and inner awareness, but lacking in symbolic
content. I have formed a concept of this type of part, recognizing
it. But lacking expertise, I have no properly symbolic words for it,
words that would be part of the technical language used by electronic engineers in designing this part. (“Gizmo”is a dummy word,
even if I use it while pointing at the part.)
7. Conscious vision with only background conceptual or symbolic
content. When I see “this woman approaching,” my perception
is conscious, imbued with retention and inner awareness, and endowed with some conceptual content, but most of the relevant conceptualization (with or without symbolic linguistic articulation) is
not present in my experience but resides in the background of
my consciousness. I may recognize a human being, and his or her
gender, and even the person herself, without any further background content (much less silent words) streaming through my
experience.
8. Conscious vision with inner awareness and with symbolic content:
When I see “this man approaching, Jacques Derrida, the father
of deconstruction,” my perception is conscious, imbued with retention and with inner awareness, and endowed with content informed by extant, grammatically well formed language, and specifically written language (as the object of perception would himself
stress).
And, of course, there are more variations on the forms realized in states of
consciousness. These cases, however, begin to lay out the variety of forms
Return to Consciousness 117
of consciousness, inner awareness, and retention that may be involved in
perception.
In short, given the variety of structures we have found in different forms
and levels of consciousness, we can begin to systematize the differences
among the many cases that motivated different – and falsely competing –
views about consciousness, its form, and its prevalence. We have, in other
words, begun the systematics of consciousness.35
Notes
1. Descartes’s view is expressed in the Sixth Replies: in the translation by
Cottingham, Stoothoff, and Murdoch 1988: vol. 2. Descartes’s Latin
“cognitione interna” is translated by Cottingham et al. as “inner awareness” –
a leap of interpretation. Remember that Descartes uses cognitio, or “thought,”
as a general term for all mental acts. When I wrote “The Structure of
(Self-)Consciousness” (1986), I chose the term of art“inner awareness,” which
I later found in the Cottingham et al. translations and addressed in “The
Cogito circa ad 2000” (1993; Chapter 1 in this volume). Although the translation is somewhat anachronistic, Descartes’s argument is thoroughly contemporary with today’s debate about higher-order thought making a mental state
conscious – a view discussed here. My thanks to Alan Nelson for assistance on
this point of translation and interpretation.
2. Leibniz 1998/1714: 260.
3. Leibniz 1998/1714: 260, opening the same paragraph from which the preceding quotation is drawn.
4. Suppose a “monad” is a complex form of mental activity supervenient on
or rather implemented in a physical system along the lines of contemporary
functionalism. Then read Leibniz 1998/1714: 37ff. on “homuncular functionalism” and the later discussion in Lycan 1987, followed by Lycan, “Consciousness as Internal Monitoring,” in Block et al. 1997. Recall that Leibniz,
the great visionary of formal thinking according to Husserl, was probably the
first thinker to envision explicitly what we today call a computing machine.
5. A complementary anthology addressing philosophy of mind more broadly
is forthcoming: Phenomenology and Philosophy of Mind, edited by the present
author and Amie L. Thomasson.
6. Siewert (1998) argues at length from the case of blindsight for the need
to recognize and not neglect the phenomenal features of consciousness in
vision (see chaps. 3–5). I follow the same basic line of argument initially (do
see Siewert’s detailed discussion). However, Siewert argues “against ways of
identifying consciousness with a kind of mentally self-reflexive feature” (197,
see chap. 6 for details, noting 197). I concur that what defines consciousness is
no form of higher-order thought or perception directed toward the conscious
state (so noted in my 1986 and 1989: chap. 2). But I go on to seek an analysis of
inner awareness that avoids those problems. Here I restrict inner awareness,
though, to certain forms of consciousness. Stay tuned.
118 Mind World
7. See the account of blindsight in Martha J. Farah, “Visual Perception and
Visual Awareness after Brain Damage: A Tutorial Overview,” in Block et al.
1997.
8. Siewert (1998: chap. 3) distinguishes a variety of cases of sight including
full sight, amblyopic (partially atrophied) sight, empirically observed limited
blindsight, and idealized full blindsight (as good as normal conscious vision).
9. See Smith 2002a.
10. Empathy is precisely projecting oneself from one’s own first-person perspective into another’s position as subject, comprehending the other’s experience as if one’s own. See Smith 1989: chap. 3.
11. Dennett (1991) introduced the useful term “heterophenomenology,” albeit
with the ulterior motive of gutting the concept of consciousness and undermining “autophenomenology,” or phenomenology as I am practicing it.
12. See Freud 1965/1933.
13. The relations among forms of experience and forms of language are discussed at length in Smith and McIntyre 1982. The principles behind this
method of phenomenological analysis are detailed there and carried over
into Smith 1989, and into the present discussion.
14. See Smith 2002b.
15. As Brentano’s students went to work on intentionality, two approaches
developed: the “object” and the “content” approaches to intentionality, as
appraised in Smith and McIntyre 1982. Meinong championed the object
approach, while Husserl championed the content approach. On the object approach, all distinctions in intentionality are distinctions in the object
“intended.” On the content approach, there are distinctions in content as
opposed to object, where the content defines or reflects the way the object
is intended. Thus Husserl characterized the ideal content or sense (Sinn) of
an act as “the object as intended.”
16. Indexical intentionality is a complex story. See Smith 1989.
17. That perception is a form of indexical awareness, perhaps the paradigm
form, is discussed at length in Smith 1989: chap. 1, and observed in Smith
and McIntyre 1982: chap. 7.
18. This approach already has difficulties with intentionality: see Smith 1999.
Different issues are raised here.
19. To be true to Brentano (1995/1874), we should note that for Brentano
judgment is not necessarily of a subject-predicate form (142), as we here
assume in line with today’s logic. For Brentano “judgment” is an affirmation
or denial (of existence), rather than a judgment that such and such is the
case.
20. For the present interpretation, see Smith and McIntyre 1982: chap. 3, and
(more briefly) McIntyre and Smith 1989. In Husserl, Logical Investigations
(1970/1900–1), the distinction is drawn between the “quality” and “matter”
of an act; in Husserl, Ideas I (1963/1913), the distinction is drawn between
the “thetic character” and “Sinn” within the noema of an act.
21. In Searle 1983.
22. This tendency Siewert calls “the ‘consciousness-of’ trap” (1998: 194).
23. Compare Perry’s recent account of “reflexive content” (2001: chap. 6).
Return to Consciousness 119
24. For an illuminating discussion of the origin of the text (compiled in 1917
by Edith Stein from Husserl’s lecture notes, then edited in 1928 with little
change by Martin Heidegger), and an overview of Husserl’s analysis and the
difficulties of interpreting Husserl’s evolving account of the “constitution”
of time consciousness, see Brough’s Translator’s Introduction to Husserl
(1991/1893–1917). A careful and succinct reconstruction of Husserl’s analysis of time consciousness is that in Miller 1984.
25. Husserl’s concept of “constitution” is central to his doctrine of “transcendental idealism,” my take on which is elaborated in Smith 1995: 372ff.
26. A rich phenomenological study of related issues is that in Zahavi 1999. Zahavi
carefully distinguishes aspects of the structure of self-awareness, including
inner awareness and temporality.
27. The modal interpretation of “consciously” is a specific approach to the logic
of the adverb “consciously.” If the clause “I see this frog,” or “I see that this
is a frog,” has a relational predicative form, the intentional verb “see” being
a transitive verb (as Rosenthal and Dretske assumed), then “consciously”
in the sentence “Consciously I see this frog” seems to take an adverbial
form, modifying the verb “see.” By grammatical analogy, the character of
consciousness might be called an adverbial character, as Amie Thomasson
(2000) has observed in addressing Brentano. I think that is correct, and that
is the first principle to extract from Brentano. Thomasson contrasts such
adverbial analyses (including mine) with models of higher-order thought or
perception.
28. The details here were laid out in Smith 1989.
29. The interdependence of the various indexical contents – “this [object],”
“here,” “now,” “I,” “this very experience” – is studied at length in Smith
1989.
30. Searle (1992) holds that all mental states are conscious and that what some
have called unconscious intentional states are really neural dispositions to
produce conscious mental activities. Although I do not here directly address
Searle’s view, the delineation of levels of consciousness cuts against the sharp
line Searle draws between conscious states and nonmental neural states.
31. The following scheme of four levels, and three biases, was drafted in my
discussions with Chuck Dement around 1993. We were seeking a formal
system of intentionality that would be framed ultimately by a formal ontology
along the lines sketched in my essay “Being and Basis” (1997). A specific aim
of the scheme was to place indexical modes of awareness in a larger formal
phenomenology, assuming an account of indexical awareness like that in my
book The Circle of Acquaintance (1989).
32. Johannes Brandl has made a similar point, in conversation and in a colloquium on reduction and levels of intentionality presented in spring 1999 at
the University of California, Irvine.
33. See Smith 1989: chap. 1.
34. Searle (1983) characterizes “direction of fit” as one distinguishing feature
of intentionality. For Searle, in thought or perception the direction of fit
is from mind to world, as a state of thinking or perceiving fits the state of
the world if the thought or perception is true; but in intention or action the
120 Mind World
direction of fit is from world to mind, as a state of the world fits the intention
in or behind an action if the intention is satisfied. The present conception of
“bias” is somewhat like the notion of direction-of-fit, but distinguishes three
forms of orientation or direction, separating thinking from perceiving and
both from intention or volition in action. (I use the term “volition” where
Searle uses “intention in action.”) In D. W. Smith (1997) bias is cast as a basic
mode of being: an entity is either receptive or static or active. Accordingly,
in particular, a mental state is either receptive as in perception, or static with
respect to environment as in thinking, or active as in volition cum action.
35. Systematics in biology is the science of the diversity of life forms. Here
I use the term in an extended sense. Compare my “Basic Categories” in
Chapter 8.
References
Block, Ned, Owen Flanagan, and Guven G ¨ uzeldere, eds. ¨ 1997. The Nature of
Consciousness: Philosophical Debates. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Brentano, Franz. 1995. Psychology from an Empirical Standpoint. Edited by Oskar
Kraus. English edition edited by Linda L. McAlister, with a new introduction
by Peter Simons. Translated by Antos C. Cancurello, D. B. Terrell, and Linda
L. McAlister. London: Routledge. German original, 1874.
Chalmers, David J. 1996. The Conscious Mind: In Search of a Fundamental Theory.
Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Dennett, Daniel C. 1991. Consciousness Explained. Boston: Little, Brown.
Descartes, Rene.´ 1988. The Philosophical Writings of Descartes. Vol. II. Translated
by John Cottingham, Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald Murdoch. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.
Freud, Sigmund. 1965. New Introductory Lectures on Psycho-Analysis. New York:
W. W. Norton. German original, 1933.
Husserl, Edmund. 1963. Ideas. Translated by W. R. Boyce Gibson, from the
German original of 1913. New York: Collier Books. Originally titled Ideas Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, First Book.
1970. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. Translated by J. N. Findlay from the
revised, second German edition. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul. New
edition, edited with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a preface
by Michael Dummett. London: Routledge, 2001. German original, 1900–1,
revised 1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920 (Investigation VI).
1991. On the Phenomenology of the Consciousness of Internal Time-Consciousness
(1893–1917). Lectures from 1893 to 1917. Translated by John Barnett
Brough. Boston: Kluwer Academic Publishers. From German text edited
and organized by Edith Stein, then slightly edited under his name by Martin
Heidegger for the 1928 text from which the translation was prepared. This
edition includes further texts gathered by Brough.
Leibniz, G. W. 1998. “Principles of Nature and Grace, Based on Reason.” 1714. In
G. W. Leibniz, Philosophical Texts. Translated and edited by R. S. Woolhouse
and Richard Francks. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Texts from 1686 to
1714.
Return to Consciousness 121
Locke, John. 1975. An Essay concerning Human Understanding. Edited by Peter H.
Nidditch. Oxford: Oxford University Press. Original, 1694.
Lycan, William G. 1987. Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
McIntyre, Ronald, and David Woodruff Smith. 1989. “Theory of Intentionality.”
In J. N. Mohanty and William McKenna, eds., Husserl’s Phenomenology: A Textbook, pp. 147–79. Washington, D.C.: University Press of America; Pittsburgh:
Center for Advanced Research in Phenomenology.
Miller, Izchak. 1984. Husserl, Perception and Temporal Awareness. Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press.
Perry, John. 2001. Knowledge, Possibility, and Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
Petitot, Jean, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard Pachoud, and Jean-Michel Roy, eds.
1999. Naturalizing Phenomenology: Issues in Contemporary Phenomenology and
Cognitive Science. Stanford, Calif.: Stanford University Press in collaboration
with Cambridge University Press.
Sartre, Jean-Paul. 1963. Being and Nothingness. Translated by Hazel Barnes. New
York: Washington Square Press. French original, 1943.
Searle, John R. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1992. The Rediscovery of the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Siewert, Charles. 1998. The Significance of Consciousness. Princeton, N. J.: Princeton
University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1986.“The Structure of (Self-)Consciousness.”Topoi 5(2):
149–56.
1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Boston: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds.,
The Cambridge Companion to Husserl. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
pp. 323–93.
1997. “Being and Basis.” Unpublished manuscript, extending my presentation
under the same title at the Second European Congress of Analytic Philosophy, Leeds, England, 5–7 August 1996.
1999.“Intentionality Naturalized?”In Jean Petitot, Francisco J. Varela, Bernard
Pachoud, and Jean-Michel Roy, eds., Naturalizing Phenomenology: Contemporary Phenomenology and Cognitive Science, pp. 83–110. Stanford, Calif.: Stanford
University Press in collaboration with Cambridge University Press.
2002a. “What Is ‘Logical’ in Husserl’s Logical Investigations? The Copenhagen
Interpretation.” In Dan Zahavi and Frederik Stjernfelt, eds., 100 Years of
Phenomenology: Husserl’s Logical Investigations Revisited, pp. 51–65. Boston:
Kluwer Academic Publishers.
2002b. “Intentionality and Picturing: Early Husserl vis-a-vis ` Early Wittgenstein.” Southern Journal of Philosophy 40 suppl.: 153–80.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Boston: D. Reidel.
Thomasson, Amie L. 2000. “After Brentano: A One-Level Theory of Consciousness.” European Journal of Philosophy 8 (2): 190–209.
Zahavi, Dan. 1999. Self-Awareness and Alterity: A Phenomenological Investigation.
Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University Press.
4
Consciousness in Action
Abstract. A phenomenology of action is outlined, analyzing the structure
of volition, kinesthesis, and perception in the experience of action. These
three forms of intentionality are integrated in a typical case of conscious
volitional action. In their integration we find the structure of our everyday
experience of embodiment in action. The intentionality of action is contrasted with that of thought and perception in regard to the role of the
body, and the relations between an action, the experience of acting, and
the context of the action are specified.
Segue. In “The Cogito circa a.d. 2000” we argued that the experience of
consciousness includes an inner awareness of the act of consciousness
(sans dualism and sans incorrigibility). In “Return to Consciousness” we
analyzed the form of inner awareness in detail. Phenomenological analysis begins with our awareness of our own experience as lived. Often
this phenomenological perspective, grounded in inner awareness, is assumed to lead to an isolation of mind from body. However, a careful
phenomenology of action shows that this structure of consciousness already places consciousness in intimate relations to the “lived” body, so the
“inner” is already tied to the “outer,” the “subjective” to the “objective.”
Thus, consciousness is already embodied as we experience it in everyday
action. Inversely, the body is itself experienced in conscious action. That is,
consciousness is itself experienced as part of nature, beginning with one’s
own body.
An early version of this essay was read at the XVIIIth World Congress of Philosophy in
Brighton, England, on 25 August 1988. I thank discussants on that occasion, including
cosymposiasts Robert Gordon, Helen Lauer, and Jonathon Suzman; I thank Steve DeWitt,
Ronald McIntyre, Martin Schwab, Peter Simons, and Peter Woodruff for discussions since;
and I thank an anonymous referee for many detailed comments on the penultimate draft.
The present edition is much longer than, and quite different from, what was read at
Brighton.
122
Consciousness in Action 123
The Phenomenological Problem of Action
As phenomenology describes human experience, the phenomenology of
action describes the experience of acting, or doing something, especially
doing something consciously and intentionally, or volitionally. Acting typically involves moving or using one’s body by the volition to do such-andsuch. But what is the structure of an experience of acting? That is the
phenomenological problem of action.
Here I should like to present a blueprint for a phenomenology of
action, sketching a theory of the intentionality of action – as opposed to
thought and perception, which (at least on the face of it) do not involve
using one’s body. I shall assume the broad outlines of a “content”theory of
intentionality, according to which an intentional state or “act” is directed
toward an object via a content, where the content of the act prescribes,
or is satisfied by, the object of the act (if the act is successful). In the
case of thinking the content will be a proposition (e.g., “that 1970 was a
good year for Bordeaux”), whereas in visual perception the content will
be a visual image or percept (usually informed by conceptualization, as
in seeing “this green frog here in the grass”). But in the case of action,
we shall find quite different phenomenological structures, or contents,
as we sort through the issue raised by human action for a general theory
of intentionality.1
I do not propose to offer, as would some theories of action, an account
of necessary and sufficient conditions for being an action. I am not sure
there are any (given the plasticity of our concept of action). But in any
event I want here to focus on a certain paradigm of conscious, intentional
action. And, as we shall see, there are variations in what we experience
in different actions even of this kind.
One does something consciously when one does it with awareness of
what one is doing, and one does something intentionally when one does
it with intention, or volition. (A distinction between intention and volition, to be drawn later, need not concern us at this time.) One may
do something consciously but unintentionally (nonvolitionally). For instance, when I drive over the curb, I am driving the car consciously, and
intentionally, but it is not part of my intention, or volition, to drive over
the curb. Again, one may do something unconsciously yet intentionally
(volitionally). For example, when I say something offensive to my friend,
I may do so intentionally but unconsciously, motivated by envy. Our concern, however, will be those actions in which one does something both
intentionally and consciously.
124 Mind World
It is important to distinguish phenomenological problems from metaphysical problems. Because action involves bodily movement caused by
volition, the traditional mind-body problem is just around the corner:
in action, how is the mental state of willing related to (and how can
it cause) the bodily state of moving and thereby doing such and such?
That is a metaphysical problem. But another sort of mind-body problem
arises in the phenomenological description of action. Conscious action
involves awareness of one’s volition and one’s bodily movement. What
is the relation between volition and bodily movement as experienced
in conscious action? That is a phenomenological problem, formulated
at the level of phenomenological description. By contrast, the traditional mind-body problem is that of relating mental events as described
in phenomenology or psychology with physical events as described in
neurophysiology.2
In classical phenomenology, action is addressed more centrally by
Merleau-Ponty than by Husserl or Heidegger. Merleau-Ponty is said to
have undercut Cartesian dualism and averted the mind-body problem
by describing the body in a way that does not admit of mind-body distinctions. It would be better to see his account of “the body” as a phenomenological description of certain forms of intentionality, including
bodily awareness in action and perception.3 Similarly, in psychology,
J. J. Gibson describes visual experience at a level of human rather than
physical interaction, so that perceived objects are presented with properties like “a stone to be stepped on.”4 At that level of description, objects in
the “external” world are described in terms that overlap with descriptions
of our “internal” world of experience. And that level of description – of
one’s experience and the world around one – is the level at which human
actions are described in the phenomenology of action.
Intentionality in Action, Thought, and Perception
The phenomenological problem of action, I have assumed, is a problem
of intentionality in the Brentano-Husserl sense: what is one conscious or
aware of in performing an action?
But there are very different kinds of intentional activity. Some, such as
thinking, are purely mental activities (realized in brain function), whereas
others, such as action (and arguably perception), involve use of the body.
These different kinds of “acts” have very different kinds of intentionality.
Thus, I have a thought “about” Russell, a perception “of” the dog, and an
intention or volition “to” hit the bull’s eye. These different phenomena
Consciousness in Action 125
are all said to be intentional or “directed” toward something: thinking,
because it is“about” something; perception, because it is“of” something;
intention or volition, because it is “to” do something. Bodily actions, too,
are said to be “intentional.”But is the intentionality of action a special case
of intentionality in the Brentano-Husserl sense? Not quite. An action is
intentional in the everyday sense if and only if it is done with and through
the volition or intention to act in a certain way, and a volition or intention
is intentional in the Brentano-Husserl sense, as it is a willing or intending
“of” the action, or “to” act thus and so. In this way, the everyday sense
of “intentional” may be defined in terms of the Brentano-Husserl sense.
Alternatively, the Brentano-Husserl sense may be extended (from purely
mental acts) to actions, by saying an action is intentional insofar as the
constituent volition (through which it is performed) is intentional.5
The classical phenomenologists took differing views of intentionality
in part because of their diverging attitudes toward action and the body.
Husserl focused on the intentionality of thought and perception as cognitive apprehension of objects in the world, whereas Merleau-Ponty focused
on the intentionality of perception as essentially involving meaningful
embodied behavior, or action. It is said that Husserl privileged cognitive
representation in thought and perception divorced from action in the
world, whereas Heidegger held that meaningful behavior (informed by
culturally – or historically – defined practices) is more fundamental than
thought or perception, and Merleau-Ponty (with less emphasis on praxis)
urged that perception and bodily movement go hand in hand (“the theory of the body is already a theory of perception”). But these familiar
oppositions blur what is at issue in the intentionality of action.
All intentional human activities – actions, thoughts, perceptions – take
place in the world (where else?) and are performed by an embodied human subject. The issues should be: what are these different kinds of intentionality, in action, thought, and perception? And in what ways do they
depend on each other – is one kind most fundamental, or does each depend in different ways on certain of the others? Once these questions
are posed clearly, the familiar postures attributed to Husserl, Heidegger,
and Merleau-Ponty appear wrongheaded: there are different kinds of
dependence among these different kinds of intentionality.
Different Forms of Awareness in Action
What is one aware of in performing an action? Awareness comes in several things in different ways, in different forms of intentional activity.
126 Mind World
Consider a relatively simple action: my picking up a shovel to dig in
the garden. We should distinguish the following forms of awareness,
or structures of experience, involved in my performing this conscious
action. First, within action itself, there is my volitional awareness of my
action, that is, my volition to so act: I am consciously willing to pick up
this shovel, that is, willing that I now pick it up (in a certain manner,
grasping the handle with my hands and lifting it with my arms). Second, accompanying my action is my kinesthetic awareness of my bodily
movement as I pick up the shovel. Third, there is my concurrent perception of certain things in my environment, especially my seeing and
touching the shovel I am picking up, and also my seeing the shovel
rising in my hands (the intended effect of my action). Thus, my experience of acting consists in my conscious volition, which occurs against the
background of my relevant kinesthetic and perceptual experiences. And
these three forms of awareness make up my overall experience in acting.
Importantly, although kinesthesis and perception accompany and guide
my volition, I am attending to what I am willing and thereby doing –
picking up the shovel – rather than to what I see or what I feel of my bodily
movement.6
Some philosophers balk at the claim that action involves a distinguishable element of willing and that we are aware of our willing in acting.
However, a striking experiment dissolves that skepticism. Neurologist
Wilder Penfield inserted an electrode into the motor cortex of the patient’s brain, which caused the patient’s hand to move. The patient, fully
conscious, declared, “I didn’t do that. You did.”7 The point being that we
normally do experience our effectively willing our hands to move. The
phenomenology of action should explicitly recognize this element in the
experience of acting. To experience willing, however, is not to have something like a “feeling” of willing, a sensation of willing, like a churning in
one’s stomach or, indeed, a kinesthetic sensation of moving. Consciously
willing is not sensation of any kind; it is willing.
The three forms of awareness noted in a typical action – volition, kinesthesis, and perception – are interdependent in that they presuppose one
another in certain ways. Thus, I normally cannot perform the conscious
action of picking up the shovel, by my volition to pick it up, without having
a kinesthetic awareness of my movement and a perceptual awareness of
the shovel and its movement in my hands. Nor can I see the shovel without turning my eyes toward it, or feel it without reaching my hands out
to touch it. These different forms of experience are thus interwoven as
I perform the conscious action. The action itself, as it unfolds, is guided
Consciousness in Action 127
by the integration of these three forms of awareness of what I am doing.
(Of course, there are many variations on this simple form of action, some
of which we note later, but let us focus on the structures of experience
involved in this simple paradigm.)
By hypothesis, these three forms of awareness involved in my action are
all mental events. Now, what makes a mental event conscious is an “inner
awareness” of it as it transpires. In particular, as I will that I now pick up
this shovel, I am aware of my so willing. And, as I feel my body moving,
I am aware of this kinesthetic sensation of my body. Again, as I see this
shovel rise in my hands, I am aware of my visual experience of the shovel.
However, this awareness of my intentional activity – my willing, sensing,
or seeing – is not an attentive awareness, as my attention lies in what I
am doing (raising the shovel) rather than in my awareness of my doing
it. Furthermore, this awareness is not a distinct, second-order judgment
or observation about the activity. It is rather a prereflective awareness of
the activity, a reflexive awareness that is internal to the activity itself and
makes it a conscious mental activity. The structure of my awareness in my
volition, then, may be expressed in a phenomenological description of
the form:
In this volition I am now willing (myself) to pick up that shovel, that
is, willing that I pick up that shovel,
where “I am now willing that I pick up that shovel” articulates my volitional awareness-of-my-action and “in this volition” expresses my reflexive awareness-of-my-volition. A similar reflexive structure will be part of
my kinesthesis and again of my perception. (A useful analogy with inner awareness is the feature of promising described in speech-act theory,
where I say, “[Hereby, that is, in this very speech act] I promise to return
the car by noon.”)8
Thus, my overall experience in picking up the shovel is formed from
three forms of conscious intentional activity:
1. My volition to pick up this shovel, and therein my inner awareness
of my so willing.
2. My kinesthesis of my bodily movement, and therein my inner awareness of my kinesthesis.
3. My visual and tactile perceptions of the shovel’s movement, and
therein my inner awareness of my perceptions.
128 Mind World
The phenomenological structure of these forms of awareness-cum-innerawareness may be expressed in the following forms of phenomenological
description:
1.In this volition I am now willing that I pick up – grasp with my
hands and with my arms lift – this shovel that I am now feeling in
my hands.
2.In this kinesthesis I am now sensing my arms moving upward as if
lifting something and my hands closed as if around a shovel handle.
3a.In this visual perception I am now seeing this shovel in my hands
and rising with my arms.
3b.In this tactile perception I am now feeling this shovel’s handle in
my hands.
It is in virtue of the reflexive awarenesses expressed by “in this volition,”
“in this kinesthesis,” and “in this visual perception”that my volition, kinesthesis, and perception are conscious. (However, I am in no way attending
to my willing; I am attending to what I am willing and thereby doing,
namely, lifting the shovel. Nor am I in any way attending to my kinesthetic
sensations while lifting the shovel, although I might attend to these sensations if concerned with my technique of lifting, say, if I am concerned
not to strain my back. Nor am I attending to my perceptions, though
I am attending to what I see of what I am doing, namely, lifting the
shovel.)
My action itself is conscious insofar as I am aware of performing it. But
in what ways am I aware of my action per se, my picking up the shovel?
In light of the preceding, my awareness of my action consists in:
My willing my picking up the shovel.
My kinesthetic sensation of my bodily movement.
My visual and tactile perception of the movement of the shovel in my
hands and arms.
My inner awareness of my willing, my kinesthetic sensing, and my
perceiving.
Thus, I am aware of my action not only in my experience of acting per se,
which consists in my conscious volition of my picking up the shovel, but
also in my kinesthetic sensations of my movement and my perceptions of
the action.
As indicated earlier, my experience of acting is an experience of consciously executing the action. As I perform the action, I do not experience
(I have no awareness of) any difference between my action of successfully
Consciousness in Action 129
raising the shovel and my experience of acting. I simply experience my
volition as effective – unless, through perception or kinesthesis, I become
aware of failing to do what I am willing, say, if the shovel slips out of my
hands. (Similarly, in perception I do not experience any difference between my successfully seeing an object before me and my experience of
seeming to see such a thing – unless something happens to shake my
normal faith in my perception.)
Moreover, my experience of acting involves an experience of causation.
9
To flesh out the phenomenological structure of my volition:
In this volition I am now willing that I pick-up-this-shovel by so willing,
that is, that I pick up this shovel and this volition cause my bodily
movement in picking up this shovel.
Thus, the content of my volition prescribes – its conditions of satisfaction are – not only that my body move in a certain way but also that its
movement be caused by that very volition and, furthermore, that this
movement cause the shovel’s upward movement.10 I experience this causation precisely insofar as I experience the volition, and collaboratively
the kinesthesis and perception that attest to its causal efficacy, and these
I experience in virtue of the inner awareness that makes them conscious.
In this way I experience the whole causal process of volition bringing
about bodily movement bringing about shovel movement.
Notice that what I am willing – my action of picking up the shovel –
incorporates not only my bodily movement (my hands grasping and my
arms lifting) caused by my volition but also the shovel’s movement caused
by my bodily movement. In a tai chi exercise, however, what I am willing
is only a certain bodily movement and, through it, a certain mental state
of concentration; I am not willing any physical activity beyond my bodily
movement. In tai chi, of course, I pay more attention to my kinesthetic
sensation of my movement and very little to my surroundings or my perception of my environs. By contrast, in a ballet exercise I am willing my
bodily movement and watching my movement in the mirror, and then
I may attend more to my visual image than my kinesthetic image of my
movement.
Action, Experience, and Context
Having picked up the shovel, I am digging with it, digging a hole, where
I shall plant a rosebush, here in the garden. What are the boundaries of
my action of digging and my experience of digging; that is, what are the
130 Mind World
structural parts of the action itself, the experiences involved in acting, and
the context of action?
My action of digging consists in the complex process or event that
involves: (1) the digging itself, that is, my bodily movement plus the movement of the shovel in my hands and the earth in the shovel head; (2) my
volition in digging, that is, my willing “that I dig here by moving this shovel
[in a certain way] with my hands and arms” (which is accompanied by the
relevant kinesthetic and perceptual awarenesses); (3) the causal relation
between my volition and my digging movement; and (4) the intentional
relation between the volition and the action, that is, my volition’s willing,
or being a volition “of,” my digging. The relationship between movement
and volition in action is thus quite involved. Not only is the movement
both caused and willed by the volition, but, as noted, the causation is part
of what is willed and part of what is experienced in willing (and in the
kinesthesis and perception of moving).
My experience of acting is that part of the action in which I experience
the action. Thus, my experience of digging consists in my conscious volition of digging, in the company of kinesthetic and perceptual awarenesses, and my volition includes willing my movement with a reflexive
awareness of my so willing. As I perform the action, my digging just is –
in effect, for me – my experience of digging, my consciously executing
my volition of digging. From my first-person, in-action perspective, there
is no gap between my action and my volition of acting.
When I am trying to do something very precise, as in executing a golf
swing, however, I may well not move my body in just the way I am trying, or
willing, to move. In kinesthetic awareness of my movement, or perceptual
awareness of the club’s or ball’s movement, I may then notice mistakes
or inefficacies in my action. In that case I am aware, in performing my
action, of the difference between what I am willing and what I am doing.
I become aware that I am trying as opposed to doing, willing but not
succeeding.
Indeed, the possibility of error in action requires that we distinguish
the experience of acting from the action itself, which includes my actual
bodily movement. For, in theory at least, if I were hallucinating, I might
have an experience of so acting – consciously so willing in the company
of appropriate kinesthetic and visual experiences – even if I move not a
muscle and so perform no such action. Normally, however, when I want
to move, I move: my volition is effective.
Although my bodily movement in digging is distinct from my volition
of digging, both are parts of the action. On the present account, however,
Consciousness in Action 131
my kinesthetic awareness of my digging motion is not part of the action
per se but is a kind of perception of my bodily movement. (Sometimes
this is called “proprioception,” meaning perception of self, that is, one’s
bodily self; the perceptual organ consists of neural networks that transmit
information about muscle activity rather than, say, ambient light or heat.)
Similarly, my perception of the shovel and its moving earth is not part
of the action but is a perception of what the action is achieving. My
accompanying kinesthetic and perceptual experiences are, thus, part of
the context of my action, part of the “background” phenomena on which
the action depends.
Furthermore, the kinesthetic and perceptual experiences are not part
of my experience-of-acting per se, which consists in my volition of digging. Nonetheless, these three forms of experience are integrally related,
as they are interdependent in various ways, and collectively they form my
overall experience in acting. Phenomenologically, my bodily awareness
and even my perception of the shovel’s moving earth seem inextricable
from my experience of digging. Indeed, the perception requires moving my head and eyes in the right direction, and that movement is an
integral part of my action of digging insofar as I must move my head
to look where I am moving the shovel. The neurophysiology of action
would support this integration, mapping the complex systems of feedback among motor control (volition), muscle feedback (kinesthesis), and
visual intake (perception). Reflecting this structure of interdependence,
our phenomenological description of my experience of acting sets my
volition of digging against the background of my accompanying kinesthesis and perception. In this way, kinesthesis and perception form part
of the proximal context of the volitional experience of acting.
So far, we have not distinguished volition and intention. But suppose
that I have for weeks intended to plant a rosebush in a certain corner of
the garden. Today, I am digging here in the garden, with the intention
of planting a rosebush there. My volition in digging is an event that is
a constituent part of my current experience (and part of my action) of
digging, but my intention is rather a state that is part of the background of
my current experience of digging. Thus, behind my volition in digging,
presupposed by my volition, is my intention to plant a rosebush there. The
willing is contemporaneous with the digging, but the intending stretches
further back in time. The state of intending is not itself causally effective,
producing the action; the event of willing is. Thus, the volition carries
out the prior intention it presupposes.11 The intention itself, moreover,
issues from my desire to put in a rosebush, coupled with my beliefs about
132 Mind World
how to do this.12 And my volition is further shaped by my emotions and
my mood, of the moment. (The cry “There’s a fire in the garage!” would
immediately change the course of my volition and my action.)
The intention, desires, emotions, moods, and beliefs behind my action
are part of the context of the action, specifically, the background of states
and events on which the action depends. In case the action is part of a
larger project, as in my digging while revitalizing our garden, my knowledge of that project and how the action fits into it – however vague that
knowledge may be – belongs to the background of the action. Also part of
the background is my know-how, including my manual skills exercised in
digging with a shovel. Still another part of the background on which the
action depends is my implicit cultural understanding, for example, my
understanding of the “significance” of digging in our culture, something
that may not even be explicable in terms of representational knowledge.
Still a different part of the background of the action is the structure of
cultural practices on which the action draws, for example, maintaining
gardens.13
As explicated earlier, the structure of my action, my experience in
acting, and the relevant context of my action may be schematized as
follows, the main features depicted in the accompanying Figure 4.1:
The action = (body movement + shovel-and-earth movement, volition,
causal relation, intentional relation).
The experience of acting = (volition).
The context of the action = (action, psychic context, physical context,
social context).
where:
The psychic context of the action = (volition, mental-event context,
mental-state context).
The mental-event context of the action = (volition, kinesthesis,
perception).
The mental-state context of the action = (volition, intention, desires,
emotions, moods, beliefs about means, motor skills, knowledge of
project, know-how involved in project, understanding of cultural
practices involved).
The physical context of the action = (agent’s environs, causal relations
between the action and other events).
The social context of the action=(action, social groups of agent, cultural
practices involved, cultural history).
Consciousness in Action 133
figure 4.1. The structure of action, experience, and context.
The intentional states or events within the context of an action include: the mental events of volition, kinesthesis, and perception; and the
mental states of intention, desire, emotion, mood, belief-about-means,
and knowledge-about-project. Nonintentional states within the context
include know-how and cultural understanding. Within the context of
action, one’s consciousness in acting lies in three events: conscious
volition (with reflexive awareness), conscious kinesthesis (with reflexive
awareness), and conscious perception (with reflexive awareness). The
volition is part of the action proper, constituting the experience of acting, whereas the kinesthesis and perception are part of the context of
action.
134 Mind World
Importantly, we have included within the action itself, as opposed to its
context, both the causal relation between volition and movement and the
intentional relation between volition and action. The first makes the action
more than mere bodily movement (it is appropriately caused by my willing
it), and the second makes it “intentional” in the Brentano-Husserl sense
(it is what I will, what the content of my volition prescribes). Together,
these relations make the action properly “volitional”: a complex event
consisting in movements of my body and my shovel in both causal and
intentional relations to my volition.14
More Complex Actions and Awareness Thereof
Our actions vary greatly in complexity, and so do our experiences involved
in acting. Extremely simple actions may consist of volitional movements
with little experiential content and virtually no contextual involvement.
Turning my eyes leftward, for instance, I am willing and doing no more
than moving my eyes, and I am not aware of any kinesthetic sensation
or any perception of my eye movement. Doing a tai chi exercise, my action includes volition guided by paying attention to my body movements
in kinesthetic sensation, whereas my digging action includes body-andshovel movement and a volition guided by kinesthesis and even external
perception. Still more complex is my action of securing a loose shelf in
a cabinet, by holding a nail between the fingers and thumb of my left
hand, while pounding the nail with a hammer held in my right hand,
while focusing my eyes on the head of the nail (!), while propping myself
up on my right knee, while visualizing the intended angle of one board
vis-`a-vis another.
Or, consider the indescribable complexity in a ballerina’s performing a dance solo like “The Dying Swan,” her consciousness currently
focused on a certain form of movement, itself part of a lengthy piece
of choreography accompanied by the music and generating a certain
aesthetic mood for her and her fellow dancers in the wings and the
audience. How does the character of her action depend on its context, including the cultural significance of dance, the intentions of
the choreographer, and her interpretation of the choreography? And
how does the content of her volition in acting reach into these cultural formations? Such cases go far beyond the relatively simple cases
we have described. Yet even a simple case of digging calls for further analysis along these lines (although we cannot pursue the analysis
here).
Consciousness in Action 135
The complexity of one’s experience-of-acting depends not only on
one’s concerns, in what one is trying to do but also on the focus of one’s
attention. Thus, I may experience the same form of action in different
ways. Consider a complex and skilled form of action, for example, hitting
a serve in tennis. If all goes well, I am merely aware of hitting a spin
serve to the backhand corner (anticipating already a crosscourt return
to my backhand volley). But if I have not been serving well today, I may
pay more attention to the “feel” of the stroke, that is, the pattern of
kinesthetic sensations during the movement (am I dropping my elbow
too low again?). My volition may then be more complex: instead of trying
(willing) simply “to hit a spin to his backhand,” I try “to hit my best spin
serve by bringing my elbow up.” Or, if I break a racket string on impact, I
am suddenly aware – perceptually – of the impaired racket I am swinging
through the ball, and I may suddenly refine my volition, trying “to hit out
well through the ball with my broken-stringed racket.” Whereas, when
all went well, I was concentrating only on executing my volition “to hit
a spin to the backhand.” I was then aware of willing my performance of
that familiar movement, in one fell swoop (!), but virtually unaware of
the racket in my hand and virtually unaware of any kinesthetic sensations
of my movement or visual or auditory perception of the racket meeting
the ball.
Attention is, thus, a dimension of phenomenological structure we have
not stressed in the prior analysis. In particular, each form of awareness in
my experience of action carries a certain degree of attention distributed
over its objects. It is in this respect that I am “more aware” of this or that
in acting: of the shovel (in visual or tactile perception of it), of my arms
(in kinesthetic awareness of their movement), or my willing (in reflexive
awareness), or my kinesthetic sensations of my arms moving (in reflexive
awareness), or of my seeing the shovel moving (in reflexive awareness).
A more complete phenomenology of action would specify a measure of
attention and its structural distribution in these forms of awareness.
There are, then, very different levels of complexity in action and in
experiences of acting: from simply moving one’s eyes or hands; to digging,
moving the shovel through the earth with full attention on the parting
earth; to hitting a twist serve, mindfully keeping one’s elbow up to get
full stretch and full power; to performing a dance solo. These different
forms of action may invite very different approaches to the phenomenology of action and its intentionality, stressing the agent’s larger project
(cf. Sartre), or the cultural practices presupposed in acting (Heidegger),
or the essential embodiment of intentional action (Merleau-Ponty), or
136 Mind World
simply the kinesthesis involved in moving (Husserl). Indeed, extremists
might seek to reduce all intentional phenomena to one of these phenomena, for instance, reducing thought to modifications of social practice (an
extreme reading of parts of Heidegger).15 However, a sensitive theory of
the intentionality of action must explicate all these aspects and complexities of action and the experience of acting.
Practical Intentionality
How does the practical intentionality of action, or volition in action,
differ from the cognitive intentionality of thought and perception?
Consciously digging a hole with a shovel, willing one’s digging, seeing or feeling the shovel’s movement, sensing the movement of one’s
body in digging, thinking about digging a hole, thinking about oneself
(say, while digging) – these are all intentional activities. But they have
very different kinds of intentionality. In particular, the action of digging
is a practical activity, not a cognitive activity like thinking or perceiving or, indeed, kinesthetically sensing one’s movement. It is a practical
activity insofar as it is one of acting, and it is not itself a cognitive activity of thinking or perceiving or conceiving (although it depends on
such cognitive activities). Now, an action is intentional insofar as it is
performed through a volition. And the volition itself is a practical intentional activity, as opposed to a cognitive intentional activity, because
it is a willing rather than a thinking or perceiving (on which it may,
however, depend). But what sets the practical intentionality of volition
apart from the cognitive intentionality of thought, perception, and the
like?
The difference begins with content. My volition of digging has a volitional content:
“In this volition I am now willing that I am digging this hole.”
By contrast, my thinking of my digging has a cogitative content:
“In this thought I am now thinking that I am digging this hole.”
Moreover, if Castaneda is right, the volitional content expressed here ˜
by “I am digging this hole” is of a different logical or phenomenological
form than the cogitative or propositional content expressed by “I am digging this hole.”16 The content formulating what is willed, as opposed to
thought, he calls a practition, as opposed to a proposition, the difference
lying in the copula: while the relevant proposition has the form “I am
Consciousness in Action 137
digging” (“In this thought I think that I am digging”), the practicion has
the form “I to dig” (“In this volition I will I [myself] to dig”), and the
copula “to” signals a “causal openness” in the volition. Whether or not
these core contents of thought and volition are different in form (we
need not settle that matter here), the overall contents certainly differ in
form.
Moreover, the activities that bear these contents differ in effect. A volitional content is, if you will, an executive content, in that “performing”
a volition executes an action – if all goes according to form, that is, according to content. And this is what most fundamentally distinguishes
the intentionality of volition from that of thought or perception; this is
what makes it a practical intentionality.
Indeed, what most strikingly distinguishes volition from thought or
perception is the causal efficacy of volition. Whereas I represent the world
in thinking, I seek to affect the world in acting, by causing my bodily
movement through my own volition. Thus, willing my digging causes
my movement in digging and thereby executes my action: that is what
makes the volition a practical intentional activity. By contrast, thinking
that I am digging does not in itself cause my movement in digging; nor
does kinesthetically sensing my movement cause my movement – quite
the reverse. And not only does my volition cause my movement, but
in willing I experience the causal relation between my willing and my
movement (my awareness of causation being confirmed by my kinesthetic
and perceptual awareness of my movement). In this way the ontology and
phenomenology of action come together in causation.
Still, as different as practical and cognitive intentionality are, they share
a familiar ontological structure: the “act-content-object” structure articulated by Husserl and others of the Brentano tradition. For the case of
thought, this structure is outlined in the following principles:
1. An act of thinking has a certain content (a thought or proposition)
that represents – semantically prescribes, or is satisfied by – a certain
object (a state of affairs).
2. The same object can be represented in different ways, that is, in acts
of thinking with different contents.
3. An act of thinking may have a content but no object (a false thought
represents no actual state of affairs); or it may have an object that
does not exactly fit the content.
4. The object of an act of thinking always transcends the content of
the act, in that there are more aspects of the object than can be
138 Mind World
represented in the content. (This applies not only to the state of
affairs represented, or thought to obtain, but to the constituent
objects thought “about.”)
5. An act of thinking is intentionally related to an object if and only if
the act has a certain content and that content prescribes, or is satisfied
by, the object – that is, the intentional relation is the composition
of the relations of entertaining and (successfully) prescribing.17
Similarly, for the case of action:
1. An action includes a bodily movement and a volition that has a
certain content that prescribes a certain object, namely, the action
itself.
2. The same action can be willed in different ways, that is, in volitions with different volitional contents (including contents that vary in
complexity).
3. A volition may have a content but no object (where the volitional
content is not satisfied, when the attempted action fails, as in missing the nail with the hammer, or when no movement ensues, as
in paralysis); or a volition may produce a movement or effect that
does not exactly fit the volitional content (say, in executing a ballet
step).
4. The action willed (including the bodily movement) always transcends the content of the volition, in that there are more aspects of
the action (e.g., bodily nuances, causal effects, and cultural significances) than can be represented in the content.
5. The intentional relation between a volition and an action consists in
the volition’s having a certain content and the action’s satisfying
the content.
Notice (again) that this intentional relation is distinct from the causal
relation between the volition and the movement in the action (although
the causal relationship is part of the conditions of satisfaction of the
volition’s content). That is why action is an “intentional,” not merely a
causal, phenomenon.
The principle of transcendence (4) is a point of special importance.
The beauty of action in practice is that the content of my volition may
be most minimal (“dig this hole,” “hit a spin serve there”), yet my bodily movement may be exceedingly complex, the result of years of practice, and my actions may be informed with deep cultural significance
(reflecting the role of gardens or games in our culture) – with little or
Consciousness in Action 139
none of these complexities being explicitly represented in the content
of my volition itself. The writings of Heidegger and Merleau-Ponty, and
Wittgenstein too, are rich in suggestions of this transcendence. However,
we should not infer (as some of their interpreters are wont to infer) that
there is no such thing as intentional content – or, indeed, consciousness –
in action. In the (post)modern metaphor: the form of bodily movement
in an action may be “compiled” from vast complexities of neural-network
activities, and the form-of-action itself from a vast cultural network of
interlocking forms of action, although the volition that consciously executes the action carries only the most minimal content. The job of phenomenology of action is to characterize such contents carefully, defining
their intentional force and, in a larger context, their limits as well. (The
larger context is the domain of “connectionisms,” tracing neural, conceptual, and cultural networks.)
The Bodily “I” in Action
The body plays a central role in practical intentionality (as long as we are
not gods or angels). Not only does action itself involve bodily movement,
but the experience of acting involves an awareness of oneself as an acting,
bodily “I.”
In my action of digging, my body in fact plays three distinct roles: as
part, means, and end of action. First, the movement of my body is part of
the action. Second, this movement (caused by my volition) causes the
intended effect of the shovel’s dislodging earth in the garden. Third, the
content of my volition prescribes a certain movement of my body (caused
by the volition).
By contrast, the body plays no such essential roles in most cognitive
intentional activities. Thoughts about one’s body make intentional reference to one’s body, but thinking does not make use of the body in the way
that digging or running does. (I“use” my brain in thinking, but that is another matter.) To be sure, there are indirect ways in which thinking may
involve bodily action, for instance, the ways in which thinking depends
on the use of language, especially while thinking “out loud.” But the role
of the body in such thinking is very different from its role in action. Perception is the one cognitive intentional activity in which the body plays a
role like that in action. For not only does vision involve a causal relation
(barring hallucination) between one’s environment, one’s body (eyes),
and one’s visual experience; the content of the visual experience also
prescribes the causal relation, and so makes intentional reference to the
140 Mind World
perceiver’s body.18 Moreover, one must (normally) turn one’s head and
eyes in the direction of an object in order to see it, whence the perception
itself presupposes this simple action, which involves bodily awareness.
Now, in my action of digging, I both move and experience my bodily
movement. Or, better, I experience myself moving. But I do not experience myself as a disembodied, or even disembodiable, “I” that wills the
movement of “this body” and receives kinesthetic and visual images of
the movement. Perhaps I experience myself as a purely mental “I” when
I think: cogito, ergo sum. (Or do I? It was only through a strenuous course
of argument that Descartes’s Meditations led to the conclusion that “I” am
a purely thinking being.) But when I dig and experience my digging, I
experience myself as a moving, acting, bodily being, and this is essential
to the structure of my experience of digging.
Thus, in the experience of acting, in the structure of volition, we find a
certain element of self-awareness. In our phenomenological description
of my experience of digging, this mode of self-awareness is indicated by
the word “I”:
In this volition I am now willing that I am digging this hole with this
shovel.
The volition itself occurs against the background of, and presupposes,
kinesthetic and perceptual experiences whose structure we describe so:
In this kinesthesis I am now sensing my hands closed as if around
a shovel handle and my arms moving forward and upward as if in
digging.
In this visual experience I am now seeing this shovel in my hands
moving this earth.
What is the force of this content “I” in the experience of acting – in the
volition and in the accompanying kinesthesis and perception?
The word “I” occurs twice in our description of the volition.19 Thus,
the content “I am digging...” prescribes the action willed. Clearly, this
content presupposes that “I,” the agent, am an embodied being capable
of moving in a digging way, and moving volitionally. Now, the reflexive
content “In this volition I am now willing . . .” characterizes my inner
awareness of my willing. But while willing does not itself include bodily movement, this content nonetheless presupposes that “I,” the willing
subject, am capable of action and thus embodied, because what “I” will
is that “I” (the same being) am digging. Thus, the intentional force of
Consciousness in Action 141
the content “I,” in both occurrences, is that of prescribing an embodied
agent. This prescription is further supported by the content “I” in the accompanying kinesthesis and perception. For the kinesthetic experience
presents “my” bodily movement, movement of this same bodily “I.” And
the visual experience also presents “my” bodily movement, “me” moving,
from a different perspective. So, again, the “I” so experienced is a bodily
“I.” I also experience myself as a subject of kinesthesis and perception,
through the reflexive contents “in this kinesthesis I sense...” and “in
this visual experience I see . . .” In my overall experience in action, then,
I experience myself as a being that sees things, feels bodily movement,
and wills and performs actions.
In acting, we might say, I experience myself as body, I experience “I”
as “my body,” “me-body.” Indeed, in the idiom of an older English, we are
“bodies” as much as “persons” or “selves.” We still say, “Is anybody home?”
And, the old lyric says, “When a body meets a body, comin’ through the
rye.” In today’s English, however, we tend to associate more physiology
and physics with the word “body.”
Indeed, the object of this complex experience of oneself in acting
transcends what the content “I” prescribes of it. (This accords with the
principle of transcendence noted earlier, for practical as for cognitive
intentionality.) In particular, what natural science has to say about this
living-moving-willing “body” that “I” am is quite different from what
my experience in action tells me about it. The phenomenology of action, body, and self is one story, their physics and physiology quite
another.20
In the context of action theory, then, we need to address not the
familiar, Cartesian mind-body problem (how can a mental event of
volition cause a physical event of body movement?) but, instead, the
body-body problem: what is the relation between the consciously-willing
“body” and the physiological “body,” between the body-as-it-appears-inthe-experience-of-acting and the body-in-itself-in-physical-nature?21
Notes
1. This kind of theory of intentionality is characterized in Smith 1989. Its locus
classicus is in Husserl’s work, according to the interpretation in Smith and
McIntyre 1982; its history, beginning in Aristotle, is traced in Sajama and
Kamppinen 1987. Where I speak of the “structure” of an experience of acting,
I understand structure as “content” in that traditional sense. However, I wish
to remain neutral here on the ontology of contents, as the results presented
here can accommodate different conceptions of content.
142 Mind World
2. In his modern classic “Mental Events” Davidson (1980) argued that these
two levels of theory cannot be crossed by bridge laws relating the mental and
physical (especially as cause and effect), although the two levels are ultimately
about the same events albeit differently described: thus, Davidson’s “anomalous monism.” My point here is that the problem of action’s being caused
by volition already arises at the level of phenomenological or mentalistic
psychology.
3. See Merleau-Ponty 1962: “Part One: The Body.” Also, on “incarnate meaning” in Merleau-Ponty, see Dreyfus 1982. An elaboration of a partly MerleauPontian theory of action is found in Dreyfus and Wakefield 1988.
4. See Gibson 1979. A Merleau-Pontian reading of Gibson is developed in
Blinder 1986.
5. Among recent action theorists, Hector-Neri Castaneda and John Searle as- ˜
sume the intentionality of action is a species of intentionality in the sense
characterized by Brentano and Husserl. See Castaneda ˜ 1975 and Searle 1983.
However, the issue of intentionality in the Brentano-Husserl sense is not
explicit – so as to point toward a bona fide theory of intentionality for intention and action – in the earlier classics of action theory, for example, in
Wittgenstein 1953, Anscombe 1959, Melden 1961, and Davidson’s “Actions,
Reasons, and Causes,” in Davidson 1980.
6. The sense of body in action was elaborated by Husserl and Merleau-Ponty.
See Husserl 1989 and Merleau-Ponty 1962. Cf. Russow 1988. What is at issue in “bodily intentionality,” in the Merleau-Pontian claim that the body has
a unique form of intentionality that is not reducible to the intentionality of
thought? Does“bodily intentionality” mean embodied intentionality, say, in perception and action? Or, does it mean awareness of one’s body, in perception
and action? Or, does it mean the body itself as experienced in perception and
action, the body at a certain level of intentional description?
7. Cf. Penfield 1975: 76. Searle (1983, pp. 89ff.) stresses the point made here,
but he calls the volition “intention-in-action.”
8. This reflexive form of “inner awareness” of an experience is explicated in
Smith 1989: chap. 2; a shorter version is presented in Smith 1986. There
I draw upon, and critique, Sartre’s doctrine of “prereflective cogito” and
Brentano’s doctrine of secondary intentionality (that every mental act includes a consciousness of itself as well as a consciousness of its object). See
Brentano 1973: 153ff. and Sartre 1966: introd. Importantly, I concur with
Castaneda ˜ ’s analysis of the first-person form of the content of an intention,
carrying the same form over into volition; thus, Castaneda would use the ˜
“quasi indicator” “he himself” to form a third-person attribution of the form
of volition, as in “Smith intends/wills [himself] to pick up that* shovel,” that
is,“Smith intends/wills that he himself pick up that* shovel” (where “that*”is
the quasi indicator that invokes Smith’s own visual perspective on the shovel
before him). See Castaneda ˜ 1975: chap. 6. One terminological difference:
Castaneda says what is intended is not an action, and I say it is; but by ˜ “action”
he means a type of event, or action-type, whereas I mean a particular event,
or action-token.
Consciousness in Action 143
9. Searle describes this “experience of causation” in Searle 1983: chap. 3. I
essentially concur, observing similar details of content, except that I replace
intention in action with volition. Cf. Castaneda ˜ ’s explication of what he calls
the “internal causality of practical thinking” (1975: chap. 10).
10. The volition is intentionally related to, or successfully “of,” an event – an
action – if and only if the content of the volition (successfully) prescribes,
or (inversely) is satisfied by, that event. In Searle’s idiom, which I take to
be equivalent, the action is the “condition(s) of satisfaction” of the volition’s
content (see Searle 1983: 80). The action, on the present analysis, comprises
the occurrence of a bodily movement together with the volition’s causing the
movement and (as the case goes) the bodily movement’s causing the shovel
to move appropriately. For further elaboration of this notion of intentional
relation and the role of content in intentional relations, see Smith 1989:
introd. and chap. 4.
11. Searle distinguishes prior intention from intention in action (see Searle
1983: chap. 3) because he assumes the intention-in-action causes the action.
I take it that by “intention in action” he means what I have called the volition
in the action. However, Searle tends to use the word “volition” differently
than I. First he talks of the “traditional category” of volition (p. 31), including desire as opposed to intention. Then, introducing “the experience of
acting” as a term of art for the intention in action, he disparages “what some
philosophers have called volitions or acts of willing” because our experiences
of acting “are not acts at all” (pp. 88–89). I agree with his point, but I prefer
the term “volition” or “willing” where he uses “intention in action” because
“intending”sounds like a passive state rather than a causally efficacious event.
12. On Davidson’s broadly Aristotelian model, the desire to achieve a certain
end (or “pro-attitude” toward it) together with the belief that-doing-A-willachieve-that-end normally tends to cause the action of doing A – on pain of
weakness of will. See “Actions, Reasons and Causes” and “Weakness of Will,”
both in Davidson 1980. On the present model, the desire and belief may
give rise to the intention to do A, but there is still slack (as philosophers
from Plato to Davidson have felt): the intention is not sure to produce the
action, as volition may not kick in. Thus, “weakness of will” is here weakness
of intention. That is why volition must be distinguished from intention: it is
volition, and not yet intention of desire-plus-belief, that is causally effective
and issues in action. Michael Bratman has stressed the role of planning in
action: see Bratman 1987. On the present model, planning would be part
of the process of framing an intention in response to desire plus belief (although Bratman distinguishes planning theories from belief-desire theories
of action). I would resist the assumption that all actions involve something
like a deliberate and deliberative plan; if plans are to be an essential part
of action, then the notion of plan must be watered down to something like
the content of an intention (which is not necessarily the result of deliberate
planning).
13. Skills belong to what Searle calls the “Background” of an intentional state, as
distinct from the “Network” of beliefs associated with the content of the
144 Mind World
intentional state. See Searle 1983: chap. 5. Heidegger stresses the background cultural practices on which everyday activities depend, their historical formation, and our implicit understanding of their significance. See
Heidegger 1962: secs. III and V. Sartre sets every action within a larger, guiding “project”; see Sartre 1966: part 4. Developing his interpretation of
Merleau-Ponty and Heidegger, Dreyfus stresses skills, formed by cultural
practices, as virtually definitive of action; see Dreyfus and Wakefield 1988
and Dreyfus 1991: 55ff.
14. An intentional relation is the “semantic” relation that holds between an
intentional experience, or its content, and its object. I have argued elsewhere
against collapsing intentional relations with causal relations, in particular, in
the analysis of perception. See Smith 1989: especially chap. 4. Similarly, I
here oppose collapsing them in the case of action or, rather, volition. I read
Searle as of like mind in his discussion of the experience of causation (see
again Searle 1983: chaps. 3 and 4).
15. See Haugeland’s (1982) quasi-behaviorist or pragmatist interpretation of
Heidegger. Hubert Dreyfus, drawing alternately on Heidegger and MerleauPonty, has long argued against Husserl and cognitive science on grounds that
they impute too much cognitive structure in situations where human beings
simply act, drawing on nonintentional skills and extant human practices.
See the flow of argument in Dreyfus 1991. The most detailed explication
of his views relevant to my issues here is in Drefyus and Wakefield 1988.
I believe the present account of action is consistent with their insights in
that essay, although Dreyfus would disagree. The outstanding problem is to
articulate – in still greater detail – the interdependence in action among
conscious intentional events (volition, kinesthesis, perception, etc.), nonintentional states (skills, habits, etc.), bodily states (including neural network
states), and social states (invoking cultural practices, etc.). It is essential, in
any event, to detail carefully the limits of the contents of volition in various
types of actions. But all this must await another occasion.
16. See Castaneda ˜ 1975: 280ff.
17. These basic principles about intentionality are expounded in Smith and
McIntyre 1982: chap. 1, and further explicated in following chapters.
18. Details of this intentional relationship are explored in Searle 1983: chap. 4
and Smith 1989: chap. 1.
19. The structure of self-awareness here described follows the pattern in Smith
1989: chap. 2. In the idiom of that work, the content “In this volition I am
now willing...” is the modality of presentation in the volition, including the
mode of inner awareness of oneself, and the content “I am digging...” is
the mode of presentation of the action in the volition.
20. Accordingly, Husserl distinguished two conceptions of body, that of the
“lived” or “living body” (Leib, from the verb leben, meaning “to live”) and the
“physical body” (Korper ¨ , from the Latin corpus, for “body”). See Husserl 1989:
sec. 38 on Leib as “organ of will,” and Husserl 1954: sec. 28ff. Merleau-Ponty
(1962) followed Husserl’s lead, distinguishing “phenomenal” and “physical”
body.
Consciousness in Action 145
21. Addressing eliminative materialism, Arthur Danto (1985) used the felicitous
phrase “the body-body problem,” independently.
References
Anscombe, G. E. M. 1959. Intention. Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
Blinder, David. 1986. “A New Look at Vision.” Topoi 5: 137–48.
Bratman, Michael. 1987. Intention, Plans, and Practical Reason. Cambridge, Mass.:
Harvard University Press.
Brentano, Franz. 1973. Psychology from an Empirical Standpoint. Translated by A. C.
Rancurello, D. B. Terrell, and L. L. McAlister. London: Routledge and Kegan
Paul. German original, 1874.
Castaneda, Hector-Neri. ˜ 1975. Thinking and Doing. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Danto, Arthur. 1985. “The Body-Body Problem.” Paper presented as a University
Lecture at Columbia University, 13 November.
Davidson, Donald. 1980. Essays on Actions and Events. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.
Dreyfus, Hubert. 1982. “Husserl’s Perceptual Noema.” In Dreyfus, ed., Husserl,
Intentionality and Cognitive Science, pp. 97–123. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
1991. Being-in-the-World. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Dreyfus, Hubert, and Jerome Wakefield. 1988. “Action and the First Person.”
Unpublished manuscript, 25 February.
Gibson, James J. 1979. The Ecological Approach to Visual Perception. Boston:
Houghton Mifflin.
Haugeland, John. 1982. “Heidegger on Being a Person.” Nousˆ 16(1): 15–26.
Heidegger, Martin. 1962. Being and Time. Translated by John Macquarrie and
Edward Robinson. New York: Harper and Row. German original, 1927.
Husserl, Edmund. 1954. The Crisis of European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology. Translated by David Carr. Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University
Press. German original, ed. Walter Biemel, 1954 (posthumous).
1989. Ideas Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and Phenomenological Philosophy,
Second Book: Studies in the Phenomenology of Constitution. Translated by Richard
Rojcewicz and Andre Schuwer. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers. ´
German original, 1952, from 1915 manuscript.
Melden, A. I. 1961. Free Action. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul.
Merleau-Ponty, Maurice. 1962. Phenomenology of Perception. Translated by Colin
Smith. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul. French original, 1943.
Penfield, Wilder. 1975. The Mystery of the Mind. Princeton: Princeton University
Press.
Russow, Lily-Marlene. 1988. “Merleau-Ponty and the Myth of Bodily Intentionality.” Nousˆ 22(1): 35–47.
Sajama, Seppo, and Matti Kamppinen. 1987. A Historical Introduction to Phenomenology. New York: Croom Helm.
146 Mind World
Sartre, Jean-Paul. 1966. Being and Nothingness. Translated by Hazel Barnes. New
York: Washington Square Press. French original, 1943.
Searle, John. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1986. “The Structure of (Self-)Consciousness.” Topoi
5(2): 149–56.
1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Wittgenstein, Ludwig. 1953. Philosophical Investigations. Translated by G. E. M.
Anscombe. New York: Macmillan.
5
Background Ideas
Abstract. Here we study the background of intentionality and what I call background ideas. This chapter shows how everyday experiences depend for their
intentional force on ideas extant in one’s background culture. These ideas
are abstract meaning entities (as in the classical Husserlian model of intentionality), but they arise only in particular historical cultures (they do not
exist in a Fregean or Platonic heaven of ideas). And they could not mean
what they do without that cultural background. Accordingly, the content
of one’s thinking, perceiving, willing, and so forth depends ontologically
on one’s background culture.
Segue. In “Consciousness in Action” we showed that our experience is not
isolated within a solitary subject or disembodied mind: our conscious bodily
actions are carried out in a physical and indeed social context, and that is
part of their intentional content, their volitional meaning. But there is
a further, logical reason why consciousness itself normally implicates the
social world in which we live. For, as we see in the present chapter, the
contents of our intentional experiences are themselves typically composed
of concepts and rules of practice that are drawn from and depend on a
rich background of ideas that form part of the cultural context in which we
live. Normally, then, consciousness is not only embodied but en-cultured.
This aspect of consciousness requires a sensitive basic ontology, as we shall
explore in later chapters.
The world is so you have something to stand on.
Krauss and Sendak, A Hole Is to Dig
For various discussions and/or comments on an early draft of this essay, I thank Christian
Beyer, Chuck Dement, Dagfinn Føllesdal, Peter Simons, Barry Smith, Amie Thomasson,
and Richard Tieszen. For their contributions to the argument for the background, I am
indebted to discussions with Hubert Dreyfus and John Searle. For the opportunity to discuss
relevant texts at length, I thank the students in my seminar at the University of California,
Irvine, winter quarter, 1994.
147
148 Mind World
Here I want to develop a conception of the background of intentionality
and explore the status of what I call background ideas. I draw on writings of
Searle and Wittgenstein as well as Husserl, but the framework to unfold –
part phenomenology, part ontology – differs from theirs.
Background
The theory of ideas – contents of mental acts or states – weaves through
nearly all of philosophy since its inception. Different strands of theory
come together finally in Husserl’s analysis of intentionality, where we find
the most effective theory of ideas yet developed. Drawing on Brentano’s
revival of the medieval conception of intentio, and Bolzano’s distinction
between objective and subjective ideas, Husserl wove together two long
lines of theory: the theory of content in intentional acts of thinking,
perceiving, and the like, and the theory of content in logical assertion and
argument (both types of theory tracing back to Aristotle). On Husserl’s
theory, an idea is an objective, abstract (“ideal”) entity: not a universal (a
property or type) but a concept, proposition, image – a meaning (Sinn).
Its role in thought and/or language is to prescribe (semantically) an
object to which an act of thought or speech refers if this idea is its content.
This doctrine is foundational to Husserl’s phenomenology, and it leads
into the role of ideas in consciousness, knowledge, action, language, logic,
and (arguably in today’s computer languages) computation.
Yet ideas are notoriously difficult to get our hands on. Not only are
they abstract entities, nonspatiotemporal and nonperceivable, but they
are normally quite distant from our awareness: only in theoretical reflection do we focus on ideas themselves, in phenomenology or semantics or
psychology. What’s more, many of our ideas, about friends or family, are
never brought to consciousness, as Freudian psychoanalysis has argued.
Similarly, Nietzsche’s moral psychology unearthed cultural ideas of ressentiment and “nobility” with an ancient genealogy. Indeed, ideas of value
and culture shape our experience and behavior without our acknowledgment, in ways analyzed by Levi-Strauss, Foucault, Derrida, Kristeva.
More basically, our phenomenological sense of “being” and of “beingwith-others” lies at the periphery of our experience, in ways analyzed by
Heidegger and Sartre. Indeed, our fundamental ideas about the world
are seldom voiced or articulated in any way.
One’s thought or action is directed toward something in the world, as
Husserl said, by virtue of a particular content or idea in one’s mind. But
its intentionality is dependent on other ideas in the background of the
Background Ideas 149
act. These background ideas are at work around us all the time, yet we
are not aware of them without considerable effort. Such effort we find in
the theory of background and of background ideas, which exercise us in
the explorations to follow.
The Emerging Concept of Background
A mental act of perception, thought, volition, imagination, and the like
is said to be intentional insofar as it is “of” or “about” something, and
in that sense it “intends” or is directed toward something. On a broadly
Husserlian theory, each act of consciousness is performed or experienced
by a subject and directed via a content or idea toward some object (typically
outside consciousness). The act’s content Husserl called a “noema,” a
technical term (found in Aristotle) for what in modern English we call
“idea.”1
Now, an act can represent or intend something only against a background of other phenomena including beliefs, attitudes, norms, and
bodily skills. Convergent accounts of background have emerged, in
very different idioms, in writings of Husserl, Heidegger, Merleau-Ponty,
Wittgenstein, and most recently John Searle and Hubert Dreyfus.2 I find
these accounts convincing but in need of a wider framework of ontology
cum phenomenology.
I shall lay out a theory of the background holding in brief that:
1. Our intentional acts presuppose a background of beliefs, skills, emotions, values, social practices, physical conditions including neural
states, and more.
2. A crucial part of this background is our fundamental, open-ended
background image of the world around us, indicating how things are
as well as how we do things, even how we use our bodies.
3. This background image consists of intentional contents, or ideas, including concepts, propositions, values, rules of practice, and items
of know-how presupposed in the activities of people in the relevant
community.
4. This relation of presupposition between an intentional act and its
background is a relation of ontological dependence.
The background is, then, part of the ground or substrate of intentionality: what makes it possible and enables it to work as it does, the
preconditions or conditions of the possibility of intentionality. In terms
of the notion of dependence or, in Husserl’s formal ontology, “founding”
150 Mind World
(Fundierung): intentionality depends or is founded on certain background
conditions, that is, the act could not be directed as it is – this intention
could not exist – unless these conditions existed.3
For Searle the background consists of practical capacities or know-how,
which takes over where intentional states like belief leave off. What Searle
has christened “Background” (with a capital ‘B’) – namely, know-how –
will emerge as only a part of a wider background of intentionality (we will
drop the capital B).
Searle’s inspiration was Wittgenstein’s On Certainty.
4 The crucial notion there was that of “fundamental empirical propositions” in our background “world picture.” Such “ground propositions” (for instance, that
here is a hand) form the foundation of our beliefs about the world around
us and merge with our rules of practice. To develop a proper conception
of the background, we must see that these ground propositions not only
are part of the epistemological foundation for various beliefs (conferring
evidence) but, along with cognate rules of practice, are part of the ontological foundation of various forms of intentionality. A related notion
(presumably unknown to Wittgenstein) was Heidegger’s notion of“basic”
or “ground” concepts, concepts of the ontological ground of human activity (our“being”).5 And the notion of ontological foundation or ground
was developed by Husserl, we noted, as part of his formal ontology (and
was known to Heidegger).
Wittgenstein’s notion of our background world picture can be developed further in terms of Husserl’s prior notion of the “life world” or
“human world”6 (a precursor to Heidegger’s notion of “world” as in human “being-in-the-world”). Our everyday “sense” of the world forms our
background world picture, which depicts the world as we know it in everyday life, the life world. In Husserlian terms, this world picture is a construct of intentional contents or“noemata,” embracing concepts, images,
propositions, and volitions, modified by attitudes (“thetic characters”)
of perception, belief, emotion, and the like.
Our background world picture is empirical and highly contingent. It
is in many ways a product of human activity, a cultural artifact developed
tacitly over thousands of generations. Accordingly, the ontological status
of our world picture, of its component ideas or images, is not that of
Platonic or Fregean “thoughts” cum norms in a Platonic heaven. Rather,
their status is akin to artworks as characterized by Roman Ingarden drawing on Husserl’s account of cultural objects: they are objectively existing
abstract entities (so far Platonic), yet they are brought into existence and
maintained in existence by acts of consciousness (no longer Platonic).7
Background Ideas 151
In the background of our everyday perceptions, thoughts, and actions,
then, are ideas wrought by prior human experience and practice, ultimately by prior intentional acts. Intentionality typically thus depends not
only on the subject’s states of belief, skill, and the like, realized in his or
her brain, but also on ideas that are extant in the subject’s community.
These background ideas have a life of their own outside any individual’s
mind: they are (a) abstract meaning entities and (b) cultural artifacts.
But if background ideas are abstract, cultural artifacts, ultimately so are
all intentional contents or ideas. This crucial point about the ontology of
ideas flows naturally, but surprisingly, from the emerging theory of the
background.
The Content Theory plus the Background
Let us recount the classical content theory of intentionality and see how
it is extended with the notion of background.
The content theory has its locus classicus in Husserl; it has been
reconstructed in California phenomenology, and reincarnated in,
who?, Searle.8 According to this theory, an intentional state or actof-consciousness is experienced by a subject (“I”), has a content, and
through its content “intends” or is intentionally related to an object
(if such exists). So the structure of an intentional relation between actsubject and object is this:
I — act — content ——> object.
The content is a percept, concept, thought-proposition, volition: an idea.
The content prescribes the object as having certain properties. (The short
arrow depicts this part of the intentional relation; the long arrow depicts
the whole intentional relation of act by subject to object through content.) In Husserl’s version of the story, content mediates the intentional
relation much as sense mediates reference in language. In Searle’s variation, the content determines the “conditions of satisfaction” of the actstate, the conditions under which the intentional state would be satisfied.
(Let us bracket worries about the self and keep a role for ego or “I” in
intentionality.)
But the theory of the background says the story is not finished. For
an intentional state or act does not occur in isolation but is connected,
as Husserl and Searle argue, with a system of beliefs the subject holds
about the object or kind of object intended. These beliefs Searle calls
the “network,” and they are part of what Husserl called the “horizon”
152 Mind World
of the act.9 Now, the act presupposes, and so its intentionality depends on,
a network of background beliefs whose contents are associated with the
content of the act. In a picture:
network of belief |—— < I — act — content ——> object >.
10
(Here the T-bar depicts the relation of ontological dependence.) The
intentional relationship itself depends on a network of beliefs. For instance, when I see yonder bird, my visual experience, whose content is
“that gliding turkey vulture,” presupposes my background beliefs about
birds, for instance, that birds have wings.
But still the story is not finished, says the background theorist. The
intentionality of an act depends on a background of further conditions
that are not tacit beliefs or any other kind of intentional state, but
rather... what? Searle proposes a background of skills: bodily habits, or
dispositions of the nervous system, glossed as “capacities.” When I see
a turkey vulture overhead (not Searle’s example), my visual experience
rests on my capacity or ability to turn my head and focus my eyes, my
ability to recognize a turkey vulture in flight, my bird-watching knowhow. These mind-brain states are not themselves intentional states, but
they are an indispensable background of intentionality – in ways to be
specified.
And still the story is unfinished. As I watch the turkey vulture overhead,
my visual experience presupposes not only various of my personal beliefs
and bodily skills, but also a broad complex of communal assumptions
about the world in which we live. Wittgenstein called this complex our
“background” “world picture.” Our world picture, he said, includes our
“fundamental empirical propositions,” for instance, that here is a hand,
that I have two feet, that the earth has existed for a long time.11 These
are “ground propositions” about the world in which we live, propositions
that describe the world as we deal with it in basic ways in everyday life.
Such propositions, Wittgenstein observed, shade off into rules of practice,
governing not only linguistic activity (language games) but also bodily
activity (walking across the room, with my two feet, or sitting in the chair,
without checking to see that it has legs). For Wittgenstein, then, the background would consist of fundamental propositions shading into rules of
practice. What Searle has done, in effect, is to bring the background rules
indoors, from the surrounding community into the individual’s nervous
system: not as rules followed in unconscious mental execution but as neural states that produce behavior in accord with the rules in the community
(rule-governed, not rule-following behavior, as Searle rightly stresses).12
Background Ideas 153
Precisely what goes into the background – beliefs, skills, propositions,
or norms? When we appreciate the ontology of the background, we
should see that this is not an either-or question. Intentional activities
may depend, ontologically, on all these types of entities.
When the background is brought in, I propose, the structure of intentionality looks like this:
background |—— < I — act — content ——> object >.
On this content-background theory, the intentionality of an act – the relationship binding subject, act, content, and object – depends on a
background that includes a network of associated beliefs and a system
of practical capacities realized in neural pathways13and a framework of
background ideas that form our basic image of the world. In this way the
background is part of the operative context of the act, but it is not part
of the act’s content.
The Argument for the Background
To begin to motivate the notion of background, Searle uses an observation of Wittgenstein.14 Consider a drawing of a man walking on a hillside.
Nothing in the drawing itself determines that it is a picture of a man walking forward uphill rather than a man sliding backward downhill. Only
relative to an interpretation, an assumption about what the man is doing,
can we see the picture one way rather than the other. Now, the background is like that, Searle suggests: an intentional state can represent
one state of affairs rather than another – it can have one set of conditions
of satisfaction rather than another – only against a background of “assumptions” or capacities that enable it to represent as it does. The scare
quotes warn that, for Searle and Wittgenstein, what seem to be assumptions are often not belief states at all, even deeply unconscious ones, but
something akin to “know-how.” These issues emerge more clearly as we
proceed.
The most compelling argument for the background goes by example.15 Searle aptly draws this form of argument out of Wittgenstein’s
On Certainty, even though Wittgenstein was arguing in a different direction and had no explicit conception of intentionality. Searle also adapts
Wittgenstein’s argument about rule following: one cannot follow a rule to
follow a rule, on pain of infinite regress. The rule argument, however, applies only to intentional action (which might be mistaken to consist always
in following a rule), surely not to perception, emotion, contemplation, or
154 Mind World
other kinds of intentional state. So we shall develop here the argument
by example. This style of argument incorporates a phenomenological
minimalism, which argues against overpopulating our phenomenology
with too many representations – a stance Hubert Dreyfus derives from
Heideggerian phenomenology.16 To feel the force of this argumentation,
we need to describe, patiently, a number of different types of intentional
activity.
Consider a simple intentional action like walking:17
I am walking, with the conscious experience of so walking.
My action depends on my fundamental knowledge about walking, for
instance:
I “know” that the earth does not move as I walk on it.
Is that item of “knowledge” a belief I hold? Is the proposition “the earth
does not move as I walk on it” any part of the content of my conscious experience of walking?18 No. But is it a belief I hold, not a conscious thought
or judgment but a tacit and unconscious belief, a “silent” background belief presupposed by my experience of walking, including my intention or
volition in walking? Perhaps, but consider what happens next:
As I am walking, an earthquake strikes the area and I feel the earth
rolling, like a wave beneath me, as I try to walk on.
Before the earthquake, before my rock-and-roll experience, I did not
have an active belief to the effect that the earth does not move. Of course,
I knew about earthquakes and I had an intellectual belief something like
that. But that belief played no role in my experience of walking. It was not
even a background belief presupposed by my experience of walking. This is
debatable, but as we expand the range of ostensible background beliefs,
it grows gradually implausible that all this cognitive structure is really
used somehow, genuinely presupposed, by my simply walking along: on
the ground, on the surface of the earth – where else?
Maybe this sort of fundamental knowledge or“belief”is a skill, an item
of know-how rather than knowing-that. That is the line taken by Searle and
by Dreyfus (Searle drawing on Wittgenstein and Dreyfus on Heidegger
and Merleau-Ponty). Still, I think it is not right. To see why not, we have
to dig into Wittgenstein’s original intuitions about the background. This
sort of “belief,” we shall find, is somehow deeper than the beliefs carried
“in my head”: it is part of our communal world picture, on which my
belief states themselves rest.
Background Ideas 155
Take another example, not an action but a simple visual experience:
I see that turkey vulture gliding over the meadow.
Now:
I believe that birds fly through the air.
I believe that wings enable birds to fly above the surface of the earth.
I believe that the earth has an atmosphere of nitrogen, oxygen, and
so on.
I believe that the earth is a globe floating in space.
I believe that the earth is very old.
Are these beliefs part of the network of background beliefs presupposed
by the content of my visual perception? Perhaps the first two, but not the
last ones. Although I do believe these things, they play no role in my visual
experience. As the content of my experience fans out to associated content, to background presuppositions, the horizon of my perception soon
reaches a boundary beyond which the “propositions” that seem required
in order to make sense of “what I see” are either abstract or scientifically
informed beliefs or, well, not really beliefs at all. My wider knowledge
of the world takes over, some merely practical and some pointing to the
knowledge of experts. I know that I cannot fly, that birds can. But this
“knowledge” is as much know-how as know-that, as much practical skill as
theoretical belief. The problem of the background (in Searle’s sense, with
an eye to Wittgenstein) begins with the problem of where to draw this
boundary, where bona fide intentional content leaves off and practical
know-how or skill takes over.
Consider now a purely intellectual, conscious activity of thought. Re-
flecting on a recent earthquake,
I think that the earth does not normally roll beneath me as I walk.
There are a great many collateral beliefs I would seem to hold:
The earth is a mass of dirt I may walk on.
The earth has hills and valleys I may walk on.
The earth is molten iron covered by a crust of dirt.
The earth is a roughly spherical body.
The earth is one of nine planets that orbit the sun.
The dirt in California is a dry powder in summer.
The earth has existed for a long, long time.
There has been no rain hereabouts (in California) for some time.
156 Mind World
There is no mud underfoot as I walk across this hill.
I weigh 175 pounds.
I weigh the same as my brother.
I move my feet in this way [an image] when I walk uphill.
I have two feet.
I use both my feet when I walk.
I believe all of these things. Yet which of these propositions are contents
of bona fide beliefs in the background of my consciously thinking “the
earth does not normally roll beneath me as I walk”? Is it that I actually
believe all of these things, or only that I would reach such conclusions
quickly if I thought about such things? If these really are actual beliefs
I hold, albeit far from my consciousness in thinking “the earth does not
normally roll ... ,” do they play any role in my so thinking? Are these
beliefs engaged as background beliefs of my so thinking? Are they presupposed by my act of thinking, so that my thought actually depends on
them?
It is implausible that my thought actually engages – presupposes and so
depends on – all these beliefs. Potentially perhaps, but not actually. The
point is that sooner or later, as we list propositions to which I would assent
or propositions to which I could be expected to reason rather naturally
were I to think on and on about the earth and my walking – sooner or
later, it becomes implausible that all these beliefs are a proper part of
the system of background beliefs on which my thought actually depends.
And yet, we want to say, they are there, implicitly at least.
The preceding line of argument for the background has a form we
may summarize as follows. First, assume that an intentional act has a
content (which prescribes the object of consciousness). Second, from
examples observe that an act presupposes a variety of collateral beliefs
or knowledge as well as cognate practices and know-how. Third, from
plausibility considerations observe that these items are too much or too
inappropriate to be in the content itself. Finally, conclude that they form
a background presupposed by the act but not explicitly included in its
content.
The background of intentionality, then, includes our fundamental
“knowledge” or “assumptions” or “attitudes” about the world with which
we are dealing. But what sort of things are these “assumptions”? It remains to specify more carefully the ontology of the background, the type
of entities on which intentionality depends in the ways described: the
background ideas we regularly presuppose.
Background Ideas 157
Background Capacities or Know-How
The “assumptions”that form the background of our everyday intentional
activities outrun the range of beliefs plausibly presupposed by our activities.
Searle defines the background, in cases similar to those we considered,
as composed of “capacities.” In Intentionality Searle wrote (1983: 143):
The Background is a set of nonrepresentational mental capacities that enable all
representing to take place. Intentional states only have the conditions of satisfaction that they do, and thus only are the states that they are, against a Background
of abilities that are not themselves Intentional states. In order that I can now
have the Intentional states that I do I must have certain kinds of know-how: I
must know how things are and I must know how to do things, but the kinds of
“know-how” in question are not, in these cases, forms of “knowing that.”
The term Searle prefers for elements of the background is “capacities” or
“practices” (p. 156). Terms like “assumptions” or “presuppositions” are
misleading because they make background capacities sound like representational states, whereas these capacities are rather a kind of “know-how.”
Yet these capacities, Searle insists, are “explicitly mental.”
In The Rediscovery of the Mind (1992) Searle modified his conception
of the background. Consciousness, he there argues, is the defining character of mind: though caused by and realized in the nervous system, it is
an irreducibly “subjective” property of the mental. Accordingly, the background consists of dispositions of the nervous system: states of know-how
are unconscious capacities and so are properly identified with neural
dispositions and only misleadingly called “mental.” And the network of
beliefs Searle now places within the background: what we have wanted
to call unconscious beliefs (from psychoanalysis to cognitive science) are
better cast as dispositions of the nervous system – dispositions to produce conscious intentional states of thought or judgment. (Ironically,
Searle notes, this turns Ryle upside down, or rather inside out, or outside in: “mental” states are dispositions to produce not behavior but
consciousness.)
Clearly, however, the mental background of intentional states is wider
than what are appropriately called skills or capacities. Searle takes a step
toward widening the background when, considering collective intentions,
he writes:19
In addition to the biological capacity to recognize other people as importantly
like us, in a way that waterfalls, trees, and stones are not like us, it seems to
me that the capacity to engage in collective behavior requires something like a
158 Mind World
preintentional sense of “the other” as an actual or potential agent like oneself in
cooperative activities.
Now, our “sense” of things – of ourselves, of others, of our times and our
life world – lies partly in our preintentional practices or ways of dealing
with things. But it also lies partly in our intentional attitudes toward things,
in our image of our world, which is not reducible to skills or know-how.
Accordingly, we need a wider notion of background than what Searle
dubs “Background,” or even background of skills cum network of beliefs.
I want to reclaim the term “background” for this wider range of enabling
conditions of intentionality.
Our Background World Picture
Wittgenstein’s On Certainty Searle declares “one of the best books” on the
background.20 Indeed it is, and it leads to a trenchant notion of background. What I find most illuminating, along with the many concrete examples, is Wittgenstein’s conception of our background “world picture.”
For only against our basic if inchoate image of things can our intentional
states represent as they do. To those who read Wittgenstein as deeply
antimentalist, however, as squeezing the intentionality out of language
and even thought, I shall be reading Wittgenstein against himself as I
extract his account of our world picture as background of intentionality.
In On Certainty (remarks dating from 1949 into 1951) Wittgenstein
considered the kind of empirical propositions (Erfahrungssatze ¨ ) that
Moore said we can know with certainty, for example, that“here is a hand.”
These fundamental empirical propositions, Wittgenstein observed, form
our background “world picture” (Weltbild).21 They are the “ground”
(Grund) of our language game of questioning or doubting, against which
our whole practice of so doubting makes sense; in this role they are immune from doubt. But the term “ground” has two meanings: our grounds
are our reasons or evidence for empirical beliefs, but they are also the
“foundation” (Grundlage) or “fundament” (Fundament) of our empirical
beliefs. In Husserlian terms, they are “founded” or depend on, and in
that sense are presupposed by, our intentional activities of dealing with
the world around us, for instance, in walking, in seeing a gliding turkey
vulture, or in consciously thinking or judging about a bird maneuvering
in flight.
Wittgenstein says that our fundamental empirical propositions merge
with rules of their language game, part of their form of life. That is, bona
Background Ideas 159
fide propositions shade into a background of practical rules or norms. For
Quine, there is no sharp boundary between analytic and synthetic propositions, between logical and empirical propositions. Similarly, according
to Wittgenstein, there is no sharp boundary between fundamental empirical propositions and rules – rules of practice concerning our speaking
about and our dealing with things described by such propositions. (Remember that Wittgenstein took mathematical and logical propositions
as conventions: not claims of truth but decisions on how to talk.) So, for
Wittgenstein, many of the fundamental empirical propositions that articulate our world picture are not really propositions. That is, what plays the
role of grounding our thoughts and actions regarding the world are not
propositions that are contents of our beliefs but rather something outside
us, namely rules of our language games, rules of practice in our community. We learn, usually not explicitly, to think and act in accord with those
rules, with the forms of life in our community. Only in that sense do we
all know that we have hands or that the earth has been around a long
time. To simplify, this knowledge begins in propositional knowledge but
blends into know-how.
To carry such a line of argument further, in a different vein than
Wittgenstein himself did: it is not that we could not explicitly think or
judge such things – we could. But those thoughts do not serve to ground
our actions. They are the philosopher’s retrospective reflections. Even
where we hold such bona fide beliefs, because we are either philosophers or articulate artisans, these beliefs are not engaged in our everyday
activities of moving about the earth. There is no need for our holding
such thoughts, even in the form of unconscious beliefs, in order to act as
we do. We simply evolved in accord with a world of which these propositions are true. We take these things for granted, but many of them we have
never thought about, nor have we need to. Thus our thought and speech
rest on a background that runs from fundmental empirical propositions
that “everyone knows” to propositions accessible only through belabored
reflection, and on to rules of language, thought, and action that no one
need ever formulate explicitly.
There is an important difference, however, between Wittgenstein and
Searle on the background. For Wittgenstein, the elements of the background that outrun bona fide propositions are rules of practice, norms extant in the individual’s community. For Searle, however, the background
that outruns beliefs consists of practical capacities realized in one’s nervous system – if we may put it so, as dispositions to act and indeed to
experience in ways governed by the community’s rules of practice. Of
160 Mind World
course, the bona fide propositions that Wittgenstein finds in the background are intentional contents of the belief states that Searle initially
called the “network” and later subsumed under the “background.” However, the rules of practice Wittgenstein cites in the background cannot,
for Searle, be intentional contents of our background capacities, because
exercising these capacities cannot consist in following rules, on pain of
infinite regress (Searle following Wittgenstein on rule following). Accordingly, Searle repeatedly stresses, the background capacities that enable
intentional states to represent are themselves nonintentional, or preintentional. Thus, both background propositions and background rules
of practice lie outside the system of concrete mental-neural states that
Searle defines as “background.” Yet they are surely parts of the enabling
background of intentionality.
Wittgenstein’s notion of “form of life” (Lebensform) invites a still wider
conception of the background. The fundamental empirical propositions
that form our world picture might be cast as elements of communal
knowledge. Think of such propositions not in a Platonic-Fregean way
as eternal objects that represent states of affairs in the world. Think of
them rather as elements in a communal database, elements of knowledge
formed by one’s community as a whole. Sometimes they reside in explicit
beliefs in the minds of the experts, as in modern science or medieval
theology or Roman rhetoric. But often they reside rather in the practices of the community, available for explication by philosophers in due
time but normally only implicit in our forms of intentional activity, from
bodily and social behavior to speech to thought. The background of our
intentional activities, then, is our form (or forms) of life, embracing our
fundamental empirical propositions cum rules of practice. Of course, this
is something quite different in ontology than the neural dispositions that
realize our capacities to behave and indeed to think in conformity with
our form of life.
There are intimations of the background already in Wittgenstein’s first
work, the Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus (1921). (On Certainty was written
during his final year and a half.) In the Tractarian model, the world
is built up from facts, or existing states of affairs, which we picture in
propositions, and a proposition represents a fact only if they both have the
same “logical form.” In Wittgenstein’s later view, “form” is transplanted
from logical form to form-of-life – cultural form, as language is taken as part
of a wider range of human activity. Now, whether form is a feature of
the world to which language and other activities conform, or whether
our forms of life, language, and even “world” are human artifacts, form
Background Ideas 161
is shown but not said. Form is thus presupposed but not represented in
thought, language, and action. In our terms here, forms of language or
life are part of the background of intentionality.22
So far we have unearthed very different kinds of entities in the background of intentionality: propositions in our world picture, rules of practice
that define forms of life and language in our community, and our individual practical capacities (the latter inscribed in our nervous system). There
are close connections among these things. All are involved in our basic
image of the world around us, an image that is largely communal, the
product of eons of human experience (and in some places informed,
increasingly, by the knowledge of experts such as scientists). And that
image, I submit, forms a crucial sort of background for our intentional
activities, without which our thoughts and experiences could not have
the intentional force they do.
But what sort of thing is our image of the world? Here I want to mark
out the background ideas that are so important to our daily lives.
Our Background Sense of the Life World
The notion of our background world picture grows clearer as we look at
Husserl’s account of what he called the “life world” (Lebenswelt) or the
“human world.”23
In the Crisis (1935–38) Husserl says the life world is the “ground” of
all human activities, theoretical or practical, whence the ground of all
(human) intentionality. What is the life world? It is the world as experienced – and assumed, merely taken for granted – in everyday life, in
everyday intentional activities, from perception, thought, imagination,
and emotion to action. But what is the world-as-experienced? There are
two candidates: the world in which we live, our surrounding world itself,
restricted to certain properties; and our conception or image of the world,
our “world picture” (Weltbild), as Husserl calls it. The world itself is external to consciousness, whereas our image of the world is a construct of
intentional content, what Husserl called “sense” (Sinn) or “noema.” Our
everyday, commonsense, life-world image of the world is the image that
informs our everyday activities. This is to be distinguished from our scientific image of the world, though our everyday life-world image both shapes
and is shaped by our scientific image. (Sellars’s influential distinction
between the “manifest image” and the “scientific image”24 recapitulates
Husserl’s distinction between our experiential, life world conception and
our theoretical, natural-science conception of the world.)
162 Mind World
Which then, according to Husserl, is the ground of our intentional
activities: the life world itself or our sense (conception) of the life world?
Husserl’s story is complex.
The principles of Husserl’s account of the life world were laid out in
his Ideas II (1912). In Ideas I, laying out his phenomenology and associate
ontology, Husserl distinguishes “sense” (Sinn) from “essence” (Wesen):
the essence of something consists of the properties that make it what it is,
whereas the sense of an intentional act is the content that represents or
prescribes its object as having various properties. In Ideas II Husserl describes one world of objects, which may have different aspects or essences,
that we experience or intend through different conceptions or ranges of
sense. Specifically, he analyzes our conceptions of the natural, cultural,
and subjective-intentional essences of things in the world. These very different ranges of essence Husserl calls Nature, Humanity or Spirit (Geist
in the sense of Zeitgeist), and Consciousness.25 Strictly speaking, then,
the Life World is neither the world in itself nor our everyday conception
(sense) of the world, but that aspect (essence) of things in the world
formed by those of their properties that we deal with in everyday life:
the properties that define the Human or “Spiritual” World. For instance,
this material object before me (a pen) is composed of quarks in a complex configuration: a naturalistic property. It also is used for writing:
a cultural property. It is not conscious, so it has no subjective properties, no intentional experiences (such as thinking of what I am writing
with it).
For Husserl, then, oursense of the life world prescribes the essence of the
life world, that is, the Life-World essence of things around us. According
to Husserl’s detailed analysis, the essences of things are stratified in the
following way,26 as things in the world around us may be respectively:
(i) spatiotemporal objects,
(ii) material objects in causal relations,
(iii) living things, including animals and humans with psychological
states,
(iv) human beings proper, or persons, bearing culture and ethics,
(v) cultural objects such as houses, books, laws, and institutions produced by human beings, or
(vi) subjects of intentional activity or “pure” consciousness (as distinct
from natural, psychological, or cultural phenomena).
The essence Nature comprises levels (i)–(iii); the essence Life World
or Humanity, levels (iv)–(v); and the essence Consciousness, level (vi).
Background Ideas 163
According to Husserl, these levels of essence are prescribed by corresponding levels of sense, through which things are presented with properties belonging to these levels of essence. Thus, our everyday sense of the
world presents things with Life-World essences such as being a person or a
chair, while propositions in natural science present things with essences
of Nature, and propositions in phenomenology present mental acts as
having intentional structures or essences of Consciousness.
On Husserl’s account, there are relations of dependence among these
levels of essences – or, alternatively, among the instances of these essences
in particular objects. Husserl finds the later entries dependent on
the prior ones, and recent accounts of the “supervenience” of mental
events on physical events would concur, provided supervenience entails
dependence.27 The details of these dependencies, however, are highly
controversial. In his turn to transcendental idealism (Ideas I, §49), Husserl
claimed there is another dependence that runs in the other direction, in
the way consciousness gives meaning to what is intended, say, as a lump
of clay, an animal, a human being, or a book. In that way properties at
levels (i)–(v) depend on intentional properties at level (vi). This form
of transcendental idealism, or internal realism, is not our concern here.
Our concern is rather the ways in which intentionalities, at level (vi),
depend on various levels of properties of things, from (i) through (vi).
Thus, I cannot perceive a chair (have an experience with the intentional
property of seeing-a-chair) unless I have dealt with chairs (things with the
Life-World property of being a chair) and indeed acquired from my culture the sense “chair,” which prescribes the property or essence of being
a chair. In both these ways, then, intentionality is dependent inter alia on
the life world.
Now, our sense of the life world – our commonsense image of the world
as we encounter it in everyday life – is precisely what we have here called
our background world picture, the background of our familiar forms of
intentionality.28 Husserl’s detailed analysis thereof brings out crucial elements of our awareness of ourselves and others. Our bodily awareness
in kinesthesis and motor control or will come with our awareness of ourselves as animated beings along with other animals. Empathy with others
and thus social awareness enter with our awareness of animal life and are
crucial on the level of human beings or persons. And our sense of values
comes with our awareness of our selves and other persons living in a
culture.
In Husserlian terms, our background world picture would be a system
of background ideas – senses or noemata – that prescribe features of things
164 Mind World
in the world as we experience them in everyday life. This picture would
embrace all the features in (i)–(vi), and properties involved therein such
as kinesthesis, motor control, empathy, value, and more. Taking their
places in this picture are inter alia the “background” items stressed by
Searle and Wittgenstein: our practical capacities, including bodily, social,
and intellectual skills; the rules of practice in our forms of life, extant
in our culture; and our fundamental propositions about various kinds of
things, so far as these are either commonly voiced or reasonably accessible
on reflection. Our world picture should also include our fundamental
values, so far as these are involved in both our forms of life and our
assumed or voiced “beliefs” about what is important, obligatory, and so
forth.
Husserl sometimes characterized the surrounding world as the “horizon” of an intentional experience. To speak precisely, the horizon of my
seeing yonder house is the range of possibilities left open by the content of
my perception.29 These are possibilities for the world around me: starting with properties of the back side of the house, also the inside, and
ranging from physical to cultural and aesthetic properties, thus from the
Natural World to the Life World. These possibilities, Husserl said, must
be “motivated,” not “empty,” possibilities. In present terms that means
they must be compatible with our background world picture. But while
the horizon of an act goes on indefinitely, there are limits reflecting our
background world picture, which is open-ended and revisable, yet limited. Where Wittgenstein said our background knowledge runs out and
assumed propositions blend into rules of practice, Husserl said there
are potential lines of further experience, which prescribe the horizon by
specifying how knowledge can be extended through appropriate action
(walk around the side of the house and you will see if there is another
porch). Consequently, it belongs to the horizon of our experience that
we can develop new forms of action, practice, language, knowledge, even
perception. Accordingly, our basic sense of the world, our world picture,
which constrains the horizon of our experience, includes both practical and cognitive intentional contents indicating the revisability of our
background picture itself.
The Background as Ontological Foundation
How exactly is the intentionality of an act of consciousness related to the
act’s background? The act’s intentionality, I propose, depends or is founded
in certain ways on various parts of its background. So the relation between
Background Ideas 165
intentionality and background is that of ontological dependence, and the
role of background in intentionality is that of ontological foundation.
Drawing on Husserl drawing on Aristotle, we say:
A depends or is founded on B if and only if A could not exist unless B
existed, that is, necessarily A exists only if B exists.30
Dependence is not in general“causal.”Aristotle held that this whiteness in
this paper could not exist apart from the paper, but the paper is not a cause
of the whiteness in our modern sense of “cause.” B is a “causal” condition
of A only in case the necessity involved is physical, and a brain event B is
a “neural” condition of an intentional act A, pace Searle, only in case the
physical necessity concerns neural activity in the subject’s brain. Where
intentional activity depends on background ideas or rules-of-practice,
pace Wittgenstein or Husserl, the dependence is not causal and surely
not neural. The wide notion of ontological dependence, then, allows
us to define the dependence of intentionality on different background
phenomena, including background ideas and norms, without reducing
the dependence to causation.
Assume this traditional analysis of ontological dependence. Then, I
propose: the intentionality of an act of consciousness depends or is founded
on its background, in that the intentional relationship among subject, act,
content, and object could not exist – the act could not be directed as it
is – unless the background conditions or entities existed.31
We may schematize the ontology of intentionality, then, as shown in
Figure 5.1. The point of this figure is to stress the different roles of background and content in the intentional relationship of act to object: the
content mediates the intentional relation (by semantically prescribing the
object), whereas the background founds the relationship (by making it
possible).
This dependence on background is not the dependence of a mental
state on a brain state, as in recent theories of the “supervenience” of
mind on brain.32 Rather, the dependence at issue is that of a mental act’s
intentionality on its background: the act could not be directed as it is unless
the relevant background phenomena existed. Moreover, the ontological
experiences invokes prescribes
background |— < subject ———— act ——— content ———— > object >
founds intentional relation
figure 5.1. The ontology of intentionality.
166 Mind World
foundation of intentionality includes not only the neural activity in the
subject’s brain but also his background ideas about the world, ideas extant
in his culture, not in his brain.
Where the background entities are ideas or propositions in our world
picture, we cannot follow Searle’s characterization of the background as
“causal” conditions. It is useful to recall Searle’s characterization, though,
to see how it fits into our wider, more robust conception of background.
In Intentionality Searle characterized the role of background, restricted
to practical skills, as that of “enabling conditions” (1983: 158):
[T]he Background [is not some further Intentional content that latches on to
the primary Intentional content, but] is rather the set of practices, skills, habits,
and stances that enable Intentional contents to work in the various ways that they
do, and it is in that sense that the Background functions causally by providing a
set of enabling conditions for the operation of Intentional states.
In The Rediscovery of the Mind Searle said, more simply, that “Background
capacities that are not themselves intentional” (1992: 175) but “enable
our [intentional] mental states to function,”that is, to represent (p. 175):
they are, in a Kantian idiom, “conditions of the possibility” of intentionality (p. 195). In The Construction of Social Reality Searle says these
Background capacities are “a certain category of neurophysiological causation” (1995: 129). Accordingly, “Enabling is meant . . . to be a causal
notion. We are not talking about logical conditions of possibility but about
neurophysiological structures that function causally in the production of
certain sorts of intentional phenomena” (p. 130). So Searle conceives
background capacities as neural, not logical, conditions of possibility,
and he takes these as a kind of causal enabling condition. We, however,
must define “enabling” in a way that does not reduce to causation but allows causal conditions as a special case of enabling conditions. So what is
meant by an “enabling condition” or “condition of possibility”? The only
clear accounting I know of uses the notion of ontological dependence,
as explained earlier.
The ontology of background clarifies issues of externalism in recent
philosophy of mind. Internalism holds that the intentionality of a mental
state is determined by content “in the head” (= mind); Husserl’s theory
of intentionality is internalist and so is Searle’s, but both are ramified by
notions of background. Externalism holds that intentional content is determined not by what is “in the head” but by external conditions of causal or
social context – by what we have called background conditions; on Tyler
Burge’s view intentional content is “individuated” by social context,33
Background Ideas 167
whereas on Fred Dretske’s view perceptual content resides in the physical “information” in the causal route from object to perception.34 The
ontology of externalism would thus fuse the content and context or background of an intentional act and so conflate the importantly different
roles of background and content. Internalism, on the other hand, tends
to either omit the background or fill our heads with too many ideas aping
the background. Now, the theory of background we have sketched avoids
these errors. We put context where it belongs: in the background! – and
content where it belongs: in the head!35
The Ontology of Background Ideas
What is the ontological category of intentional contents, or ideas: concepts,
thoughts or propositions, images, volitions, and the like? According to
a long tradition noted earlier, ideas are not mental events or subjective
“appearances,” but objective entities extant in the world. They are shareable as contents of different acts by different people, and they are communicable in language, art, and other media. Yet they are not physical objects, and they are not themselves located in time or space. From the Stoics
to Bolzano, Husserl, and Frege, ideas have been conceived in this way as
objective abstract entities. We need not put them in a Platonic or Fregean
heaven outside the “real” world, however. In fact, the whole thrust of
Wittgenstein’s examples of “fundamental empirical propositions” is that
these propositions are contingent upon our earthly human existence.
Their presence in the background of our experience in this world requires that they not be confined in an ideal heaven. They are abstract –
Husserl said “ideal” – entities, yet they are in this world, available to our
intentionalities.
It is vital that our intentional activities share much of the same background ideas or “assumptions,” both practical and cognitive. Without
such shared background, communication is impossible. Science fiction,
describing encounters with extraterrestrials, illustrates what we all well
know about the background of intentionality; but the lesson is familiar
much closer to home. The point to notice here is that the background
must include shareable objective intentional contents, roughly of the sort
posited by Bolzano and Husserl. And these background contents cannot,
then, be identified with token states of one’s nervous system (as Searle
proposed), though they are surely implemented thereby. Nor are these
contents one’s own personal skills or capacities (as both Dreyfus and
Searle might suggest). In the case of practical background, the contents
168 Mind World
are shareable items of know-how, which we may learn from one another,
and which our personal skills instantiate as we acquire the same skill our
fellows have. These principles of know-how are rules of practice extant in
our culture. They may be operative even if no one ever articulated them
explicitly, as in rules of body language such as how to move in walking
down the street (say, quick-paced, bouncily, with a swagger, or carefully,
soft-footedly, with restraint). Or they may be operative precisely because
people articulated them in a law, as in rules of driving such as “Turn right
on a red light if no one is coming through the intersection” (a law instituted in California but not in some other states). The important point is
that such rules are “out there,” extant in our culture.
Now, our background world picture has just this status as an objective
artifact of intentional, cultural activity. It consists of ideas – images, concepts, propositions, feelings, values, and items of know-how – that are
extant in our culture, realized in our form of life, shared background in
our diverse activities. It is a product of human experience, thought, action, and practice, formed over hundreds of thousands of years, refined
over a couple of thousand years of “history.”
Our scientific theories are increasingly a special part of that picture.
But our everyday image of our kind and our world is a still more fundamental part, our life-world image, presupposed yet modified by our
scientific image. Indeed, our most basic ideas of things have a status like
that of what Carl Jung called “archetypes,” primordial images written
into our genetic cum cultural heritage or “collective unconscious” and
articulated in explicit cultural works.36 The Jungian archetypes, for instance of the masculine and feminine or of the “shadow”side of a person,
remind us just how contingent our world picture is. More recently, biologist Richard Dawkins has coined the term “meme” for cultural ideas
that evolve and are inherited socially in a pattern similar to the evolution
of physical traits. Daniel Dennett, in Consciousness Explained (1991), has
urged a role for such “memes” in the structure of consciousness, and I
would agree. But I would insist on a more robust account of consciousness than Dennett’s neo-Rylean “intentional stance” allows, and a more
articulate ontology of these entities, our background ideas.
In Sum, Ideas Rule
The world as we know it is built around the ground we stand on, literally,
as we walk and talk and live and breathe. That is a fact external to our
consciousness in walking, talking, thinking. Nonetheless, an idea of that
Background Ideas 169
fact – a “ground” proposition – is part of our background image of the
world. Not only does my walking depend ontologically on the ground’s
stability, but the intentionality of my volition in walking depends ontologically on the proposition that the “world” affords a stable ground on
which we walk. That proposition and related rules of practice belong to
the background of ideas or“groundrules” assumed in our culture, indeed,
in our species. And that background is a crucial part of the ontological
ground of our activities as members of Homo sapiens sapiens.
Notes
1. This theory of intentionality, discussed later, is developed, in reflection on
Husserl’s work, in Smith and McIntyre 1982.
2. See Searle 1983: chap. 5, 1992: chap. 8, and 1995: chap. 6; Wittgenstein
1972/1949–51; Husserl 1962/1913, 1989/1912, and 1970b/1954. All are
discussed here. See Dreyfus 1991, for an interpretation of Heidegger’s Being
and Time, stressing the role of background practices and skills in human
activity or “comportment” (Verhalten).
3. Husserl’s notion of founding (Fundierung), or dependence, was laid out in
the third of his Logical Investigations (1900–1), elaborating a conception originating in Aristotle. A version of this notion of dependence or foundation
is applied to background conditions that serve as grounds of intentionality,
specifically “direct” awareness, in D. W. Smith 1989: chap. 6.
The conception of formal ontology, distinguished from material ontology,
has roots in Aristotle and Leibniz. However, it seems to have been explicitly
developed first by Husserl, beginning in the third of his Logical Investigations
(1900–1) and given a sharp focus in the opening chapter of his Ideas I (1913).
Wittgenstein’s Tractactus Logico-Philosophicus (1921) can be read as detailing
a formal ontology: the world is composed of facts, that is, existing states of
affairs; these facts have certain forms (shared by the propositions that represent them); and the contents of these facts are objects and properties or
relations of various kinds that define, in Husserlian idiom, different “material” domains. Which domains Wittgenstein had in mind (sense data, physical
objects, etc.) is a notorious problem in interpreting the Tractatus – which just
shows that Wittgenstein had his hands on a formal ontology. Indeed, Husserl’s
formal ontology also recognized, independently of Wittgenstein and earlier,
the formal objects called states of affairs (Sachverhalten), which he called “categorial” objects “syntactically” formed. A recent study in formal ontology, in
Husserl’s sense, is Johansson 1989.
4. Wittgenstein 1972/1949–51.
5. I shall not have room to deal here with Heidegger’s “ground concepts,”
which I see as forming a “deep background” of intentionality. See Heidegger
1993/1941. Compare Heidegger 1969/1929 and also 1991/1957. The
German word Grund is translated sometimes as “ground” and sometimes as
“reason.” Heidegger himself appraised the different meanings of the word,
shifting from the epistemological to the ontological notion of “ground.”
170 Mind World
6. Husserl’s notion of the “life world” (Lebenswelt) is central in The Crisis of
European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology (1970b/1954/1935–38).
Closer detail is found in his account of the “spiritual world” (geistigen Welt),
also called the “human” (menschlich) or “personalistic” world, in Ideas II
(1989/1912). Husserl’s conception of the human world was a precursor
to Heidegger’s notion of “world” as in human “being-in-the-world.”
7. See Ingarden 1989/1961 and 1964. A recent study of the ontology of fictional entities, revising and improving upon Ingardenian principles, is in
Thomasson 1998.
8. See Føllesdal 1982/1969; Smith and McIntyre 1982; Dreyfus 1982; and
Searle 1983.
9. Searle originally distinguished the Network of background beliefs from the
Background of practical capacities; see Intentionality (1983), chap. 5. In The
Rediscovery of the Mind (1992), chap. 8, he argues that the Network is a special part of the Background, collapsing unconscious beliefs, and hence the
Network, into neural dispositions in the Background. In The Construction of
Social Reality (1995), chapter 6, Searle again defines the Background as preintentional neural capacities. Husserl’s notion of horizon is reconstructed in
Smith and McIntyre 1982: chap. 5. See chap. 5, sec. 3, on the role of background beliefs, ranging from general beliefs (say, about birds) to fundamental ontological beliefs (say, about material objects) to concrete beliefs about a
particular individual. Husserl defined the horizon of an act in different ways,
none of which coincides with the definition of either network or background
as discussed here but which lead in clear ways into the issues of network and
background. Husserl defined the horizon of an act as the range of possibilities left open by the content of the act. These possibilities are empirically
“motivated”; they are constrained not only by the explicit content of the act
but also by the “implicit” content, that is, the content of relevant background
beliefs.
10. This kind of presupposition, taken as precondition or“ground” of intentionality, is analyzed in D. W. Smith 1989: chap. 6. The kindred notion of logical
presupposition, a special form of dependence in Husserl’s sense, is noted in
Simons 1987: 290ff.
11. Wittgenstein 1972/1949–51: 1ff. 94–96, 136, 151ff., 202ff., 308–9, 401, 411.
Discussion of the key points follows.
12. See Searle 1995: 139–47.
13. Searle 1983 separates the Network (beliefs) from the Background (skills),
where Searle 1992 incorporates the Network into the Background, where
both background “beliefs” and background skills are built into the nervous
system.
14. See Searle 1992: 177.
15. In Intentionality (1983) and again in The Rediscovery of the Mind (1992), Searle
argues for the Background partly by analogy with issues of linguistic meaning
and metaphor. Here I want to stay close to the problem of intentionality itself.
Indeed, the most persuasive argument for the hypothesis of the background
is a detailed description of simple cases of intentionality, along lines charted
by Searle in both books.
Background Ideas 171
16. Compare Dreyfus 1991. I think that Dreyfus is right in cautioning against
putting too much intentional content in very basic forms of experience but
wrong in two ways. First, he sometimes seems to identify intentionality itself,
or the very relation of subject to object, with too much content. Second, he
gives too big a role to skills or“coping” because he does not have a variegated
notion of background.
17. This is a variation on an example recounted by Searle 1992: 184–85. In
Searle’s example a famous European philosopher was walking with Searle
on the Berkeley campus, discussing the notion of background, when an
earthquake struck. The visitor realized after the quake that before then he
had not held a belief that the earth does not move; he had simply taken this
for granted. This convinced him of the hypothesis of the background.
Assume that walking is an action, a complex event or process that includes as a proper part a volition (an intentional state or event) with a certain content that represents my bodily movement in walking. An account
of this structure of action, informed by a content theory of intentionality,
is detailed in my “Consciousness in Action” (1992). My account there is
consonant in many respects with Searle’s account of action in chapter 3 of
Intentionality (1983); the differences are that I assume a more pointed version of the content theory of intentionality and I detail the phenomenology
of the background states of perception and kinesthesis typically associated
with the volition (for Searle, intention-in-action) constituent in an action.
18. A conscious experience of action involves a variety of interrelated experiences, including volition, kinesthesis, and perception. These may presuppose beliefs with various contents. Such beliefs, however, are not occurrent events of consciousness but “background” attitudes, which on some
analyses are dispositions to have occurrent conscious thoughts. On the
phenomenological or intentional structure of action, see D. W. Smith
1992.
19. See Searle 1990: 413.
20. Searle 1992: chap. 8, n. 1.
21. Wittgenstein used the term Weltbild as early as in the Tractatus, his first work,
as well as in On Certainty, his last work. He borrowed the term from Heinrich
Hertz’s Principles of Mechanics (1894), which urged that science owes
us a “law-conforming world picture” (gesetzmassig Weltbild ¨ ). I am indebted to
Joseph Tougas’s study of Wittgenstein’s use of ideas from Hertz, “Hertz und
Wittgenstein” (1996).
22. On the limits of representation, see Hintikka and Hintikka 1986 and Kusch
1989. The Hintikkas argue that, for Wittgenstein (early and late), language
cannot contain its own semantics, cannot represent its own form, which is
a ground or enabling condition. In the Tractarian scheme, as I should like
to put it, form is part of the background, and ground, of representation in
language, even if it can be represented in a limited range of language called
logic, or in a separate metalanguage. Kusch develops these themes in the
systems of Husserl, Heidegger, and Gadamer.
23. See Husserl 1989/1912 and 1970b/1954. See Føllesdal 1990. Much of the
detail of the account to follow draws on D. W. Smith 1995.
172 Mind World
24. Sellars 1963.
25. See D. W. Smith 1995. These distinctions are detailed, in diffuse discussion,
in Husserl 1989/1912. Husserl began using the term “life world” (Lebenswelt)
around 1917, borrowed from Georg Simmel. In Ideas II he called the essence
of the life world either Spirit (Geist) or Human (Mensch).
26. This structure is reconstructed in D. W. Smith 1995, drawing out ideas in
Husserl’s Ideas II (1912).
27. See Kim 1993, especially the conceptual survey of different notions of supervenience in the essay “Supervenience as a Philosophical Concept.” Kim
discusses different conceptions of supervenience, only some of which involve
dependence.
28. On kinesthesis, empathy, and value in Husserl’s scheme, see D. W. Smith
1995. A detailed discussion of Husserl’s analysis of our commonsense ontology, and also physics, is found in Barry Smith 1995.
29. This conception of horizon is reconstructed, and related to recent possibleworlds theory, in Smith and McIntyre 1982: chap. 5.
30. Husserl’s notion of founding (Fundierung), or dependence, was used in many
later works after being developed in the third of his Logical Investigations
(1900–1), elaborating a conception originating in Aristotle and used by
Brentano. The Husserlian analysis is assayed in Barry Smith 1982. A wider
discussion of ontological dependence, amplifying Husserl’s conception, is
found in Simons 1987: chap. 8, pp. 290ff. Fine (1995) explores an alternative, nonmodal conception of dependence. Thomasson (1998) develops a
succinct model of a basically Husserlian conception of dependence, refining distinctions formulated by Roman Ingarden and applying the model to
fictional objects as dependent on authors’ and readers’ intentional acts. Another recent discussion is Lowe 1994. D. W. Smith (1989: chap. 6) sketches a
ramified notion of dependence or ground, specifying different kinds of dependence (physical, psychological, etc.) and distinguishing kinds of dependence involved in direct awareness, or acquaintance, notably dependence
on intentional content and different kinds of dependence on the context
of one’s experience. Simons (cited earlier) similarly distinguished different
kinds of ontological dependence, including logical presupposition.
31. Barwise and Perry (1983: chap. 5) construct a logic of reports of perception
and other attitudes, using a notion of “constraints” on meaning and other
phenomena. There are some affinities between that notion of constraint
and the notion of “background” under discussion here, but that is a topic
for another day, as we are not here concerned with the logic or semantics of
reports of intentional attitudes.
32. See Kim 1993, especially the essay “Supervenience as a Philosophical
Concept.”
33. See Burge 1979, 1982. Such externalism is critiqued in D. W. Smith 1991.
34. See Dretske 1981, 1995. Compare Gibson 1979.
35. The different roles of context and content are vivid in perception. There is
normally a causal relation between the object perceived and the perceptual
experience, but there is also an intentional relation between them, mediated
by the content of the experience. The content prescribes the object as before
Background Ideas 173
the subject and causing the experience. But the intentional relation is distinct
from the causal relation: intentionality does not reduce to causal relatedness.
This line of argument is detailed in D. W. Smith 1989.
36. Some of Jung’s key writings on the notion of archetypes, from 1934 and
1935, are collected in The Basic Writings of C. G. Jung (1990).
References
Armstrong, David M. 1989. Universals: An Opinionated Introduction. Boulder:
Westview Press.
Barwise, Jon, and John Perry. 1983. Situations and Attitudes. Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press.
Burge, Tyler. 1979. “Individualism and the Mental.” In P. French, T. Uehling, and
H. Wettstein, eds., Midwest Studies in Philosophy. Minneapolis: University of
Minnesota Press.
1982. “Other Bodies.” In Andrew Woodfield, ed., Thought and Object, pp. 97–
120. Oxford: Clarendon Press.
Castaneda, Hector-Neri. ˜ 1975. Thinking and Doing. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Dennett, Daniel C. 1991. Consciousness Explained. Boston: Little, Brown.
Dretske, Fred. 1981. Knowledge and the Flow of Information. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
1995. Naturalizing the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Dreyfus, Hubert L., ed. 1982. Husserl, Intentionality and Cognitive Science.
Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1991. Being-in-the-World. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Fine, Kit. 1995. “Ontological Dependence.” Paper presented at the meeting of
the Aristotelian Society, Birkbeck College, London, 5 June.
Føllesdal, Dagfinn. 1982. “Husserl’s Notion of Noema.” In Dreyfus 1982. First
published in Journal of Philosophy (1969).
1990. “The Lebenswelt in Husserl.” In Leila Haaparanta, Martin Kusch, and
Ilkka Niiniluoto, eds., Language, Knowledge, and Intentionality: Perspectives on the
Philosophy of Jaakko Hintikka, pp. 123–43. Acta Philosophica Fennica (Helsinki)
49.
1992. “Godel and Husserl. ¨ ” Paper presented at a conference on The Development of the Foundations of Mathematics, Boston.
Gibson, James Jerome. 1979. The Ecological Approach to Visual Perception. Boston:
Houghton Mifflin.
Heidegger, Martin. 1969. The Essence of Reasons. Translated by Terrence Malick.
Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University Press. German original, 1929.
1991. The Principle of Reason. Translated by Reginald Lilly. Bloomington: Indiana
University Press. German original, 1957.
1993. Basic Concepts. Translated by Gary E. Aylesworth. Bloomington: Indiana
University Press. German original, 1981, from the text of a lecture course
given in winter 1941.
Hintikka, Merrill B., and Jaakko Hintikka. 1986.Investigating Wittgenstein. London:
Basil Blackwell.
174 Mind World
Husserl, Edmund. 1962.Ideas Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, First Book: General Introduction to Phenomenology. Translated
by W. R. Boyce Gibson. New York: Collier Books. German original, 1913.
1970a. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. Translated by J. N. Findlay from the
revised, second German edition. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul. New
edition, edited with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a preface
by Michael Dummett. London: Routledge, 2001. German original, 1900–1,
revised 1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920 (Investigation VI).
1970b. The Crisis of European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology. Translated by David Carr. Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University Press. German
original published in 1954 and edited by Walter Biemel, from materials written in 1935–38.
1989. Ideas Pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, Second Book: Studies in the Phenomenology of Constitution. Translated by
Richard Rojcewicz and Andre Schuwer. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Pub- ´
lishers. Original manuscript dating from 1912, posthumously published in
German in 1952.
Ingarden, Roman. 1964.Time and Modes of Being. Translated by Helen R. Michejda.
Springfield, Ill.: Charles C. Thomas. From excerpts of The Controversy over the
Existence of the World (in Polish, 1946–47).
1989. The Ontology of the Work of Art. Translated by Raymond Meyer with John
T. Goldthwait. Athens: Ohio University Press. German original, 1961.
Johansson, Ingvar. 1989. Ontological Investigations. London: Routledge.
Jung, Carl Gustav, 1990. The Basic Writings of C. G. Jung. Translated by R. F. C. Hull.
Edited and with an introduction by Violet de Laszlo. Princeton: Princeton
University Press.
Kim, Jaegwon. 1993. Supervenience and Mind. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.
Krauss, Ruth, and Maurice Sendak. 1952. A Hole Is to Dig: A First Book of First
Definitions. Text by Krauss, pictures by Sendak. New York: Harper and Row.
Kusch, Martin. 1989. Language as Calculus vs. Language as Universal Medium:
A Study in Husserl, Heidegger and Gadamer. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic
Publishers.
Lowe, E. J. 1994. “Ontological Dependency.” Philosophical Papers 23 (1): 31–48.
Searle, John R. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1990. “Collective Intentions and Actions.” In Philip R. Cohen, Jerry Morgan,
and Martha E. Pollack, eds., Intentions in Communication, pp. 401–15.
Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1992. The Rediscovery of the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1995.The Construction of Social Reality. New York: Free Press, Simon and Schuster.
Sellars, Wilfrid. 1963. “Philosophy and the Scientific Image of Man.” In Science,
Perception and Reality, pp. 1–40. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul; New
York: Humanities Press.
Simons, Peter M. 1987. Parts. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Simons, Peter M., and David W. Smith. 1993. “The Philosophical Foundations
of PACIS.” Paper presented at the 16th International Ludwig Wittgenstein
Symposium, Kirchberg-am-Wechsel, Austria, 19 August.
Background Ideas 175
Smith, Barry, ed. 1982. Parts and Moments. Munich: Philosophia Verlag.
1995. “Common Sense.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
1991. “Thoughts.” Philosophical Papers 19 (3): 163–89.
1992. “Consciousness in Action.” Synthese 90: 119–43.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality: A
Study of Mind, Meaning, and Language. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Thomasson, Amie. 1998. Fiction and Metaphysics. New York: Cambridge University
Press.
Tougas, Joseph. 1996. “Hertz und Wittgenstein: Zum historischen Hintergrund
des Tractatus.” Conceptus 29, 75: 205–28.
Wittgenstein, Ludwig. 1972. On Certainty. Edited by G. E. M. Anscombe and
G. H. von Wright. Translated by Denis Paul and G. E. M. Anscombe. New York:
Harper Torchbooks, Harper and Row. First published by Basil Blackwell,
1969, from notebooks written in German during 1949–51.
1992. Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus. Translated by D. F. Pears and B. F.
McGuinness. Atlantic Highlands, N.J.: Humanities Press International. This
translation first published in 1961. German original, 1921.
6
Intentionality Naturalized?
Abstract. Here I outline an ontology of diverse categories that define a place
for consciousness and intentionality in the world of “nature.” Intentionality is “naturalized” only in that way, without reducing consciousness or its
intentionality to a causal or computational process. The basic background
assumption is that there is one world ordered and unified as “nature.”
The world includes us, our conscious intentional experiences, physical objects, and social organizations. These things belong to diverse “material”
categories such as Body, Mind, and Culture, which are ordered by diverse
“formal” categories such as Individual, Quality, and State of Affairs. The
world is unified by the systematic ways in which these categories interact.
Among the formal categories of the world, I claim, are Intentionality and
Dependence. If these are distinct formal categories, it is a mistake to identify intentionality with a structure of causation (dependence) realized in a
brain or computer. We need instead a more sensitive system of categories.
Segue. In “Consciousness in Action” we showed that the experience of everyday action includes a sense of dependence on embodiment. Then in
“Background Ideas” we argued that familiar forms of intentional experience depend on ideas extant in one’s background culture. Now, consciousness – in thought, perception, and action – is part of nature, and so is human
culture. However, to articulate the mind’s place in the world of nature, we
need a broad and fundamental ontological framework. Yet the type of naturalism assumed in today’s philosophy of mind cum cognitive science cannot
Various participants in the Bordeaux conference where the material in this chapter was first
presented offered helpful comments, responding to my presentation of these ideas there.
I thank Charles W. Dement as well, for discussion of related issues and for comments on
the penultimate draft of this essay. My thanks also to Jeffrey Barret for comments on the
penultimate draft and to Dagfinn Føllesdal, Ronald McIntyre, Peter Simons, Andrew Cross,
and Martin Schwab for helpful discussion of several related issues.
176
Intentionality Naturalized? 177
make room for conscious, embodied, encultured intentional activities. In
this essay we look toward a wider and more fundamental ontology. We
turn thus to issues of basic ontology to be explored further in subsequent
essays.
With all its eyes the natural world looks out into the Open. Only our eyes
are turned backward, and surround plant, animal, child like traps, as they
emerge into their freedom.
Rainer Maria Rilke
Introduction
Intentionality in Nature
We must open up the conception of nature and naturalism au courant
in the philosophy of cognitive science. Consciousness and its intentionality are part of nature. But their essence is not exhausted by physical
composition or causal role or neural function or computation (classical
or connectionist) – as important as these be to their implementation.
We must widen “naturalism” accordingly so that our theory of mind and
cognition incorporates the characters of consciousness and intentionality
that are hard-earned results of phenomenology and ontology.
To that end I outline here an ontology that distinguishes diverse categories of the world and carves a place for consciousness and intentionality
in the world of nature. Intentionality is categorized within the world of
nature, and “naturalized” in that way, without reducing consciousness
or its intentionality to a causal or computational process along the lines
envisioned by current cognitive science.
The guiding assumption, which I call unionism, holds that there is
but one world, ordered and unified as “nature.” That world includes us,
our conscious intentional experiences, and a host of other things, from
rocks, trees, and bees to families, symphonies, and governments. These
things belong to diverse substantive or“material” categories such as Body,
Mind, and Culture, which are ordered by diverse “formal” categories
such as Individual, Quality, and State of Affairs. The world is unified by
the systematic ways in which formal categories interweave and govern
material categories.
This proposed unity does not preclude diversity of categories (think
of the classifications in biology, the table of elements in chemistry, the
fundamental forces and particles in physics). Yet diversity does not require
disjoint realms of beings delimiting, say, bodies, minds, and cultures (`a la
178 Mind World
dualism, materialism, idealism, historicism). In this way the world enjoys
categorial complexity without substance dualism. From quarks to quasars,
from consciousness to volition to cultural institutions, there is ontological
complexity, but all within this one world.
Among the formal categories of the world, I shall claim, are Intentionality and Dependence. But if these are distinct formal categories, it
is a mistake in fundamental ontology to identify intentionality – or consciousness itself – with a structure of causation, or dependence, realized
in a brain or computer. The life of mind is more complicated than that,
categorially.1
Naturalism in Phenomenology and Cognitive Science
Some ninety years ago Edmund Husserl developed a philosophical account of consciousness and cognition in Ideen (1912–13) on the heels of
his Logische Untersuchungen (1900–1). Husserl held that “intentionality”
(Husserl coined the term) is the central feature of consciousness. His
account of intentionality – including cognition in perception and judgment – was the foundation of“phenomenology,” Husserl’s new science of
consciousness. With Husserl the theory of intentionality and intentional
content thus came into its own, after a long prehistory.
Some twenty years ago, at the heart of the emerging discipline of “cognitive science,”Jerry Fodor outlined a philosophical account of cognition
in The Language of Thought (1975). Fodor held that “mental representation” – what Husserl called “intentionality” – is the central activity of mind
and analyzed its structure as symbolic computation in “the language of
thought.” More recently, Fodor and foes have debated whether this computation is “connectionist” in form, implemented by neural networks in
the human brain, whereas Fred Dretske, since Knowledge and the Flow of
Information (1981), has put the emphasis rather on the flow of physical
“information,” between environment and organism, in perception and
knowledge.
But Husserl and Fodor et alii take opposite positions on naturalism.
Expressing today’s conventional wisdom, Fodor in The Elm and the Expert (1994) says any “serious psychology” must be naturalistic. In kindred
spirit Fred Dretske in Naturalizing the Mind (1995) seeks to show how
consciousness might be captured in naturalistic terms. Husserl, however,
argued that any “rigorous science” of consciousness must reject naturalism. Of course, everything depends on how naturalism is defined. If
intentionality is naturalized in the way of Fodor et alii, then I stand with
Husserl against “naturalization.” But if naturalism is defined in the way
Intentionality Naturalized? 179
I shall propose, as unionism in a system of ontological categories, then
I accept a “naturalized” intentionality, and so I think could Husserl in
today’s debate as well.
In The Elm and the Expert Fodor updates his account of mental representation, now adopting Husserl’s term “intentionality” and drawing
what he thinks are consequences of naturalizing the theory of mind and
intentionality. In Naturalizing the Mind Dretske proposes to explicate the
crucial features of consciousness, including intentionality, qualia, and
introspection, in terms of external relations our experiences have to relevant objects in the environment, relations consisting in the causal flow of
physical “information.” Where Fodor, Dretske, and others would outline
a theory of mind within the bounds of a naturalism stressing computation
and causation, I want inversely to outline a form of naturalism within the
bounds of a theory of mind (inter alia) stressing its place in the categories
of a phenomenological ontology.2
The term “naturalism” outlives its usefulness, however, if it merely
connotes the honorific attitude, “Be scientific.” My aim here is to get
beyond such labels and dig into what would be required of an ontology
adequate to the phenomenology of consciousness and its intentionality.
Outlines of a Phenomenological Ontology
Ontological Categories
Systematic ontology begins by distinguishing fundmental kinds or categories of things in the world. Plato distinguished forms and particulars
that exemplify them (to various degrees of imperfection). Aristotle, master classifier and protobiologist, framed a more down-to-earth ontology
of “categories” (launching this term of art in philosophy: kategoremata,
literally “predicates”). Aristotle distinguished the following categories:
Substance, including Primary Substance (Individual Thing) and Secondary Substance (Species), Quantity (Discrete or Continuous), Quality (Condition, Capacity, Affective Quality, or Shape), Relative (better
Relation), Where, When, Position (Posture), Having, Doing (Action),
Being Affected (Being Acted Upon).
If Plato’s forms reside in a heaven far above the world of particulars,
Aristotle’s categories – starting with Substance – are meant to structure
things in nature. Thus Aristotle went on to distinguish matter and form
within the constitution of a primary substance.
180 Mind World
For our purposes let us simplify and update Aristotle’s system of categories, as follows:
Individual, Species, Quality, Relation, Location, Quantity, Intentionality.
Species include natural kinds and, if you like, artificial kinds. Relations
form their own category (by contrast, many philosophers sought to reduce relations to monadic properties). Space and time fall under Location. Quantity leads into other mathematical structures (details to be
specified). Intentionality – following Brentano, Husserl, et alii – covers
not only purposeful action (and, inversely, being acted upon) but perception, imagination, thought, and other processes (significantly widening
Aristotle’s niche for acting and being acted upon).
We consider increasingly complex systems of categories, using this
modified Aristotelian scheme as a prototype and foil for further reflections. The issue, as we proceed, is the niche of mind in a world framed
by ontological categories. If Brentano was right that intentionality is the
distinguishing mark of the mental, then of course mental phenomena
would simply fall under Intentionality in the above scheme. But life is
more complicated than that, we shall see.
Classical nominalism began in Ockham with the goal of having only
the category Particular, or Individual, what Aristotle called “Primary
Substance”: all else becomes mere ways of talking or thinking (for
Ockham, thinking in a mental language). While I cannot argue the case
here, I think nominalism – better named particularism – is orthogonal
to naturalism. Our theory of nature assumes the categories Species, Spatiotemporal Location, and more. But whether these categories could be
somehow eliminated, or reduced to the category Individual, is a further
issue and would survive the denial of naturalism – as we saw in Berkeley’s
ontology of idealism (which would recognize only minds and ideas, two
kinds of particular).
Aristotle conceived his categories as the most general yet disjunct
kinds of things there are. This would seem to mean the categories themselves fall under the category Species. But that is not right. The categories
are not summa genera, species at the highest level in the genus-species
hierarchy: they are not species at all. Dog is a species of Mammal, but
Species, Relation, and the like are not species: they are categories. Thus, a
more systematic account of categories is needed, along the lines charted
by Husserl.
Intentionality Naturalized? 181
Formal and Material Categories
Husserl drew a distinction (with a nod to Leibniz) between formal
and material ontology, thereby distinguishing “formal” and “material”
categories.3 While the distinction is not easy to draw in general terms, it
becomes clear in particular systems of ontology, where it has sharp consequences for the ontology of mind. When we begin to think in such terms,
as we shall see, the reduction of intentionality to causal-computational
process looks like a serious category mistake.
According to Husserl, material ontology recounts material categories of
things according to their specific characters or “essence,” whereas formal
ontology recounts formal categories that apply to things of any material category. If you will, formal ontology posits forms or structures of
things in the world, and material ontology posits “matters” or domains to
which “forms” may apply. In this sense formal categories are topic-neutral.
Indeed, Husserl sometimes spoke of the ideal of a mathesis universalis
(Leibniz’s term), suggesting that formal ontological structure is to be
described ultimately in a unified mathematical framework. However, a
formal ontology is formal because it describes ontological form, not because it may ideally be expressed in a symbolic or mathematical language,
and not because forms are identified with mathematical entities such as
numbers and sets.
For instance, if Descartes were right that minds and bodies belong to
two distinct realms, both realms would still be characterized by the formal distinction between substances and their modes (things and their
properties). Applying Husserl’s distinction to Descartes’s ontology, we
would say that Mind and Body are two material categories, while Substance and Mode are two formal categories that apply to each of these
material categories. Thus the mental divides into mental substances
(minds) and mental modes (modes of thinking), whereas the bodily divides into corporeal substances (bodies) and corporeal modes (modes of
extension).
Or consider Husserl’s ontology.4 He recognized three material
categories: Nature, Culture, and Consciousness; and several formal categories including: Individual, Species, and State of Affairs. In Husserl’s system, the material categories are the highest genera under which species
can fall, and the formal categories are forms that apply within each material category, so that an individual’s belonging to a species (which falls
under the genus Nature or Culture or Consciousness) forms a state of
affairs. Thus each of the “regions” Nature, Culture, and Consciousness is
structured by the “forms” Individual, Species, and State of Affairs.
182 Mind World
In Husserl’s ontology the category State of Affairs (Sachverhalt) is formal and has a “syntactic” structure combining individuals and essences.
Wittgenstein adopted a similar view in Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus
(1921). According to Wittgenstein, the form of the proposition “aRb” is
shared by the state of affairs (Sachverhalt) that objects a and b stand in
relation R – and the form of an object is the possibility of its occurrence
in various states of affairs. Wittgenstein’s famous Tractarian ontology is
thus a formal ontology in Husserl’s sense and indeed is centered on the
ontological form State of Affairs. Thus, the Tractarian forms Object, Relation, and State of Affairs would apply to any domain – mind, nature,
culture, or whatever material ontology posits.
Issues in philosophy of mind take their place in such an ontology of
formal and material categories. Thus, for Husserl, unlike Descartes, the
material categories do not define disjoint domains of “substances,” but
rather different ranges of essence, or species. Accordingly, for Husserl,
the same individual can belong to different species (have different
essences) under different material categories. Notably,“I” – this one individual – am a physical organism in Nature, a person in Culture, and an ego
in Consciousness. More precisely, the individual I includes these three different aspects or “moments” (particularized properties) that fall respectively under the material categories Nature, Culture, and Consciousness.
And there are dependencies among these moments, as my state of consciousness depends on what my brain is doing and what my culture has
done. Consequently, Dependence is a formal feature of entities falling
under these three material categories, and holding even between entities
in different material categories.
Furthermore, in Husserl’s scheme, intentionality (being-conscious-ofsomething as well as being-an-“I”) belongs to animal organisms in Nature,
to persons in Culture, and to “pure” egos in Consciousness. It follows that
Intentionality is a formal feature of entities bearing these three different
material essences. Husserl does not explicitly classify intentionality as a
formal feature, but I later consider reasons why it should be so classified.
For Husserl, intentionality is “pure” in consciousness but also “bound”
into nature and culture. Of course, intentionality is realized in nature not
in rocks but only in certain physical systems including animal organisms.
And intentionality is realized in culture not in buildings or machines but
only in the persons who build and use them. In this view intentionality
is a formal property, in the sense that it applies to things in different
“material” domains. It is not, however, “formal” in the sense of a syntactic form of physical symbols. To say with Husserl that intentionality is a
Intentionality Naturalized? 183
formal feature in a formal ontology is not to endorse (with Fodor et al.)
the computational theory of intentional content as a syntactic form of
physical symbols processed by a brain or a computing machine. Quite
the contrary, as we shall see.5 Ontological form is not form of symbols
but form of entities – which may be represented by symbols in virtue
of their form (the structure of such representation being the purview of
semantics).
In logic we assume a distinction between logical forms and the expressions to which they apply in forming more complex expressions. For
example, the logical form “p and q” applies to different sentences that
may fill the positions of p and q; or the logical form “the F ” applies to definite descriptions that may be formed from different predicates “F.” The
distinction between formal and material ontological categories is like a
projection of this logical distinction onto the world – or vice versa, pace
Wittgenstein! But the point is that this distinction applies to structures
of the world as opposed to structures of language. In the spirit of W. V.
Quine, we might hold that our language and its logic go hand in hand
with our ontology, so that both are subject to revision in light of advancing theoretical inquiry. Nonetheless, our ontology is a further thing, and
in the spirit of Husserl formal and material categories together structure
the world.
Within the structure of language, Quine distinguished, as had Bolzano,
between logical forms and the expressions to which they apply. The correct logical forms, for Quine, are those in natural language as regimented
by first-order logic. According to Quine, the ontological commitments of
our language are expressed only by bound variables, or pronouns: only
expressions of that logical form genuinely posit entities; only through
so positing entities do we “reify” and individuate objects.6 So Quine’s
position yields in effect a formal nominalism, holding that all entities in
the world have the form specified by the logical form of variables, thus
recognizing only the formal category Individual. Husserl would say other
forms of language also carry ontological commitment, as predicates may
refer to essences or species and sentences to states of affairs. So Husserl’s
formal ontology is wider, recognizing the formal categories of Essence
or Species, State of Affairs, and Individual – which involve other formal
features including Dependence and Intentionality.
The formal-material distinction is not the analytic-synthetic distinction. Quine argued against a sharp distinction between analytic and synthetic statements, the former true by virtue of meaning alone. Yet he held
to a distinction between logical and nonlogical statements, the former
184 Mind World
true by virtue of logical form alone. Where Quine applied the logicalnonlogical distinction to expressions in a language, Husserl applied the
formal-material distinction to objects in the world and to grammatical
categories in language as a special case. For Quine our ontology is projected from our language, from our bound variables, and logical form is a
matter of convention. (The category of terms may be hard-wired into human language ability; thus Quine once remarked,“Man is a body-minded
animal.”) For Husserl our ontology is projected from our intentional experience, expressed or expressible in language, and that ontology applies
to language and intentional experience and content as well as to other
kinds of objects in the world.
Philosophers have often thought of the logical or conceptual as prior
to the empirical, and along these lines one might be tempted to think of
formal ontology as prior to material ontology. However, we must instead
posit formal categories together with material categories, in a unified ontology. For in practice we abstract formal features from material features
of things, and if we revise our material categories sufficiently, we may revise our formal categories that govern them. Similarly, Quine holds that
our logical and mathematical idioms are most central in the language
expressing our web of beliefs, yet even they are subject to revision.7 Indeed, some say quantum mechanics may require a different “logic” than
everyday affairs. Moving to the level of ontology, our formal categories
are more central and less variable than our material categories, yet the
formal and material work together, and our ontology as a whole is subject
to revision as need be.
The Ontology of Nature
As we distinguish formal and material categories, let us look toward a
categorial ontology of nature. Think of the material categories implicit
in physics and the formal categories that might govern these. As a model
(subject to revision) contemplate the following categorial ontology of the
physical world, the domain of physics:
Formal Categories: Individual, Species, Quality, Relation, Location,
Quantity, Dependence, Intentionality, State of Affairs.
Physical Material Categories: Body, Wave, Mass, Force, Space-Time, Gravitation, Electromagnetism, Quantum Field, Wave Particle.
What I want to stress is the architecture or systematics of such an ontology,
where the nature of things physical is structured by the interaction of
Intentionality Naturalized? 185
formal and material categories. On such an ontology, the world has a
systematic unity that consists in the way entities under material categories
are governed by formal categories that weave together in an ordered way.
In the ancient idiom “nature” (phusis) meant the order of things, and
ontological systematics focuses on such order, framed here by a system
of formal and material categories.8
These formal categories above are those recounted earlier as an updated Aristotelian scheme but supplemented here with the categories
State of Affairs and Dependence. The category State of Affairs serves to
bind together entities of other formal categories, as states of affairs are
formed by individuals of various material categories having appropriate
qualities, relations, locations, and so on. Thus, in its formal structure
the world is a world of states of affairs (following Husserl, Wittgenstein,
et al.).9 But the world is also bound together by dependencies. In this
ontology Dependence is posited as a formal category that may govern
material causal relations defined in terms of physical force, wave activity,
and the like. Thus, A depends on B just in case A could not exist or occur unless B does; this structure is realized in causation between physical
things or events in virtue of the mass, force, or other physical entities or
features that they involve. (Aristotle assumed such a notion in defining
qualities of substances, but it was Husserl who developed the ontology of
dependence in a detailed way.)10 Note that Intentionality is posited as a
distinct formal category, a point to which we return.
In the Cartesian and Husserlian ontologies sketched earlier, the formal
categories apply in the same way to entities in each material category. In
the present ontology, however, the relation between formal and material
categories is more complicated, with certain formal categories applying
to entities in certain material categories. Thus, a body is an individual
with a mass in a gravitational field, but an electromagnetic wave is an
individual with a certain mode of propagation in an electromagnetic
field. States of affairs are formed in various ways from formal categories:
as individuals belonging to species or having qualities or standing in
relations, or entities depending on other entities.11 The laws of physics,
according to such an ontology, describe intervolved formal and material
entities or features. For example, “f = ma” describes a relation among
quantities correlated with a certain force, the mass of a certain body, and
the rate of change of its location in space-time. Certain of the entities
involved are “formal” and others are “material.”
The categories of physics are subject to raging controversies, specifically, in the interpretation of quantum mechanics. Under material
186 Mind World
categories, are there waves only, particles being illusions brought on by
interference of observation? Or are there particles only, determinate elements in eigenstates following collapse of the wave function? Or are
there only superpositions forming wavicles, neither particles nor waves
in themselves but only relative to observation or the absence thereof?
It remains unclear exactly which ontological categories are best suited
to current physical theory. The point here, however, is not to settle such
issues, but to indicate the relevance of the distinction between formal
and material categories – and, more generally, the importance of “systematics” in ontology. However these controversies in the foundations of
physics turn out, would the formal distinction between Individual, Quality, and Relation be abandoned? Is this much not presupposed by the
most basic structures of mathematics, recognizing things and functions
(with or without a strongly realist interpretation of mathematics)? It is
hard to see how the different versions of quantum mechanics, or other
parts of physics, could do without this formal distinction.12
In this category scheme, Intentionality is posited as a formal category
because it may be required by the material categories presupposed by
quantum physics. For on the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum
mechanics, observation causes the collapse of the wave function in a
quantum system. But if observation is an intentional event (as it is), and
intentionality has a distinctive formal structure (as it does), then quantum mechanics (on that interpretation) presupposes the formal category
Intentionality. Thus, the ontology of the physical world may require the
category Intentionality even before we look at the categorial structure of
mind per se.
The Ontology of Mind in Nature
Now let us turn to the ontology of mind. An adequate ontology must
be phenomenological, in the sense that it recognizes structures of experience, notably consciousness and intentionality, as well as structures of
stones, gravity, quantum states, and so on. On the present approach,
a phenomenological ontology would be articulated within a scheme of
formal and material categories.
For the sake of argument, assume the formal categories given previously. What material categories should an ontology of mind assume?
They might be the same as those given for physical entities: this would
be a form of physicalism, but the characters of consciousness and intentionality would have to take their place somehow in the category scheme.
Or in a plural-aspect scheme like Husserl’s, the formal categories would
Intentionality Naturalized? 187
apply to, say, the material categories of Biomatter, Culture, and Consciousness. Each of these material categories would be characterized by
diverse properties, but each would be governed by the formal categories
of Individual, Species, and the like.
Rather than begin with the material categories of physics, however,
our theory of mind and cognition must begin with categories of things
in the everyday world of common sense – what Husserl called the “life
world,” the midworld range of things we live among between quarks
and the cosmos.13 We do not begin our ontology of the world around
us by dealing with bosons and black holes, or neurons and neural nets,
abstracting so far from our familiar concerns that we no longer know
where we fit into the world. Rather, we encounter and categorize mental
or cognitive activities in everyday life – prior to our theorizing in physics
or neuroscience, which is constrained by our everyday experience and
answers to it in our scientific practice of observing and theorizing. Indeed,
our quantum physics and neurophysics must ultimately jibe with everyday
experience so as to recognize and account for everyday affairs, including
our conscious activities of theorizing.
Consider then the following categorial ontology of the everyday world,
structuring the world as we know it in everyday life:
Formal Categories: Individual, Species, Quality, Relation, Location,
Quantity, Dependence, Intentionality, State of Affairs.
Everyday Material Categories: Object, Event, Place, Time, Plant, Animal,
Human Being, Mind, Action, Practice, Artifact, Institution.
Here, an object is an individual that persists relatively unchanged, an
event is an individual that transpires relatively quickly in time, and so
forth. The formal and material categories interweave so that there is
ontological complexity in the world. But there are no separate domains
of mental and physical substances or simple division of properties into
mental and physical.
In this ontology there is one world that includes mind and culture
amid “natural” objects or events. Mind takes its place in the order of the
world, along with stones, trees, and owls, as well as cities, schools, and
stories. A mental activity such as a thought, perception, or action is an
intentional event: it is categorized materially under Event and formally
under Intentionality. In closer detail, a mental activity is experienced by
a subject (human or animal), carries an intentional content (a concept,
proposition, etc.), and, if veridical, is directed to an object (the object
188 Mind World
of thought). There may be collective as well as individual intentional activities, such as collective beliefs or group intentions. The salient mental
events are conscious: we experience these, and build our ontology around
them among other familiar things. Now, cultural entities also take their
place in the world. A hammer is an artifact: categorized formally under
Individual and materially under Artifact. A political party is an institution, classified under Individual and Institution; a song is something we
write and perform, an artifact, and so forth. Cognition, then, consists in
a mental activity of perceiving or thinking being intentionally directed
to an appropriate entity, which may be an object, an event, a plant, or
a hammer. Notice that some features of mind or cognition are formal
and some are material, instances of formal or material categories respectively. And notice, roughly, how the formal and material categories work
together in these formulations.
These categories structure the things we deal with in everyday life, in
our niche in the human world within the natural world. There are vital
differences among the objects of everyday human life in the stone age,
the agricultural age, the industrial age, and now the age of air travel,
telecommunication, and computers. Yet the formal categories such as
Individual or Species seem to apply to things under everyday material
categories in any of these ages. And the everyday material categories given
previously seem appropriate to different cultures of humans ancient and
modern. Our categories are not written in stone (or iron or silicon), but
we must revise them cautiously.
Unionism – the formal ontological backbone of an appropriate naturalism – requires that the world of nature is one world including
quarks, quantum wave collapses, and black holes along with human beings and conscious intentional experiences and political scandals. Thus,
the present ontology is unionist. As Husserl stressed, there must be dependencies of consciousness and human affairs on the basic physical states
of things (and perhaps vice versa): dependencies among “moments” that
instantiate the relevant categories, formal and material. From quantum
mechanics to neuroscience there is much yet to learn about these dependencies. From categorial ontology, however, we draw an approach that
systematizes the contributions to “formal” and “material”structures of the
world. A unionist ontology would ultimately detail how the ontological
structures of things physical, mental, and cultural are all extruded from a
unified system of fundamental ontological categories, formal and material. The “correspondence problem” (borrowing the term from physics)
is then how precisely to characterize relations among the physical,
Intentionality Naturalized? 189
phenomenological, and cultural aspects of things – which are diverse
aspects of things in this one world.14
Subcategories for Consciousness and Intentionality
Within the preceding ontology, under certain categories we may carve
out subcategories that structure consciousness and intentionality more
specifically, thus refining the formal and material categories that define
mind.
Under the formal category Intentionality we specify formal subcategories that structure the intentionality of an experience. These are Subject, Experience, Content, Intention. Thus, the formal structure of intentionality is that of an intention, or “directedness,” among subject, experience or “act of consciousness,” content, and object. Content is a distinct
formal category, since contents – images, concepts, propositions – are
distinguished from species, relations, numbers, or quantities: they are
formally their own kind of thing. And Content is a formal rather than
material category because it is plausible, so far as we know, that the same
content may be realized or invoked in different material categories, for
example, if extraterrestrials have experiences that are realized differently
than experiences in humans or animals. Our brains produce experiences
through neural processes, but the extraterrestrial’s system produces experiences, say, through gaseous propagation (in a life world like Jupiter’s).
This is not the functionalist claim that computation may be executed in
different hardware or wetware or gasware. Rather, the claim is that thinking and other kinds of experience may be ontologically dependent on
variable kinds of processes – processes that do not reduce to computation.
Cognition – in perception, thought or contemplation, and judgment –
is formally classified as a kind of intention, or intentionality, not a structure of dependence. Yet our cognitive activities are materially analyzed
as dependent on a causal flow involving the neural activity in our brains
and its causal interaction with things in our environment. If this ontology is correct, then the reduction of intentionality or cognition to causalcomputational process – as proposed in recent cognitive science – rests
on a formal category mistake. It is not just that we happen to talk about
intentionality and causality in different ways, even in different grammatical categories, or that we experience them in very different ways. Rather,
the point is that we categorize them differently.
From our conscious mental activities, we may abstract material
categories of their psychology and phenomenology. These are phenomenological material categories governed by the formal category
190 Mind World
Intentionality. Thus, under the material category Mental Activity are
subcategories specifying phenomenological types, namely: Perception,
Thought, Emotion, Volition. These types of mental activity carry materially distinct types of content: perceptions, images and thoughts (propositions), feelings (and desires), and volitions (or intentions).
Conscious intentional experiences are thus categorized formally under Intentionality and materially under Mental Activity, with the foregoing subcategories. The category scheme in which they take their place
then looks like this (ignoring further subcategories):
Formal Categories: Individual, Species, Quality, Relation, Location,
Quantity, Dependence, Intentionality, State of Affairs.
Subcategories (under “Intentionality”): Subject, Experience, Content, Intention.
Everyday Material Categories: Object, Event, Place, Time, Plant, Animal,
Human Being, Mental Activity, Artifact, Institution.
Subcategories (under “Mental Activity”): Perception, Thought, Emotion, Volition.
Mental life grades off from the conscious into lower levels of awareness
and on into the unconscious – and into paranormal phenomena of split
brains, split personalities, hallucinogenic experiences, and highly disciplined states of meditation. We begin our categorization, however, with
conscious mental activities familiar in everyday life. Empirical investigation into the less familiar will extend our categories, perhaps modifying
them as well.
Naturalism, Dualism, Supervenience, Functionalism
How does the categorial phenomenological ontology I have sketched
differ from extant positions in philosophy of mind and cognitive science?
This ontology posits a diversity of categories in our one world. There
are many kinds of things in the world and many basic categories, even
different levels of categories (formal and material). Yet all things are tied
into one world:“nature,”if you will. This unionist view differs from extant
forms of naturalism precisely in its account of categorial diversity.
Like all forms of naturalism, this ontology rejects substance dualism. It
does not divide the world of concrete things into two domains, the mental things (minds, souls, spirits) and the physical things (bodies, from
quarks to quasars). Rather, mind is part of nature, and so is culture: physical objects and events, mental activities, persons, societies, and cultural
Intentionality Naturalized? 191
institutions all occur in this one world of nature. However, this categorial
ontology rejects the simple identification of mind (and culture) with the
workings of quarks, neurons, and so on. For it posits a more complex
system of ontological categories.
Property dualism takes a step toward categorial diversity in positing two
types of properties (as opposed to substances): physical properties (such
as mass) and mental properties (such as intentionality). The categorial
ontology presented here does not, however, divide properties into just
these two categories. Instead, it posits a structured system of categories
that divide the world into various groups of things, properties, and the
like.
Supervenience theories hold that the mental“supervenes” on the physical – if we assume property dualism but deny substance dualism.15 One
form of supervenience is defined basically as the dependence of a mental
event on physical events in a brain. Because dependence is one of the formal categories in the preceding ontology, supervenience can be placed
in that ontology. However, dependence alone does not place mind in the
world, as shown by the variety of categories we have adduced.
Functionalism takes a different step toward categorial diversity, distinguishing functional and physical properties of a system, and identifying
mind with computational function of a neural system (at least in humans
and other thinking animals on Earth). The functional-physical distinction can be seen as a formal distinction among types of properties. In the
preceding categorial ontology, this distinction would be reconstructed in
terms of a temporal sequence of events: a functional property is defined
solely by a type of result in a sequence of events. However, this categorial
ontology would reject the simple identification of mental event types with
functional types. For there is more complexity in the categorial structure
of mind (and culture) than function alone. To deny functionalism is not
to deny function but to put it in its place.
The ontology above differs from these prominent approaches to philosophy of mind, then, in seeking a systematic account of the categorial
complexity of the world, and mind’s place therein. Recent forms of naturalism are explored from this perspective later, especially the causal and
computational models of mind espoused by Fodor and Dretske.
Internalism and Externalism
Within the preceding categorial ontology, what are we to make of the
debate between internalism and externalism in philosophy of mind?
192 Mind World
On the internalist view of intentionality, what makes a mental activity
intentional, or directed toward its object, is the intentional content held
in mind, where that content is internal to the mental act. By contrast, on
the externalist view, what makes a mental act intentional is context, either
its physical causal history or its cultural circumstance, whence intentional
content must be defined in terms of the act’s contextual relations. The
classical view is internalist, as found in Husserl and defended recently
by John Searle and (with a contextualist reformation) myself.16 But the
predominant attitude in recent cognitive science has been externalist, as
expressed by Fodor and Dretske.17
As we work with the foregoing unionist ontology, however, it becomes
clear that the opposition between internalism and externalism is false. A
mental act has both a causal genesis and a phenomenological character.
And these two aspects of the act belong to different ontological kinds: the
former is an instance of the category Dependence, whereas the latter is an
instance of the category Intentionality (and relevant subcategories). Our
ontology must recognize both the genetic tree and the phenomenological
character of a mental act, its “clade” and its “phenotype” (to borrow
biological idiom) – and neither reduces to the other.
In the ontology, Intentionality and Dependence are distinct formal
categories. They must be distinct because they have radically different
ontological structures. Thus, the structure of intentionality is that of an
experience (by a subject) intending an object via a content (a concept,
proposition, image, etc.). By stark contrast, the structure of dependence
is that of one thing’s needing another in order to exist. The ontology of
these structures is so obviously and fundamentally different that reducing
the intentionality of an experience – or its content – to its causal dependence on other things, as externalists sometimes propose, is simply out
of the question.
Intentionality as a Formal Category
Our Cartesian heritage shapes philosophy of mind as a choice among
material categories of substance, so that we think we must say either “All is
Body” or “All is Mind” or “All is divided between Body and Mind” – thus
the lure of physicalism in the age of physics. Furthermore, the emphasis on empirical (“material”) results of recent science – from quantum
mechanics to cognitive neuroscience – leads us to overlook distinctions
about mind that belong properly to formal rather than material ontology.
Thus causal and externalist theories of mind in Fodor, Dretske, and others cathect on material patterns of causation, whereas functionalist and
Intentionality Naturalized? 193
computationalist models of mind obsess over the marvels of computer
engineering (the most “material” of results).
But systematic ontology – ontological systematics – leads us to think
about mind in different ways, avoiding the usual suspects of substance
dualism, idealism, physicalism, functionalism, and the like.
In an ontology that distinguishes formal and material categories, Intentionality belongs among the formal categories. To justify this assumption
in detail would be a long story, arguing that the intentionality of an experience is a unique form differing from that of a quality, a relation, a
dependence. To begin the story, the ontological structure of intentionality is reflected in the distinctive “intensional” logic of idioms such as
“A thinks that . . .” – but we are talking about ontological structures of
experiences in the world, not logical structures of our language about
experiences.18 Accordingly, we must distinguish the object of thought
from the content, the idea or concept of the object, through which one
thinks about it, through which it is “intended” by one’s thinking. This
structure of intention-via-content is formally unique. Thus, the ontological structure of an intention or intentionality is just plain different from
that of a quality, a relation, a dependence, and so on. Hence, Intentionality, Quality, Dependence, and others are distinct formal categories.
It is natural to speak of the “intentional relation” between an experience and its object, yet this “relation” is so unusual that Intentionality
and Relation deserve the status of distinct formal categories. The formal
structure of an intention, or “intentional relation,” is that of subject-actcontent-object. Thus, a subject has an experience or act that has a certain
content, which prescribes a certain object (if such object exists); intentionality is this directedness of act by subject through content toward
object. Is this the structure of a relation among subject, act, content, and
object? Either “yes” or “no” carries problems. If it is a relation, its number of relata varies: sometimes there is no object and it is a three-place
relation; otherwise there is an object and it is a four-place relation. This
is not normal for relations. As Brentano and Husserl observed, intention
is “relation-like” if not a proper relation. If it is not a relation, then what?
Then it has its own form, as described, and a distinct category.
The category Intentionality is formal because it may apply to materially
different domains. The same form of intentionality, such as perceiving a
window, may apply to very different experiences in a fish, a lizard, a parrot,
or a cat, not to mention an extraterrestrial. The functionalist, with Fodor,
would explain this by identifying mentation with computation, realizable
in different physical systems and even through different algorithms. That
194 Mind World
is not my point. Without reducing mind to computation or function or
causal role, we should see that Intentionality is a form that applies to
different domains of mental activity just as Relation applies to different
domains of individuals – whence intentionality is a formal, not material
property of thoughts, perceptions, and the like.
What I want to stress is the role of intentionality in an ontology of mind
among other things. If we recognize Intentionality as a formal category,
we shall not be tempted to find the difference between consciousness
and, say, electricity in two types of substance called “mind” and “matter.” We shall instead articulate a unified world in which such different
phenomena take their places.
Problematic Features of Consciousness and Intentionality
Three features of mental activity have been problematic in recent discussions in philosophy of mind cum cognitive science. These are intentionality, qualia, and consciousness. Within the ontology outlined earlier,
where lie these crucial features of mind?
Consciousness is the great mystery of the day in cognitive science,
yet the familiar turf of phenomenology. Now, part of the problem of
consciousness is its formal structure and part is its material character.
Three crucial aspects of consciousness are intentionality, reflexivity, and
qualia.19
The intentionality of a mental activity, on the above ontology, is a formal feature instancing the formal category Intentionality. The structure
of intention (subject-act-content-object) applies to both conscious and
unconscious mental activities.
Now, part of the formal intentional structure of a conscious mental activity is its reflexivity. When I have a conscious experience, I am reflexively
aware of my having the experience. This form may be specified in phenomenological description, articulating content, by saying: “In this very
experience I now see that wriggling snake on the path before me.”(See
Chapter 3 for details.)
The prefix “in this very experience” specifies the reflexive structure
or content that in part makes the experience conscious. That reflexivity
makes it, as Sartre stressed, a “consciousness (of) itself”: not a separate
act of introspection or reflection on the experience, but a prereflective awareness of the experience as it transpires. For Sartre, indeed, this
character is definitive or constitutive of consciousness – an insight that
cognitive science has yet to appreciate fully or to rediscover.
Quite a different feature of consciousness is the subjective character
of an experience: its “phenomenal” or “qualitative” character, or qualia
Intentionality Naturalized? 195
(especially its sensory characters) – in Thomas Nagel’s idiom, “what it
is like” to have that experience. What makes an experience conscious,
I would urge, is the combination of qualitative character and reflexivity,
which takes its place within the intentionality of the conscious experience.
To what category do qualia belong? Qualia are properties of an experience or act of consciousness. Their formal category is Quality. Their
distinction from other qualities is a material distinction within the domain
of conscious mental activities – falling under the material categories Perception, Thought, Emotion, Volition – to which the forms Quality and
Intentionality apply. Specifically, they are distinct in type from qualities
such as the spiking frequency of a neuron or its receptivity to certain neurotransmitters. The intentional form of an experience must make room
for these qualities we call subjective.
Now, if Intentionality is a formal ontological category, and Mental Activity a material ontological category, then an event of cognition has the
form of an intentional mental activity with a specific intentional content
such as “I now see that snake on the path before me.” The event may
have the material essence of being implemented by a neural process in
a human brain. Or if the event is a thought performed by a being on
a distant planet, its material essence may be very different. Whatever
its material essence, it may also have a form not of Intentionality but
of Dependence – its causal role, which is a form of dependence on past
and future events. But because Intentionality and Dependence are different formal categories, there is no temptation to reduce intentionality to
causal-computational role. However, the formal category Intentionality
does not apply to every material domain: rocks do not have intentionality, and neither do silicon chips. (This is not to beg the question of
whether Intentionality reduces to Causation or Dependence. Remember, the formal properties of intentionality are not preserved by causal
reduction.)
Finally, note that consciousness does not reduce to computation. Not
all conscious activity is computation; feeling dizzy is not computing. Perhaps, as neuroscience suggests, a certain form of computation is part of
the neural activity that implements every state of consciousness. But that
is a different matter, a gray matter.
Critique of Naturalism
Fodor for Naturalism
Where classical phenomenology, in Husserl and his progeny, opposed something called “naturalism,” today’s cognitive science assumes
196 Mind World
naturalism as a given – the only option of good science – and seeks to
“naturalize” mind and specifically intentionality.
Current attitudes toward naturalizing intentionality run the gamut,
however. W. V. Quine once rejected the “science of intention” because it
does not reduce to physical science and indeed requires a different logic
than the rest of natural science. But he now gives our talk of intentional
attitudes a place of honor alongside the language of natural science, and
he says consciousness is something that must be explained.20 Jerry Fodor
assumes psychology must be intentionalistic – embracing intentionality in
belief, desire, and so on – and also naturalistic; rejecting behaviorism and
eliminativism along with idealism, he proposes to “naturalize”intentional
content in the language of thought. Daniel Dennett endorses talk of intentionality, if only as a convenient“stance”toward what is really going on
as the brain crunches data; his “explanation” of consciousness explains
it (away) as multiple drafts of code in the brain. Paul Churchland and
Patricia Smith Churchland have sometimes denounced intentionality as
a remnant of folk psychology, viewed as superstition rather than empirical wisdom; but they do not now dismiss consciousness itself, the crowning achievement of neural activity. David Armstrong identifies mental
activity, including intentionality, with brain activity, and he analyzes consciousness as the brain’s monitoring itself. Fred Dretske takes consciousness and intentionality seriously and analyzes their structure as a flow of
causal “information” outside the head. Donald Davidson and Jaegwon
Kim, meanwhile, have held that the mental and intentional “supervenes”
on the physical activity of the brain – a ramified form of physicalism. And
Francis Crick (Nobel Laureate biochemist) gives scientific credulity to
consciousness and even the “soul” while declaring, “You’re nothing but
a pack of neurons.”21
Fodor holds that “naturalizability” is required for any serious science,
not just psychology or cognitive science. He defines naturalism in effect as
the assumption that “everything that the sciences talk about is physical”
(Fodor 1994: 5). This assumption boils down to physicalism, or materialism, the ontological view that everything is physical. When Quine proposed “naturalizing” psychology and epistemology, he urged following
the methods of natural science (and expressing its results in first-order
logic) – thereby securing a physicalist ontology, unless science leads elsewhere. He thus opposed beginning with a “first philosophy,” whether a
metaphysics (as in Aristotle) or an epistemology (as in Descartes) – or,
we might add, a phenomenology (as in Husserl).22 The naturalism in
cognitive science today assumes both ontological and methodological
positions, but I want to focus on the ontological.
Intentionality Naturalized? 197
Fodor thinks a naturalistic intentional psychology requires two
doctrines:
1. Causalism, the view that intentional content (and also linguistic
meaning) is “information,” in the technical sense of a physical
structure transmitted by a causal flow.
2. Computationalism, the view that thinking is computation, in the technical sense of computer science, that is, an algorithmically defined
process in either a digital computing machine or a neural network
in a brain.
(The labels “causalism” and “computationalism” I introduce here for
convenience.) Causalism – championed by Dretske with Fodor following
suit – is a variety of:
3. Externalism, the view that content or meaning is defined by its
external relations to physical (or on some views social) relations
with what lies “outside the head” and indeed outside the given
intentional state.
And computationalism, of course, is a variety of:
4. Functionalism, the view that thinking is wholly defined by its function
in a physical system as it interacts causally with other processes of
thinking and ultimately with processes in the physical environment.
Classical computationalism also assumes:
5. Syntactic formalism, the view that the properties of thinking that
count are formal, syntactic properties of physical symbols processed
in brains or computing machines.
An alternative to classical computationalism is:
6. Connectionism, the view that the properties of thinking that count
are vector distributions of relevant properties in dynamic networks
of neurons in brains, which can be modeled or perhaps shared by
computer systems with parallel distributed processing.
Some connectionists consider this view a paradigm shift away from classical computationalism (assuming syntactic formalism) and thus from
the computer model of thought. Fodor, however, counters that the form
of the computation, whether logicosyntactic or connectionist, is merely
a matter of implementation.23 And the implementation of computation, whether classical or connectionist, lies in causal processes. Hence
198 Mind World
causalism remains in force. Dretske, however, downplays computation
inside the brain and stresses the causal flow of “information” outside
the organism. So the project of naturalizing the mind, for Fodor and
Dretske, is to show how intentionality and other features of mind can be
accounted for in a way consistent with causalism, hence externalism – all
in the service of naturalism, and ultimately physicalism.24
Unfortunately, neither causalism nor computationalism (nor connectionism) preserves the properties of consciousness and intentionality. The phenomenological character of consciousness (beginning with
qualia) is not preserved, and intentionality is not simply identical with
the structure of a causal process – whether realizing a connectionist or a
classical computational architecture. Within philosophy of mind, in the
cognitive science tradition, John Searle has argued clearly and effectively
the inadequacy of the computationalist view: syntactic form alone does
not yield intentional content or meaning; neither, we might add, does
connectionist form. Consciousness and intentionality, Searle holds, are
irreducibly subjective properties of mental states, realized, however, in
our brains.25 Earlier, within the phenomenological tradition, Husserl,
Sartre, Merleau-Ponty, and others charted the properties of consciousness and intentionality in great detail, always distinguishing them from
various natural, physical properties of human bodies.
The properties of intentionality do not fit into the causal-computational view Fodor prefers. Fodor’s task in The Elm and the Expert is to
bite the bullet and try to make his preferred view amenable to the basic
features of intentionality. But Fodor recognizes that his favored naturalizing gets wrong the basic properties of intentionality. How does he justify
going on with his approach? He says the problem cases – Frege cases
and Twin cases – do not happen very often. That means his theory is
wrong: they happen and his theory does not handle them. On consciousness he is silent, beyond saying it is not tractable, in his kind of research
program.
Dretske in Naturalizing the Mind bites the bullet in closer detail, recasting the features of conscious experience as external, causal features. He
treats intentionality as natural“indication”: a perceptual state indicates its
object as a speedometer indicates the speed of the automobile (all these
things being physical entities). In effect Dretske builds in causal terms a
replica of the structure of intentionality, and likewise for qualia and introspection. That gets the structure right but applies it to the wrong phenomena. By tracing the causal flow of physical “information” that gives
rise to the important features of consciousness, intentionality, qualia, and
Intentionality Naturalized? 199
introspection, Dretske shrewdly tracks the causal preconditions of such
phenomena.(See Chapter 1 on substrate and Chapter 3 on levels of consciousness.) But he identifies the physical structures called “information”
in information theory with the intentional contents called “information”
in everyday talk about contents of thought or speech. Now, intentional
“information” in one’s thought may well depend on physical-causal “information” in one’s environment and indeed in one’s brain. But the two
things have very different properties.
Although it may seem that causalism cum externalism, and/or computationalism cum functionalism, serve the needs of naturalism and current
cognitive science, they do not fit with prior results of phenomenology and
indeed ontology. Phenomenology, in concert with ontology, has detailed
structures of conciousness and intentionality in well-defined arguments
from well-defined observations. These are sound results achieved by basic
principles of rational inquiry in good philosophy or good science (as detailed, notably, by Quine in his general epistemology).26 Yet externalism –
the broad assumption behind causalism, computationalism, and functionalism – does not jibe with a phenomenologically sensitive account of
intentionality in perception and other indexical forms of intentionality,
as I have argued in a detailed study of acquaintance.27
Fodor says, “I’m not going to fuss about ontology except where it
matters” (1994: 3). Unfortunately, a full theory of intentionality and consciousness requires more ontology than is countenanced by Fodor and
most philosophers of mind in cognitive science.
Nor do Fodor et alii fuss about phenomenology, even where it matters. Consciousness has become a hot topic in cognitive science ever since
neuroscientists declared it worthy of hard science.28 Yet the writings of
Fodor et alii show little awareness of the extant results of phenomenology.
Owen Flanagan’s Consciousness Reconsidered is advertised with the proclamation that its author “examines more problems and topics associated
with consciousness than any other philosopher since William James”; yet
the book makes no mention of Husserl, Sartre, or any other phenomenologist, even though Flanagan wants to make room for phenomenology
in cognitive science.29 In a recent issue of Scientific American philosopher
David Chalmers, writing in the new wave of consciousness-raising, says
that conscious experience might yet be explained not by neuroscience
but by “a new kind of theory” that gives new fundamental laws about subjective conscious experience.30 Aptly he broaches the need to distinguish
between subjective and objective aspects of“information.” Of course, that
“new” kind of theory is called phenomenology, following Husserl. Many
200 Mind World
of its laws are already in place about intentionality, content, sensation,
temporal awareness, and consciousness of one’s experience, one’s body,
oneself, and others.
If psychology is to be set within the bounds of naturalism, naturalism must be set within the bounds of an adequate phenomenology and
ontology. To this end there is much to be learned from Husserl.
Husserl against Naturalism
Husserl opposed naturalism as an ontology that would reduce the essence
of consciousness and intentionality to physical-biological properties. Today he would have opposed, with Searle, their reduction to causal or
computational properties, as opposed to intrinsically subjective characters of experience. But Husserl’s antinaturalism was part of a systematic
phenomenological ontology whose details developed in Ideas I and especially Ideas II. Husserl opposed naturalism on methodological as well
as ontological grounds, as he sought foundations for natural science in
a “first philosophy” that began with reason and ultimately grounded all
knowledge in phenomenology. Here I focus only on the ontological issues. (Other phenomenologists, from Heidegger to Sartre, have also rejected naturalism. Here I draw on my own reconstruction of Husserl’s
account of mind and body sans idealism.)31
Husserl posited three “regions” of being, which he called Nature,
Spirit or Culture, and (Pure) Consciousness. These regions are not domains of individuals or events; they are species or “essences.” They are
the highest “material” essences or genera to which individuals or events
may belong. Nature is characterized by physical properties including spatiotemporality, mass, causality, and life. (Under Nature Husserl distinguished the living from the merely physical and my “living body,” or Leib,
from my “physical body,” or Korper ¨ .) Culture is characterized by persons
in communities holding values and making history. And Consciousness
is characterized by the subjectivity of experience and the central feature
of intentionality. Importantly, one and the same individual or event may
be characterized by all three essences. For instance, I am a biological
organism of the species Homo sapiens sapiens, and thus under Nature; I
am also a person teaching philosophy, and thus under Culture; and I
am as well an ego experiencing this event of thinking, and thus under
Consciousness.
More precisely, bringing in Husserl’s ontology of dependent parts or
“moments” (what some philosophers today call “tropes”): the same individual, I, has distinct moments that are particularized instances of the
Intentionality Naturalized? 201
essences Consciousness, Culture, and Nature – say, my moments of thinking, being a teacher, and being over six feet tall. Moreover, there are relations of ontological dependence among such moments or tropes. Thus,
my thinking depends upon – cannot occur without – certain activities in
my brain and other activities in my culture. (There lies a specific doctrine
of the “supervenience” of the mental on the physical and cultural. But
that is another story.)
Because the same individual can fall under these three essences,
Husserl is a monist about substances but a pluralist about essences. In
today’s terms his metaphysics is a plural-aspect view: a form of substancemonism and property-pluralism – or essence-trialism.
On Husserl’s account, intentionality is a property of consciousness, or
part of the essence Consciousness, whereas force and mass and energy
and causation are properties of nature, or part of the essence Nature,
whereas value and empathy and community are properties of culture,
or part of the essence Culture. Husserl’s “transcendentalism” boils down
to just this distinction among three irreducibly distinct essences and the
properties that characterize them. According to Husserl, the “transcendental”region of consciousness does not reduce to the “natural”region of
physical causation or to the “cultural” region of community. For Husserl,
these three ranges of essence are presented through three distinct ranges
of sense or noema expressed in three distinct ranges of language about
the intentional, the physical, and the cultural. There are thus three grades
of “transcendental” involvement: at the levels of language, sense, and
essence respectively.
Given Husserl’s ontology, what is wrong with the causal-computational
view of mind is that it wrongly identifies two “moments” of an event
of thinking: those of its intentional character and its causal-neurocomputational role. These two moments may be parts of the same event,
and even interdependent, but they are numerically distinct. Notice that
it matters not whether the computational architecture is classical or
connectionist.
In Husserl’s idiom, “naturalism” is the ontology that reduces the essence of consciousness to the essence of “nature,” reducing the property
of intentionality to a form of spatiotemporal-causal connection between
act and object of consciousness. Naturalism in that sense Husserl rejected,
vehemently. There is however a different ontology of nature and consciousness, and thus a different conception of “naturalism,” that fits well
with principles of phenomenology and ontology along the lines articulated by Husserl and facilitates the results of cognitive neuroscience. The
202 Mind World
first section in this chapter sketched a model of such a phenomenological
ontology.
“Nature” Reborn with Consciousness and Intentionality
The ancient meaning of“nature”survives today in the distinction between
“nature” and the “nature of things.” Originally “nature” (phusis) meant
the nature of the world (kosmos), as the earliest Greek philosophers
posited an order to things in the world – the primordial assumption that
became science. Today “nature” means the world so ordered, and its order
is detailed by the “natural” sciences.
Where nineteenth-century naturalism stressed the organic character
of the world and our place in it, late twentieth-century naturalism has
stressed the physical character of the world, including the biological,
along with the methodology of the physical sciences. Yet “naturalism” in
current philosophy of mind (in Fodor, Dretske, and many others) takes
a much more specific form: embracing not only physicalism but computationalism, causalism, externalism. What we need now, to accommodate
the results of both phenomenology and cognitive neuroscience, is a naturalism endowed with metaphysical imagination.
The proper conception of nature begins with the recognition that our
intentional states of consciousness are part of nature, with the characteristics uncovered by phenomenological ontology. To see this, we must
recognize two points not adequately addressed by Fodor et alii: first, that
we experience states or events of consciousness, notably intentional states;
and second, that events of consciousness enter into relations of intentionality as well as relations of causation(glossing intentionality and causality as
relations). The first point is the crux of phenomenology, the second its
cognate in ontology. We must recognize unconscious intentional states
as well, but here let us focus on the conscious ones.
The fundamental insight of naturalism should be the view that there
is but one world, ordered and unified as nature. This view I have dubbed
unionism. The traditional term “monism” stakes a different claim, that
there is only one substance or one kind of substance. Unionism, by contrast, says there is only one (actual) world.32 Within the order of the
world, however, there may be different categories of things, including
fundamentally different kinds or properties. When we turn to mind, we
find that consciousness and intentionality are fundamentally different in
character from processes of causation and computation, and we should
not shoehorn them into the wrong category. Consciousness and intentionality depend on and enter into causal processes, both inside and
Intentionality Naturalized? 203
outside of the brain – notably in perception and action. And intentionality, at least in some forms, involves computation. But, while perfectly
“natural” and part of this one world, consciousness and intentionality do
not consist simply in causal or computational processes, as Fodor et alii
hoped. As with life in general, ontology is complicated and phenomenology plays its role.
John Searle has rightly stressed that the properties of consciousness
and intentionality are irreducibly subjective properties that nevertheless
occur in nature in biological events in human and animal brains.33 They
are not merely syntactic properties (whatever that may mean for neural
events as opposed to our linguistic symbols); indeed, syntax itself is in
the eye or ear of the beholder, a matter of convention. Consciousness
and intentionality have “internal” properties of representation, properties that do not reduce to causal sequence or the transmission of physical
structures called “information.” Their essence is not wholly “external,”
or “outside the head,” in either causal or social relations.
First we must recognize the existence of consciousness and its phenomenological structure; this requires the practice of phenomenology
(by whatever methodology works: let us not bog down over “¯epoch¯e,”
“hermeneutics,” etc.). Then we must get consciousness and intentionality into our ontology: we must place them properly, categorize them,
in our ontology. To distinguish “subjective” properties of consciousness
and intentionality from “objective” properties of stones and quarks is not
to lapse into a dualism of mental and physical substance. It is rather to
chart the distinctive features of things, recognizing a pluralism of categories of properties of various things – all in the one world in which we
live.
The naturalizing of mind proposed by Fodor, Dretske, et alii would
reduce intentionality and consciousness to the flow of physical “information” through a brain or of bits in a computer. What could motivate
the picture of mind – our own experience – as nothing but bits in the
void? I suspect two assumptions of perennial philosophy: there are only
particles in the void; all else is illusion. The first assumption is a simplistic materialism, the second a foolish metaphysics. Both have ancient
roots.
But consciousness is not an illusion.34 And intentional structure in
belief, desire, and the like is not (as the Churchlands used to suggest)
a theoretical illusion, an old wives’ tale from ancient folk theory. Conscious intentionality is, in fact, the medium of illusion: an illusion is the
presentation of something in consciousness that does not exist (outside
204 Mind World
the “intention”). If we know anything at all, it is that we have conscious
intentional experience of this and that. Such is the subject matter of phenomenology, and to deny it is folly. (See Chapter 2.) We cannot deny
consciousness and its intentionality in the name of science, one of the
great achievements of human consciousness, any more than we can deny
human language, the medium in which science is carried out. What we
can do instead is wonder how consciousness – along with language and
thinking-in-language – is realized or implemented in the order of nature
described by recent science.
And twentieth-century physics, its foundations still unsettled, strongly
suggests that the world order is not that of particles in the void. In relativity theory, space-time itself has topological structure – it is not a “void.”
And in quantum mechanics, the things in quantum systems are not “particles,” but things in wavelike states that may collapse into particle-like
states. These eigenstates, for that matter (pun intended), may even be
states of consciousness: that much is perfectly compatible with quantum
physics. And on some interpretations of quantum mechanics, the collapse of the wave function is itself triggered by an observation, an act of
consciousness – in which case consciousness is implicated in the structure
of physical states below the level of what normally we call causal processes.
I do not mean to suggest that proponents of today’s naturalism are
ignorant of twentieth-century physics, not to mention biology and neuroscience. Quite the contrary. My point is that considerations of phenomenology and ontology along with physical and cognitive science lead
to a very different view of the role of consciousness and intentionality
vis-`a-vis causal and computational processes.
I do mean to suggest that we all carry vague background assumptions
that shape our theorizing in less than obvious ways. These attitudes are
part of the “background” of intentionality, unearthed by phenomenological reflection on intentionality itself.35 Perhaps they have the status
of “memes,” cultural ideas passed on like genes in the cultural realm.36
And I do mean to suggest that the reigning form of naturalism is led by
such background attitudes into the untenable reduction of the properties of consciousness and intentionality to causal and/or computational
properties.
What we need instead is a wider ontology behind naturalism, a unionism that places mind in nature without losing the distinctive characters
of consciousness and intentionality. This requires a sensitive metaphysics,
an ontology with appropriate formal, material, and phenomenological
categories – an ontology along the lines of that sketched here.
Intentionality Naturalized? 205
Conclusion: One World, with Consciousness and Intentionality
I have outlined a categorial phenomenological ontology according to
which consciousness and its intentionality, reflexivity, and qualia are part
of nature, yet carry their own distinctive characters. In such an ontology
the world has a certain unity, articulated by formal and material categories, within which consciousness takes its place. Everything there is,
from quarks to consciousness to governments and black holes, takes its
place within this one world.37
The lesson for philosophy of mind, from phenomenology to cognitive
science, is that “naturalism” looks dramatically different when we look
to such a phenomenological ontology, wherein mind cannot be “naturalized” by reducing consciousness or intentionality to a causal or computational process. Yet only through such an ontology can we ever hope
to understand the phenomena of consciousness and intentionality and
their role in the natural order of things.
Notes
1. The term “material”is used here always to contrast with “formal,” not to mean
physical, or composed of matter-energy.
2. In 1993 the inaugural Jean Nicod lecture on philosophy of mind and cognitive
science was given by Fodor in Paris, published in 1994 as The Elm and the Expert.
In 1994 the Jean Nicod lecture was given by Fred Dretske in Paris, published
in 1995 as Naturalizing the Mind. The aim of the conference in Bordeaux in
October 1995, for which this chapter was written, was to assess the challenges
of naturalization for principles of Husserlian phenomenology. I have used
these books by Fodor and Dretske, appropriately, to set the stage for my
project.
3. The following remarks about Husserl’s ontology rest on my reconstruction
thereof in D. W. Smith 1995.
4. Again see D. W. Smith 1995.
5. Compare McIntyre’s argument (1986).
6. Quine’s mature view of reification is found in his Pursuit of Truth (1992).
7. Compare Quine and Ullian 1978.
8. In biology systematics is the discipline of classifying living beings: distinguishing individuals, populations, species or taxa, and categories (Taxon, Family,
etc.) – distinguished in terms of phena (observable qualities), synapomorphs
(shared derived traits), and so on. Here I borrow the term “systematics” for
the ontological discipline of classification of entities. The distinction between
formal and material categories defines one type of ontological systematics.
I focus on the formal-material distinction as a device that increases “systematic” complexity in fruitful ways, but ultimately the goal is to use ontological
complexity to account for important distinctions concerning intentionality
206 Mind World
and other features of ontological structure. My conception of ontological systematics derives from discussions with Charles W. Dement and Peter Simons,
in connection with the PACIS project at Ontek Corporation.
9. Wittgenstein’s Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus (1921) posited such a structure
in the world, at least the world as we find it, the world as represented in our
logical systems. David Armstrong (1996) has argued recently for such an ontology of states of affairs; see also Armstrong 1989. Prior to Wittgenstein’s
work, however, was Husserl’s conception of states of affairs as a “formal”
ontological category, in both his Logical Investigations (1900–1) and his Ideas
I (1913).
10. The ontology of dependence is launched in the Third of Husserl’s Logical Investigations (1900–1). Husserl’s basic notion is reconstructed and elaborated
in Barry Smith 1982 and Simons 1987. A detailed model of dependence is
developed in Thomasson 1995.
11. States of affairs are “formal” structures in Husserl’s ontology in Logical Investigations (1900–1). They play a similar role in Wittgenstein’s Tractatus LogicoPhilosophicus (1921).
12. These formal categories are transformed, for example, in Whitehead’s categorial ontology, where “actual occasions” are tied in nexus to “forms” as well
as to other actual occasions. See Whitehead 1978/1929. Whitehead’s actual
occasions replace Aristotle’s substances, and his demi-Platonic forms tied to
actual occasions do not reside in a Platonic heaven. Still, actual occasions
would count as individuals in the present formal-material categories (although Whitehead posits his own system of categories with many differences
from the simpler scheme sketched here). Thus, in the categorial ontology
we have so far sketched, it remains to specify the status of species, qualities,
relations, and so on. They might be treated as Platonic forms that can be
exemplified by particular natural objects, or as Aristotelian universals that
gain reality only insofar as they are instantiated, or as “tropes” or Husserlian
“moments” (particularized universals) falling under the categories Species,
Quality, and the like, or as Whiteheadian forms concretely tied into actual
occasions. Alternatively, Platonized naturalism might posit Platonic forms as
falling under the formal categories of Species, Quality, Relation, and so on,
in an ontology of natural objects. Compare Linsky and Zalta 1995, with a
specific formulation of a Mallian ontology that mixes abstract and concrete
objects in a systematic ontology.
13. See the account of the world of common sense in Barry Smith 1995.
14. Compare my reconstruction of Husserl’s ontology, where the same concrete
individuals or events – in the world of facts – may instantiate the very different ideal essences of Nature, Culture, Consciousness. See D. W. Smith
1995.
15. See Kim 1993.
16. See the works by Husserl and Searle cited in the References. My approach
(1989) defines a contextualist variant of internalism, which I now see as a
third way, neither internalist nor externalist, emphasizing dependence or
“grounding” of intentionality in context.
17. See Fodor 1994 and Dretske 1995.
Intentionality Naturalized? 207
18. The relations between the intentionality of consciousness and the intensionality of sentences about intentional states are detailed in Smith and McIntyre
1982.
19. I have analyzed these structures in detail (1989: chap. 2).
20. The reasoning in Quine’s position is expressed in Pursuit of Truth (1992). See
my appraisal 1994. Quine’s thesis of the indeterminacy of translation was a
further reason Quine (1960) gave for renouncing a science of intention, and
thus phenomenology. I do not treat that problem here, although Quine’s
modified views (1991) lead, I think, to a different take on indeterminacy,
notably where empathy plays a role in understanding others.
21. See the References for relevant works of the authors cited. Compare Fodor
1994: 14–15, summarizing some current attitudes.
22. See Quine 1969.
23. On the controversies surrounding connectionism, see Horgan and Tienson
1991.
24. Philosophy of mind in cognitive science has centered on the issue of how
the mental might be reduced to the physical, focusing on what might be
the structure of causal or computational process that defines mind. The
structure of intentionality might then be preserved either as a language of
thought (“sentences in the head,” on Fodor’s earlier view) or as a flow of
physical “information” outside the head (Dretske’s view, partly adopted recently by Fodor). Or intentionality might be eliminated (as the Churchlands
have sometimes urged, assuming, mistakenly, that intentionality must have
the structure of sentences in the head). But there is a wide range of options
between these extremes, preserving some intentional structures and eliminating others. Moreover, the ontological issues are joined by questions about
the relations among our different levels of theory about mind and brain. The
complexity of these issues is brought out in Bickle 1992a, 1992b.
25. See Searle 1983, 1992.
26. See Quine and Ullian 1978 for the basic principles of framing knowledge in
general and scientific theory in particular. In Pursuit of Truth (1992) Quine
begins to make room for the intentional, but see my article (1994).
27. See my book (1989).
28. The new attitude is evident, for instance, in Crick 1994 and Churchland
1995.
29. See Flanagan 1992. The proclamation is a reviewer’s remark printed on the
back of the book. Flanagan’s discussion is indeed sensitive to a wide variety of
phenomenological issues about consciousness, and he explicitly says that “it
is incredible to think that we could do without phenomenology altogether”
(p. 12), proceeding to argue for how phenomenological claims should be
combined with empirical results of neuroscience. However, many issues of
phenomenological analysis of structures of consciousness are explored in
great depth and detail in the writings of Husserl, Heidegger, Sartre, MerleauPonty and many others in the phenomenological tradition. Good science
cannot pass over these results, any more than it can pass over significant
empirical experiments such as those of split-brain patients or blind-sight.
30. See Chalmers 1995, announcing his forthcoming book (1996).
208 Mind World
31. See D. W. Smith 1995.
32. Even if there are many metaphysically possible worlds, each is a unified
system: that is the point of unionism. And even if the “many-worlds” version
of quantum mechanics is true, the different parallel worlds are related in an
ordered way, and the “world” we find ourselves in has its unity: that is the
point here stressed by unionism. Unionism is thus orthogonal to the issue of
other possible worlds in modal ontology (actualism denies that view) and to
the issue of other parallel worlds of quantum mechanics. I would also argue
that unionism is orthogonal to the issue of nominalism (often construed as
ruling out abstract entities because they belong in a Platonic heaven apart
from the natural world); I return to this point later but only briefly.
33. See Searle 1992.
34. As a skeptic might have it: see Rey 1988.
35. The intentionality of a thought depends on a background of not only personal beliefs and skills, but also attitudes and ideas extant in one’s culture.
This conception of background is explored in my “The Background” in
Chapter 5. Compare Husserl’s notion of horizon in Ideas I and II, reconstructed in Smith and McIntyre 1982, and Searle’s notion of background
(1983, 1992).
36. The term “meme” was coined by Richard Dawkins and championed by
Dennett (1991).
37. A cognate ontology is that which underlies the PACIS computer system under
development by Ontek Corporation. That ontology is the collective work of
Charles W. Dement, Peter Simons, and myself. Parts of the ontology are previewed in Simons and Smith (with Charles W. Dement) 1993 and in Simons
1994–95, reflecting on a more recent version of our PACIS categories.
References
Aristotle. 1963. Categories. Translated by J. L. Akrill. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.
Armstrong, David M. 1989. Universals: An Opinionated Introduction. Boulder:
Westview Press.
1996. A World of States of Affairs. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Armstrong, D. M., and Norman Malcolm. 1984. Consciousness and Causality.
Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
Bickle, John. 1992a. “Revisionary Physicalism.” Biology and Philosophy 7: 411–30.
1992b. “Mental Anomaly and the New Mind-Brain Reductionism.” Philosophy
of Science 59: 217–30.
Chalmers, David. 1995. “The Puzzle of Conscious Experience.” Scientific American
(December): 80–86.
1996. The Conscious Mind. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Churchland, Patricia S. 1986. Neurophilosophy: Toward a Unified Science of the MindBrain. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Churchland, Paul M. 1995. The Engine of Reason, the Seat of the Soul. Cambridge,
Mass.: MIT Press.
Intentionality Naturalized? 209
Crick, Francis. 1994. The Astonishing Hypothesis: The Scientific Search for the Soul. New
York: Scribner’s and Sons.
Davidson, Donald. 1980. “Mental Events.” In Davidson, Essays on Actions and
Events, pp. 207–25. Oxford: Oxford University Press. First edition, 1970.
Dennett, Daniel. 1987. The Intentional Stance. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1991. Consciousness Explained. New York: Little, Brown.
Dretske, Fred. 1981. Knowledge and the Flow of Information. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
1995. Naturalizing the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Dreyfus, Hubert, ed. 1982. Husserl, Intentionality and Cognitive Science. Cambridge,
Mass.: MIT Press.
Flanagan, Owen. 1992. Consciousness Reconsidered. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Fodor, Jerry A. 1975. The Language of Thought. New York: Thomas Y. Crowell.
1994. The Elm and the Expert: Mentalese and Its Semantics. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
Horgan, Terence, and John Tienson, eds. 1991. Connectionism and the Philosophy
of Mind. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
Husserl, Edmund. 1963. Ideas. Translated by W. R. Boyce Gibson. New York:
Collier Books. German original, 1913. Originally titled Ideas Pertaining to
a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, First Book.
1970. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. Translated by J. N. Findlay from the
revised, second German edition. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul. New
edition, edited with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a preface
by Michael Dummett. London: Routledge, 2001. German original, 1900–1,
revised 1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920 (Investigation VI).
1989. Ideas pertaining to a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, Second Book. Translated by Richard Rojcewicz and Andre Schuwer. ´
Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers. From the German original unpublished manuscript of 1912, revised 1915, 1928.
Kim, Jaegwon. 1993. Supervenience and Mind. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.
Linsky, Bernard, and Edward Zalta. 1995. “Naturalized Platonism and Platonized
Naturalism.” Journal of Philosophy 0022–362X: 525–55.
McIntyre, Ronald. 1986. “Husserl and the Representational Theory of Mind.”
Topoi 5: 101–13.
Quine, W. V. 1960. Word and Object. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
1969. Ontological Relativity and Other Essays. New York: Columbia University
Press.
1992. Pursuit of Truth. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press.
Quine, W. V., and Joseph S. Ullian. 1978. The Web of Belief. New York: Random
House.
Rey, Georges. 1988. “A Question about Consciousness.” In Herbert R. Otto
and James A. Tuedio, eds., Perspectives on Mind, pp. 5–24. Dordrecht: D.
Reidel.
Searle, John R. 1983. Intentionality. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1992. The Rediscovery of the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Simons, Peter. 1987. Parts. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
210 Mind World
1994–95. “New Categories for Formal Ontology.” Grazer Philosophische Studien
49: 77–99.
Simons, Peter, and David Woodruff Smith, with Charles W. Dement. 1993. “The
Philosophical Foundations of PACIS.” Paper presented at the International
Ludwig Wittgenstein Symposium, Kirchberg am Wechsel, Austria, 19 August.
Smith, Barry, ed. 1982. Parts and Moments. Munich: Philosophia Verlag.
1995. “Common Sense.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl, pp. 394–437. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, Barry, and David Woodruff Smith, eds. 1995. The Cambridge Companion to
Husserl. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
1994. “How to Husserl a Quine – and a Heidegger Too.” Synthese 98 (1): 153–
73.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl, pp. 323–73. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Thomasson, Amie L. 1995. “The Ontology of Fiction: A Study of Dependent
Objects.” Ph.D. dissertation, University of California, Irvine.
Whitehead, Alfred North. 1978. Process and Reality. Edited by David Ray Griffin
and Donald W. Sherburne. New York: Free Press, Macmillan. First edition,
1929.
7
Consciousness and Actuality
Abstract. Alfred North Whitehead elaborated an ontology of process that
we can use to frame a novel ontology of consciousness and cognition.
Whitehead amplified the familiar notion of temporal process (“all is flux,”
echoing Heraclitus) in an ontology that presages today’s dynamical systems theory, with obvious application to both events in nature and events
of consciousness. But Whitehead also developed a different and deeper
notion of process: what I call “ontological becoming,” as opposed to temporal becoming. Ontological becoming, I propose, is the formal structure
realized in the material structure of temporal becoming. Both apply to
processes in general and to processes of consciousness in particular. From
Whitehead’s ontology we can thereby begin to learn how we might develop
an ontological “systematics,” a broad and fundamental framework that gives
consciousness its due along with the rest of the world.
Segue. In “Intentionality Naturalized?” we argued that the theory of mind
needs a broad and sensitive ontology that places consciousness in the structure of the natural world while preserving the phenomenological character of conscious experience. As we saw in that essay, one approach to a
sufficiently rich ontology borrows from Husserl, developing not only his
analysis of the structure of intentionality, but also his distinction between
formal and material ontology (see “Basic Categories” in Chapter 8). A
still more radical approach is found in Whitehead’s process ontology, to
which we turn here, looking for a model of how to analyze consciousness
I wish to acknowledge my debt to the late John D. Goheen of Stanford University. I first
studied Whitehead’s metaphysics in a course taught by Professor Goheen, and the image of
“prehension” has stayed with me for three decades. In recent years the image has emerged,
with a life of its own, in the very practical needs of the PACIS database project of Ontek
Corporation. I thank Charles W. Dement of Ontek for many discussions of Whitehead’s
ontology and its role in prefiguring the ontology of PACIS. My thanks finally to Liliana
Albertazzi for inviting me to write this essay, in a sense for seeing its need.
211
212 Mind World
in a wider structure of the world. In the long run the aim is to borrow
from Whitehead’s “depth” ontology (as I shall call it) to build a framework for an ontology that respects both physical and phenomenological
structure.
Cognition in the Structure of Existence
If cognitive science is the science of cognition, what is cognition?
Whitehead’s answer is drawn directly from his fundamental ontology:
cognition is a special form of what he calls“prehension,”taking more particular forms in conscious perception, thought, imagination and other
psychological processes.
From Whitehead’s sweeping metaphysics I propose to appropriate key
elements and reconstruct from these a fundamental ontology that applies to consciousness in cognitive processes. This Whiteheadian ontology has shaped a novel approach to fundamental ontological categories
used in database design or knowledge-based computer systems.1 And the
Whiteheadian approach to conscious processes is instructive for the dynamical systems approach in cognitive science, which has been proposed
as an alternative to both the neural-network approach and the languageof-thought approach to modeling cognitive processes.2
Whitehead’s main concern was not cognitive process, but process in
general. Within a fundamental ontology of process, he turned to processes of consciousness, perception, belief, and emotion – almost in passing as he sought to limn the truly ultimate structure of reality. For those
raised in empirical science, or in philosophy oriented to science and modern logic, Whitehead’s ontology will seem the most extreme of a priori
speculative metaphysics, written moreover in a philosophical prose that
is as complex as Russell’s is simple. Still, the mathematical wizardry in
Principia Mathematica was more Whitehead than Russell, and the purity
of Whitehead’s ontological vision (shaped by his mathematician’s brain)
is kindred in soul with the physical vision of an Einstein or a Hawking.
It is this pure ontology that I want to frame, in order to construct from
it, along lines Whitehead prescribed, an ontology of consciousness in
various forms of cognition.
The resulting Whiteheadian ontology does not naturalize consciousness by reducing it to physical process. Rather, it places all of nature cum
consciousness in a world formed by one ontological process of “becoming” through “prehension.”
Consciousness and Actuality 213
Whitehead’s Background and Context
Alfred North Whitehead (1861–1947) is known as a principal founder
of mathematical logic, through the monumental Principia Mathematica
(1910–13), which he coauthored with the younger Bertrand Russell.
Whitehead and Russell exerted an indirect influence through logic on
computer science and thus on the computer model of mind that informs cognitive science today. Whitehead’s later years, however, saw him
engaged in abstract metaphysics, in work that is usually treated quite separately from his early work in mathematics and then mathematical logic.
Here I address Whitehead’s ontology as developed in Process and Reality
(1929; delivered as a lecture series in 1927–28).
Whitehead posited a basic structure of “process” applied to all reality.
As a mathematician he was keenly attuned to the physics of relativity and
quantum mechanics emerging in his day. As a British-born philosopher
he had his eye also on the early modern philosophers, from Descartes
to Locke and Hume, for whom mental activity was salient. Yet as a philosophical cosmologist he looked to the ancient Greeks, to Plato and the
pre-Socratics, especially Heraclitus, who famously proclaimed that everything is flux. Reflecting a further sensibility of the nineteenth century, Whitehead called his metaphysical-cosmological system “the philosophy of organism,” and he did indeed think of the cosmos itself as
alive in a fundamental sense. Today his system is often called “process
philosophy” and is influential in theology, because Whitehead defined a
place for God in the cosmos, as the first being formed by the process of
“becoming.”
With an eye to cognitive science, as opposed to metaphysical system,
consider from Whitehead’s era three very different approaches to the exploration of the mind. Wundt’s experimental psychology used introspection to study sensations. Freud’s psychoanalysis used hypotheses about
drives and infantile experience to explain adult neuroses. And Husserl’s
phenomenology used the technique of reflection on one’s own experience to analyze the structure of consciousness, including the dynamics
of time consciousness. Here were three starkly different “sciences” of the
mind, differing in both aim and method. Yet each had to address the
dynamics of changing and interacting states of mind, and today’s cognitive science carries the analysis of mind into mathematical-computational
models of the dynamics of cognitive process. Whitehead’s ontology of process ought to shed light on the most basic structure of mental process as
a flow of cognitive occasions.
214 Mind World
Whitehead drew where possible on classical ideas: in Plato, Aristotle,
Heraclitus, Descartes, Leibniz, Locke, Hume. Yet the proximate influence
on his conception of process was the French philosopher Henri Bergson.
In Matter and Memory (1896), Bergson painted a metaphysics featuring
“durations” rather than classical enduring natural objects, what Aristotle
called “substances” (ousia). The world is a vortex of passing events in
interaction with one another, each bearing within it “images” of others. Bergson envisioned a monism whereby this metaphysical picture applies equally to physical events and to mental events. Physical events were
soon to be described in relativity theory and then in quantum physics,
while mental events were soon to be described in phenomenology, in
psychoanalysis, and ultimately in what has recently emerged as cognitive
science. Bergson would have wished his metaphysics to apply to the dynamics of quantum and relativistic physical phenomena and equally to
the dynamics of perception, imagination, thought, and desire. Bergson
expressed his vision in vivid impressionistic prose, mirroring in metaphysical language the flow of painting in French impressionism and fauvism.
I find Whitehead’s metaphysical prose impressionistic yet mathematical.
Whitehead’s technical terms are often vividly, disconcertingly, mentalistic. Yet his terminology reflects a Bergsonian style of monism rather than
the varieties of absolute idealism that ran from Hegel to F. H. Bradley
and J. M. E. McTaggart in England. Like absolute idealism, Whitehead’s
philosophy of “organism” preached the radical interaction of all things;
however, for Whitehead, the ultimately actual entities are neither mental
nor physical, but constitute what we know as the mental and the physical
alike.
McTaggart taught philosophy at Cambridge when Whitehead taught
mathematics at Cambridge. Like McTaggart, as well as Bergson,
Whitehead focused on the process of coming to pass in time, where the
truly “actual” – what deserves the name – is in process, becoming rather
than already become. McTaggart (1927) argued that only the present
is actual, that past and future are unreal, indeed that time itself is
unreal because a time or occurrence cannot be first future, then present,
then past, as these temporal attributions are mutually contradictory.
Whitehead (1927–28) held, by contrast, that past and future are perfectly real but not “actual,” or actualizing, that is, in process of becoming.
Still, Whitehead had his eye on bigger fish when he framed actuality as
becoming: his concern was not only coming to pass in time, but coming to
be an entity at all, of which coming to be an entity in temporal flux is a
special case.
Consciousness and Actuality 215
Whitehead’s fundamental ontology of process, I want to suggest, provides formal tools that can be used to analyze the substantive claims about
process, including processes of consciousness, put forth in empirical or
experiential studies. By “formal,” however, I mean pertaining to formal
ontology, as opposed to formal languages of logic, mathematics, or computer science. Here I draw on Husserl’s distinction between formal and
material ontology. “Formal” ontology seeks invariant structures that are
realized in various domains of entities, whereas “material” ontologies analyze ontological structures within a given domain (such as mind, body,
culture, or what have you).3 Whitehead’s account of the process of becoming an entity is, I shall try to show, a formal ontology of “process,”
and consciousness inherits this structure of process.
The Outlines of Whitehead’s Ontology
Whitehead’s ontology in Process and Reality is framed by an elaborate
system of categories (1978: 18–30). I can address only that part of the
system which I appropriate for present purposes.
The most fundamental category, dubbed “the Category of the Ultimate,”is that of Creativity or Becoming. Becoming is the process by which
many entities become – come together to form – one actual entity. Becoming is also called concrescence (p. 21). Importantly, the category of
becoming “replaces Aristotle’s category of ‘primary substance’” (p. 21).
Aristotle’s paradigm of a primary substance (ousia, or being) is a concrete being such as an individual human organism; such a being is a
member of a species, in this case humanity, and species themselves belong to the category Aristotle called secondary substance. For Aristotle,
a primary substance is something that endures through time and may
change its qualities or “accidents” such as its relations to other things
or its location; and it is a fusion of matter and form, the matter undergoing change in form. Now, Whitehead’s leading claim is that such
beings are not the most fundamental type of thing in the world. More
fundamental are the processes of becoming that form all actual entities.
Becomings, not “substances,” are the ultimate constituents of the world,
the cosmos. Aristotelian substances are, for Whitehead, the product of
many processes of becoming, and this view is an abstract version of modern physical theory, for which everyday objects are products of relativistic,
quantum phenomena of a more fundamental and very different kind.
Presupposing the category of Becoming are the Categories of Existence (p. 22). There are eight such categories, of which I shall focus on
216 Mind World
three: Actual Entity, Eternal Object, and Prehension (p. 1). An actual
entity, or actual occasion, is a concrete entity rather like a “point” event
(p. 2). An eternal object, or form, is what Plato called a form (eidos),
but Whitehead conceives a form, or “form of definiteness,” as a “pure
potentiality” for being “determined” in a specific way. For Plato, a form
is an actual but eternal entity (residing in a Platonic heaven, as Plato is
often parodied, a parody Whitehead rejects). For Whitehead, however, a
form is not an actual albeit eternal entity, but rather a pure potential for
actual entities: the way an actual entity could be – which is “eternal” insofar as it is not realized in an actual entity (p. 3). Now, prehension is the
tie that binds everything together; it is the way in which things are, most
fundamentally, related. If you will, prehension is simply the fundamental
form of relatedness, and particular prehensions are the basic “concrete
facts of relatedness.” Thus, actual entities prehend other (prior) actual
entities, and they prehend forms as well. (More on all this shortly.)
Presupposing both the Category of Becoming and the Categories of
Existence are two further types of categories. The Categories of Explanation are twenty-seven axiomatic conditions, or types of interaction, among
actual entities, eternal forms, prehensions, and the like – basic conditions
laid down by axioms in the ontology. And the Categoreal Obligations are
nine preconditions laid down, as it were, by further axioms. These categories together weave the story of reality as told in Whitehead’s ontology.
Importantly, Whitehead ranks different types of categories: most basic is
the Category of Becoming, next are the Categories of Existence, then the
Categories of Condition and then those of Precondition (as I am calling
them).
With this ranking of categories, Whitehead moves well beyond
Aristotle, who launched the idea of ontological categories with his famous list:
Primary Substance (Individual), Secondary Substance (Species),
Quantity, Quality, Relative, Where, When, Position, Having, Acting,
Being-Acted-Upon.
Aristotle’s term kategoriai originally meant simply “predicates,” or types
of entities. By contrast, what are called categories in biology today –
Species, Genus, Family, Order – are ranks of taxa (groups of living things),
defining their place in the classification scheme. Indeed, Whitehead’s
categorial scheme shows something of the complexity that has since
arisen in modern biological systematics, or higher classification. The
great biologist Ernst Mayr even refers to Whitehead while distinguishing the evolutionary roles of species as opposed to higher taxa.4 Where
Consciousness and Actuality 217
systematics in biology is the science of diversity of living beings, we may
conceive ontological systematics as the science of diversity of all beings, classifying things of all types and categories. A ranking of categories is then
part of the task of ontological systematics, and of “formal” ontology in
the sense that Husserl had in mind.
Assuming Whitehead’s scheme of categories, let us turn to his account
of actual entities. To be “actual” is to be active, to be in process, to be part
of the flux that constitutes all actuality. As Heraclitus insisted, all is flux,
“all things flow” (p. 208). Thus, in Whitehead’s vision, the atoms of the
universe are not particles but points in the flux, points of flow: processes
of becoming, or actual entities or occasions in the process of becoming, coming into actuality. Points along the flow are bound together by
prehension: later occasions or actual(izing) entities prehend or “feel” earlier ones. We think of a physical“feeling”in gravitation or electromagnetic
attraction, but prehension is – I should like to say in interpretation – the
formal connection that is realized as gravitational or electromagnetic connection, or physical causation, in the relevant scenario of physics. Again,
we think of an emotional “feeling” in personal attraction, where prehension is the formal connection that is realized as a bond of friendship, in
the relevant scenario of psychology. And we may think of a cognitive “feeling”in conscious perception of an object, where prehension is the formal
connection that is realized as a bond of intentionality – to use Husserl’s
term, which has now gained currency in phenomenology, philosophy of
mind, and cognitive science, but was unknown to Whitehead. The root
meaning of “intention” is to aim or reach toward something; this is exactly the metaphor behind Whitehead’s term “prehension,” as he initially
defines a prehension as having “a vector character” (p. 19). Whitehead
looks to Leibniz’s Monadology (p. 19) as a model: indeed, his ontology
is like Leibniz’s but with the monads’ windows open. However, whereas
Leibniz looks to mental operations for a model of the physical, producing
his unique brand of idealism, Whitehead sees the notion of prehension
as striking a “balance” between mental and physical operations (p. 19). A
better way of putting the point, I propose, is to say that prehension is the
common formal structure that is realized in operations of both mental
and physical “feeling.”
Now, Whitehead recognizes different types of prehension (p. 1). There
are positive prehensions, called “feelings” (illustrated provisionally here).
But there are also negative prehensions, which block or“eliminate”things
from feeling. We address only positive prehensions, or feelings (p. 2). An
actual entity E prehends not only other actual entities but also eternal objects or forms. Prehending an actual entity is called “physical” prehension,
218 Mind World
whereas prehending a form is called “conceptual” prehension (as discussed later). E’s prehending a form F is Whitehead’s variation on what
we call, since Plato, E’s exemplifying F. In Whitehead’s idiom, E “feels”
the form F; alternatively, F “ingresses” into E.
For Plato, forms exist eternally and thus in a different realm than
particulars; for Aristotle,contra Plato, forms (species, accidents, locations)
exist in the concrete world but only insofar as instantiated by particular
substances. But Whitehead places both concrete actual entities and abstract forms precisely in the flux that is reality. The difference is that a
form is a potential for definiteness in an actual entity, whereas an actual entity is a definite realized entity, that is, in process of becoming and thereby
being fully “determined.” Later we address, in Whitehead’s fine-grained
analysis, a hybrid entity that combines the actual and the potential. (I
leave the details as a surprise to the reader.)
The prior actual entities prehended by a given actual entity E form
the “datum” of E, or the “actual world” of E. The constitution of E – its
“real internal constitution” (p. 25) – includes the pattern of prehensions
in which E feels the actual entities in its actual world and also feels the
forms that are realized in it. Importantly, there is an ontological relativity in Whitehead’s scheme: the actual world of E is not the actual world
tout court, for every actual entity has its own “actual world.” The point to
remember is that Whitehead’s ontology is “tensed,” or rather indexicalized. Recall McTaggart’s distinction between two structures of time, or
two types of temporality: times are ordered in what he called the A-series,
where times are past, present, or future; and times are ordered in the
B-series, where one time is before another time. It is customary to say
that B-series time is time viewed from outside the space-time framework,
as it were eternally, whereas A-series time is time viewed from within the
space-time framework, and thus indexically. Now, actual entities are ordered by becoming. To add a dose of McTaggart to Whitehead, actual
entities are “present,” or presently actualizing. This currency defines “actuality” for Whitehead. (That is in fact one of the meanings of “actual” –
in French and German, current events.) Think, then, of flux as a transition from past (formerly) actual entities into present (currently) actual
entities and toward future (potentially) actual entities, always informed
by the realization-in-progress of potentials called forms.
There is, however, a second type of flux or“fluency,” which we consider
shortly: not the transition from past actualities to a presently unfolding
actuality but the concrescence wherein many actual entities come together
to form one actual entity (p. 210).
Consciousness and Actuality 219
Whitehead’s ontology seems apt for the world of twentieth-century
physics, for points of matter-energy in a field of space-time in a relativistic
quantum framework. But how does it apply to the everyday world of objects and properties, the world described by Aristotle’s metaphysics, which
is a more theoretical version of our commonsense ontology? Whitehead
did not simply throw out Aristotelian metaphysics. He said Aristotle’s
category of substance is not fundamental, but he wanted to preserve
everyday objects or “substances” as emergent from more fundamental
“actual entities.” Moreover, he preserved the Platonic category of form.
For Whitehead, actual entities have forms, as did Aristotelian substances,
but forms are potentials for actual entities.
Ontological versus Temporal “Becoming”
All things are in flux, “all things flow,” Whitehead proclaims (1978: 208),
echoing Heraclitus. Yet Whitehead immediately introduces a crucial, and
I think profound, distinction:
[T]here are two kinds of fluency. One kind is the concrescence which, in Locke’s
language, is “the real internal constitution of a particular existent.” The other
kind is the transition from particular existent to particular existent. This transition,
again in Locke’s language, is the “perpetually perishing” which is one aspect of
the notion of time, and in another aspect the transition is the origination of the
present in conformity with the “power” of the past. (p. 210)
Thus, Whitehead distinguishes two fundamentally different types of
“flux” in the process of “becoming.” We might say that transition from
one entity at one time to another entity at a later time defines temporal
becoming, as the later entity comes into being in time. And we might say
that concrescence of one entity out of others defines ontological becoming,
as the one comes into being on the basis of the others.
Suppose we treat the process of “flowing” as a function or operation in
the mathematical sense (Whitehead being a mathematician, after all).
Then temporal becoming is an operation that assigns to one set of occasions
{O1, ... , Ong another occasion O*. The occasions Oi in the original set,
which are the arguments of the function, are “prior” in time, “past” occasions relative to O*, which is “present” or “actual (now).” By contrast,
ontological becoming, or concrescence, is an operation that assigns to one
set of actual entities {E1, ... , Eng another actual entity E*. The entities
Ei compose the “datum” or “actual world” of E*. Notice that the term
“occasion” carries temporal connotations, whereas “entity” does not.
220 Mind World
Whitehead assumes “the ontological principle” (pp. 19, 24) that every
actual entity has its “reasons” or grounds, the entities out of which it
is formed by concrescence: “no actual entity, then no reason” (p. 19).
Clearly, this principle constrains ontological rather than temporal
becoming.
Although Whitehead’s language of “process” resonates with the sound
of transition through time, his ontology actually treats concrescence, or
ontological becoming, as what is fundamental. Indeed, extension in time
and space is itself something that must come into being, or become,
and its becoming is not temporal. That is, temporality becomes, but its
becoming is not temporal. In Whitehead’s words:
[I]n every act of becoming there is the becoming of something with temporal
extension; but ... the act itself is not extensive, in the sense that it is divisible into
earlier and later acts of becoming which correspond to the extensive divisibility
of what has become. (p. 69)
This extensive continuum [of time] is one relational complex in which all potential objectifications find their niche. It underlies the whole world, past, present,
and future. ...It is not a fact prior to the world; it is the first determination of
order – that is, of real potentiality – arising out of the general character of the
world. In its full generality beyond the present epoch, it does not involve shapes,
dimensions, or measurability; these are additional determinations of real potentiality arising from our cosmic epoch. (p. 66)
[T]he extensive continuity of the physical universe has usually been construed
to mean that there is a continuity of becoming. But if we admit that “something
becomes,” it is easy, by employing Zeno’s method, to prove that there can be no
continuity of becoming. There is a becoming of continuity, but no continuity of
becoming. ...In other words, extensiveness becomes, but“becoming”is not itself
extensive. (p. 35)
Thus, extension in time is a fully “general” structure of the world. And
that structure of temporality must itself become. It is in fact “the first determination of order”: first in ontological priority. Time is not, however,
the first thing to exist in time, first in temporal priority.
We can clarify Whitehead’s distinction of two kinds of flux if we distinguish between formal and material ontology. Temporal becoming is, in
these terms, a “material” process, and ontological becoming is a “formal”
process: concrescence, or ontological becoming, is the formal structure
that applies to all actual entities, in particular to the material domain
of entities in temporal becoming. Indeed, for Whitehead, concrescence
is the most fundamental formal ontological structure of the world: the
category of “the ultimate.”
Consciousness and Actuality 221
While the process of ontological becoming is the heart of Whitehead’s
ontology, the most salient application of the ontology is to temporal becoming, or “process” in the familiar sense, of which mental process is a
special case. This dual sense of “process” plagues the text of Process and
Reality. May I suggest a resolution of this interpretative quandary? If we
analyze the two types of flux in the manner outlined here, then the formal structure of ontological becoming is reproduced at a different level
in the material structure of temporal becoming. There is a recursion of
basic structure in this Whiteheadian analysis of “becoming”: not only is
temporal becoming the product of ontological becoming (time becomes,
takes ontological form), but its form is the same as that of ontological becoming, or concrescence. However, even if this form does recur at both
levels (and I am not sure it really does), it remains misleading to use the
same term “process” for both the becoming of a temporal transition and
the transitioning itself.
I share Whitehead’s appreciation of the pre-Socratic philosophers of
ancient Greece, whose concerns with truly fundamental issues like “the
one and the many” have been eclipsed in more recent philosophy. But
where Whitehead nods to Heraclitus on “flux,” I bow to Anaximander of
Miletus on “origin,” or ontological basis. In Anaximander’s metaphysical
vision, all types of beings in the world (including the most basic physicalchemical elements as he knew them) have their origin, or arche, in something he called the apeiron, the “nonlimited” or “nondetermined.” In this
vision I find roots of the notion of ontological becoming, whereby every
being or entity (ousia in Aristotle) is based in or arises from (what I like
to call) primordial modes of being, which are not entities at all but rather
ways in which entities become entities, and so are the bases of beings.
I believe Whitehead’s “category of the ultimate” – Becoming – follows
this Anaximandrian architecture. Thus,“determinate” actual entities, extended in time and space-time, are constituted in ways of prehending that
are not themselves “determinate” entities.5
Prehension or “Feeling”
The ontological structure of an actual entity or occasion, for Whitehead,
is that of a complex defined by relations of prehension. Indeed, an actual
entity or occasion is a “cell,”in a sense akin to the biological. As Whitehead
puts it:
[T]he cell is exhibited as appropriating for the foundation of its own existence,
the various elements of the universe out of which it arises. Each process of
222 Mind World
appropriation of a particular element is termed a prehension. The ultimate elements of the universe, thus appropriated, are the already constituted actual
entities, and the eternal objects. The process itself is the constitution of the actual entity; in Locke’s phrase, it is the “real internal constitution” of the actual
entity. (1978: 219)
An actual entity is in this way “constituted” by its pattern of prehensions of
other actual entities, and also eternal objects or forms. Thereby it becomes
“one” actual entity, formed by concrescence out of “many” actual entities
and forms.
Prehension – called “feeling” or “experience” (if positive) – is not per
se a psychological phenomenon. Prehending something is not the same
as being conscious of something, what Husserl dubbed intentionality. As
we shall see, consciousness is a special form of prehension, and not vice
versa.
There are two primary species of prehension or feeling: physical
and “conceptual.” Physical prehension is what we think of as causation,
whereas conceptual prehension is what we think of as being informed by
a property or form. I say “what we think of” because Whitehead wants
to underwrite our familiar, Aristotelian metaphysics by a very different
ontology of prehension. In Whitehead’s words:
A simply physical feeling is an act of causation. The actual entity which is the
initial datum is the “cause,” and the simply physical feeling is the “effect,” and the
subject entertaining the simply physical feeling is the actual entity “conditioned”
by the effect. This “conditioned” actual entity will also be called the “effect.”
(p. 236)
A conceptual feeling is feeling an eternal object in the primary metaphysical
character of being an “object,”that is to say, feeling its capacity for being a realised
determinant of process. (p. 239)
Whitehead thinks of a Platonic form or “eternal object” – what we call a
kind, quality, or relation – as a potential or capacity for being determined
thus and so (p. 23), and this is what is felt “conceptually.” Rather than
residing in a Platonic heaven, it exists here in the one Heraclitean flux
that is the world. Its prehension Whitehead calls “conceptual”; “formal”
or “eidetic” would avoid the suggestion of a mental activity of conceptualization, but Whitehead’s terminology deliberately flouts the distinction
between the mental and the nonmental.
Now, every actual entity is formed by concrescence through prehensions of both actual entities and forms, as depicted in Figure 7.1. Note the
Consciousness and Actuality 223
actual entity < 
 actual entity
 form < 
figure 7.1. Concrescence.
mixing of mentalist and physicalist terminology as Whitehead makes this
point:
In each concrescence there is a twofold aspect of the creative urge. In one aspect
there is the origination of simple causal feelings; and in the other aspect there is
the origination of conceptual feelings. These contrasted aspects will be called the
physical and mental poles of an actual entity. No actual entity is devoid of either
pole; though their relative importance differs in different actual entities. Also
conceptual feelings do not necessarily involve consciousness; though there can
be no conscious feelings which do not involve conceptual feelings as elements in
the synthesis. (p. 239)
So every actual entity “feels” both physically and conceptually, feeling
both (other) actual entities and eternal forms. Feeling a form is called
“mental” but does not involve consciousness, or indeed what we think of
as mental activity in thought or perception. Here, in the most elementary structure of the world, Whitehead nails down the monism we noted
earlier – under the influence of Bergson rather than Spinoza (who assumed one substance). Furthermore, we begin to see the niche Whitehead
has in mind for consciousness: whatever is special about consciousness,
it consists in “conscious feelings,” and these always involve feeling forms.
Furthermore, all the world – from actual entities on up – is defined
by prehensions of both forms and actual entities: “Conceptual feelings
and simple causal feelings constitute the two main species of ‘primary’
feelings. All other feelings of whatever complexity arise out of a process of
integration which starts with a phase of these primary feelings” (p. 239).
Whitehead holds a kind of atomism (pp. 19, 35, 238), because actual
entities are atomic and everything complex is built up from prehensions
of actual entities and forms. But the atomism is not that of physics, where
elementary particles are bound together by physical-chemical bonds
(physical feelings of causation). Nor is the atomism that of logical atomism, as propounded by Wittgenstein in the Tractatus (1921) or Russell in
“The Philosophy of Logical Atomism” (1918), where objects and properties or relations are bound together by instantiation and the resulting
“states of affairs” or “facts” are then further bound together by logical
operations such as “and.”
224 Mind World
Propositional Feeling
The constitution of every actual entity includes prehensions of both actual entities and forms, and the process of concrescence constitutes the
entity through these prehensions. Now, concrescence itself takes place
in three phases that Whitehead calls reception, supplementation, and
satisfaction (1978: 211–15). The concrescence consists in “reception” of
a datum comprising other actual entities and forms, “supplementation”
of the reception by something like interpretation, and completion or
“satisfaction” producing the new actual entity. (These are not temporal
but logical or rather ontological “phases” of the process.) Concrescence
is not a psychological operation, yet Whitehead analyzes concrescence
into a structure like that of cognition, with a distinctly Kantian twist, and
it is in one phase of concrescence that consciousness itself may emerge in
some cases. Let us see how.
The supplementation phase of concrescence Whitehead analyzes into
two subphases called “aesthetic” and “intellectual” (pp. 213–14). Aesthetic supplementation “has welded the data into a new fact of blind
feeling,” and then, “This phase requires an influx of conceptual feelings
and their integration with the pure physical feelings.” This integration of
physical and conceptual feelings is “intellectual sight.” This integrative
higher-phase feeling Whitehead calls “propositional feeling” (p. 214).
Specifically, a form or eternal object is a capacity for “determination,”
that is, being propertied or related in a specific way. When a form is realized in an actual entity, that entity is determinate in respect of that form.
And a propositional feeling is a higher-phase prehension of the propositional integration of a form in a determinate actual entity: “An eternal
object realised in respect to its pure potentiality as related to determinate
logical subjects is termed a ‘propositional feeling’ in the mentality of the
actual occasion in question” (p. 214).
In the web Whitehead weaves, we discern the picture in Figure 7.2.
Thus, propositional feeling is a higher-phase prehension that consists in
feeling, with intellectual sight, the integration of the received actual entities and forms. That integration is called a “proposition” (p. 256) and the
prehension of a proposition is a propositional feeling. Figure 7.3 depicts
this form of prehension, whose fine structure is depicted in Figure 7.2.
(We return to Whitehead’s ontology of propositions later.)
In this scheme for propositional feeling we hear the echo of Kant’s
famous dictum, “Intuition without concepts is blind; concepts without
intuition are empty.” Kant’s concern was the structure of cognition that
Consciousness and Actuality 225
physical reception
aesthetic supplementation
intellectual sight
conceptual reception
aesthetic supplementation
+
+
=
=
propositional feeling
feeling the proposition that those forms are realised in those
entities
actual entities
eternal forms
figure 7.2. Propositional feeling.
(form + actual entity) = proposition (propositional feeling)
figure 7.3. A proposition and its prehension.
synthesizes sensations and concepts, or sensibility and understanding.
This structure applies to objects in nature precisely because, according to
Kant’s transcendental idealism, natural objects are phenomenal projections of cognition. But Whitehead inverts this order of priority: cognitions
carry this structure precisely because all actual occasions have the structure of concrescence, which with intellectual sight begins to constitute an
occasion of cognition or consciousness. (See his note on p. 215.) According to Whitehead, it is in this niche of concrescence, formally defined,
that the structure characteristic of consciousness begins to emerge.
If Whitehead’s scheme seems to force a mentalistic structure onto concresence itself (conceptual feeling is “mental,” propositional feeling is
part “intellectual”), consider a recent program in the philosophy of cognitive science. The Shannon-Weaver notion of “information” (roughly a
conditional probability of this given that) is the basis of Fred Dretske’s
analysis of knowledge as a “flow of information.”6 In Dretske’s ontological vision, cognition is a complex transfer of “information” from the
environment to the knower, but this information-processing is conceived
as a “natural” process, like causation, and the “information” transferred
is not what we usually think of as a “proposition” in a mind. Well, in
Whitehead’s system, prehension itself is a kind of flow of information, as
the datum of actual entities (and forms) that are prehended by an actual
entity is the “reason” or foundation of the entity (the condition of this
entity given those). Thus, we could see the formal structure of the process
226 Mind World
of information flow in either a monistic ontology `a la Whitehead or a
naturalistic ontology `a la Dretske (which is not to reduce Whitehead to
Shannon-Weaver-Dretske).
Propositions
The “objective datum” of a propositional feeling – if you will, the object
of a propositional feeling – is what Whitehead calls a proposition (1978:
256). Specifically:
An “impure” prehension arises from the integration of a “pure” conceptual prehension with a physical prehension originating in the physical pole. The datum
of a pure conceptual prehension is an eternal object; the datum of an impure
prehension is a proposition, otherwise termed a “theory.” (p. 184)
A proposition is a new kind of entity. It is a hybrid between pure potentialities
[or forms] and actualities. The definite set of actual entities involved are called
the “logical subjects of the proposition”; and the definite set of eternal objects
involved are called the “predicates of the proposition.” The predicates define
a potentiality of relatedness for the subjects. The predicates form one complex
eternal object: this is “the complex predicate.” The “singular” proposition is the
potentiality of this complex predicate finding realisation in the nexus of reactions
between the logical subjects, with assigned stations in the pattern for the various
logical subjects. (pp. 185–86)
Here are echoes of the voice(s) of Principia Mathematica.
But Whitehead’s later ontology gives “propositions” an utterly different role than does traditional logic: “Indeed Bradley does not mention
‘propositions’ in his Logic. He writes only of ‘judgements.’ Other authors
define propositions as a component in judgement. The doctrine here
laid down is that, in the realisation of propositions, ‘judgement’ is a very
rare component, and so is ‘consciousness’” (p. 184). Thus, Frege posited
a realm of “thoughts” that serve as “sense” (Sinn) expressed by language
but are entities distinct from both the physical and the mental. Again,
Husserl posited a realm of “noemata” that serve as “sense” (Sinn) or content of mental acts including judgments and are expressible in language
but are distinct in ontological kind from mental acts, physical objects, and
cultural institutions (including words). But Whitehead’s conception of
propositions is strikingly different, and genuinely novel, because a proposition per se is neither component nor content nor object of a mental act
of judgment or consciousness or of a speech act or linguistic expression.
Even in causal “feeling,” a proposition is “what is proposed” for feeling.
Consciousness and Actuality 227
Whitehead insists:
The term “proposition”suits these hybrid entities, provided that we substitute the
broad notion of“feeling”for the narrower notions of“judgement” and “belief.” A
proposition is an element in the objective lure proposed for feeling, and when admitted into feeling it constitutes what is felt. ... Judgement is the decision admitting
a proposition into intellectual belief. (p. 187)
We might call this hybrid entity a state of affairs, following a wellestablished tradition in Austrian philosophy, including Husserl and the
early Wittgenstein, for whom a state of affairs (Sachverhalt: literally “things
related”) is a complex entity formed by a number of objects instantiating a
determinate relation (or one object instantiating a determinate property
or species). However, Whitehead joins Russell in importing this notion
into philosophical English under the term “proposition.” Unfortunately,
we say in English that a proposition is“true” but a state of affairs“obtains”
or is “actual.” Nonetheless, Whitehead presses his terminology into the
virgin territory of prehension loosed from thought or consciousness:
The interest in logic, dominating overintellectualised philosophers, has obscured
the main function of propositions in the nature of things. They are not primarily
for belief, but for feeling at the physical level of unconsciousness. They constitute
a source for the origination of feeling which is not tied down to mere datum. A
proposition is“realised” by a member of its locus, when it is admitted into feeling.
There are two types of relationship between a proposition and the actual world
[or datum] of a member of its locus. The proposition may be conformal or nonconformal to the actual world, true or false. (p. 186)
Thus, Whitehead finds for “truth” a distinct role from that of “actuality”
(becoming, concrescence), even while defining a proposition as rather
like a state of affairs. Remember, the “actual world” of an actual entity is
the nexus of (other) actual entities prehended by the entity. So a proposition felt by one actual entity is true just in case it is conformal to the
relevant actual world of the entities that are logical subjects of the proposition felt.
Here Whitehead divines a subtle line between truth and actuality. It
is natural to think, in a classical vein, that a proposition is a content of
thought or language that represents a state of affairs beyond thought or language. Then a proposition is true if and only if it conforms to the actual
state of affairs it represents. If there is no actual state of affairs to which a
proposition corresponds, then the proposition is false. On a modal variation, a false proposition may yet represent a possible but nonactual state
of affairs. However, on Whitehead’s approach, a proposition is a hybrid of
228 Mind World
actual entities and potentialities, that is, forms as potentialities for determination as thus and so in actuality. And this hybrid stands ontologically,
modally, between achieved actuality and mere potentiality. A proposition,
on this view, is neither a possible state of affairs nor a “proposed” state of
affairs. A possible state of affairs lacks the modal character of potentiality,
or tending toward actuality; and a proposed state of affairs has still a different modal character, if understood as an object intentionally contained in
a mental act of judgment or supposition or imagination, or intentionally
projected from and so dependent on a propositional act of consciousness. No, for Whitehead, a proposition is “proposed for feeling” in the
sense that it is a not an actual state of affairs but is poised in readiness
for being realized or formed through the process of conscrescence into
a nexus of actual entities in determinate relation. And this status is ontologically prior to any conscious act of judgment, imagination, or the
like.
No stranger to logic, Whitehead recognizes quantified as well as singular propositions: “A ‘general’ proposition only differs from a ‘singular’
proposition by the generalisation of ‘one definite set of actual entities’
into ‘any set belonging to a certain sort of sets.’ If the sort of sets includes
all sets with potentiality for that nexus of reactions, the proposition is
called ‘universal’” (p. 186). So Whitehead recognizes not only singular
propositions (involving definite actual entities as “subjects”) but also universally quantified propositions (involving “any” definite actual entities)
and also existentially quantified propositions (involving “some set of actual entities” but not a definite set) (see pp. 257–58). Also, Whitehead
recognizes“negative” as well as“positive” prehensions (p. 23) and thence
affirmative and negative perceptions and judgments in feeling affirmative
and negative propositions (pp. 161, 243, 270–74). So, with truth and the
familiar logical forms of propositions, Whitehead articulates the structures of modern logic: all within the realm of propositions defined as
ontological structures prior to judgment or thought content or indeed
linguistic expression!
If states of affairs are just “out there,” determinate matters of fact with
no intrinsic connection to consciousness and its logical operations in
judgment or language, then it seems gratuitous to posit logically complex states of affairs. Indeed, so it has seemed since Wittgenstein’s Tractatus. Wittgenstein recognized elementary states of affairs (Sachverhalten)
of form [aRb] (and arguably situations [Sachlagen] of form [aRb and not
cQd]). But he did not recognize quantified states of affairs of form [All
Fs are Gs] or [Some Fs are Gs]. Wittgenstein restricted quantification to
Consciousness and Actuality 229
propositions (Satze ¨ ) or thoughts (Gedanken), as in propositions of form
“All As are B” and “Some As are B.” Now, Whitehead gives propositions
a modal status between that of purely “objective” actual entities (faits
accompli) and that of purely “subjective” prehending entities: as hybrid
entities opening toward prehension, or proposed for feeling. But potentialities may be toward “some” or “all” of a set of actual entities, not only
particular concrete actual entities, being determined in a certain way.
Then it is plausible, surprisingly, that there are in the world “proposed”
states of affairs such as the proposition of form “Some Fs are caused by
a.” This hybrid entity integrates the actual entity a with the potentiality
of “some Fs” to be related by causation to a. This “proposition” is just
as much a part of the world as is the proposed state of affairs of form
“a causes b,” which integrates two actual entities with the eternal object
causation.
Here is a more robust variety of “logical atomism” than Russell’s or
Wittgenstein’s. For Whitehead’s ontology of “propositions” allows all the
familiar forms of propositions, not only the singular ones, while placing
them all in the world alongside concrete states of affairs and not merely in
language or thought or its contents. And thereby Alfred North Whitehead
puts logic in its place: in the cosmos!
Consciousness
For Whitehead, consciousness emerges, in the order of the cosmos, only
with higher phases of prehension: an actual entity is “conscious” just
in case it prehends a proposition in a certain way (to be specified later).
Fundamentally, then, consciousness is a propositional attitude, to use
Russell’s idiom. A more systematic phenomenology, I believe, shows that
not all acts of consciousness are propositional in form: judging or seeing
“that this is a lizard” is propositional, but seeing “this lizard” is not.7 For
the moment, though, for the sake of argument, let us grant Whitehead
propositionality. What is striking in Whitehead’s account of consciousness
is the role of his ontology. For consciousness inherits its structure – I
would say its phenomenological structure – from the ontological form of
prehension involved. There lies Whitehead’s novel idea.
Consciousness is not Whitehead’s central concern, and he would seem
to leave the specifics to others – may we say, to phenomenologists in
the lineage of Brentano, Husserl, et alii, whom Whitehead seems not
to have read, and in other respects to neuroscientists in today’s “consciousness studies.” Yet Whitehead explicitly addresses consciousness
230 Mind World
after he analyzes propositional feeling, and he remarks on consciousness all along the way in Process and Reality. In his own idiom Whitehead
writes:
[C]onsciousness presupposes experience, and not experience consciousness. It
is a special element in the subjective forms of some feelings. Thus an actual entity
may, or may not, be conscious of some part of its experience. Its experience is its
complete formal constitution, including its consciousness, if any. Thus, in Locke’s
phraseology, its“ideas of particular things” are those other things exercising their
function as felt components of its constitution. Locke would only term them
“ideas” when these objectifications belong to that region of experience lit up by
consciousness. (1978: 53)
By “experience” and “feeling,” we know, Whitehead means prehension,
and the “subjective form” of a feeling is the way an actual entity receives
the “datum” it prehends. The form of prehension in an actual entity is
“its complete formal constitution,” what defines it ontologically. In some
cases an actual entity is “conscious of some part of its... constitution.”
An actual entity has what we call “ideas of particular things” insofar as it
prehends those things and the pattern of prehensions falls in a region of
prehension “lit up by consciousness.”
In short, consciousness is a particular form of prehension. It consists
in a pattern of prehensions found in the formal constitution of some but
not all actual entities. To be conscious of something, to have an idea of
something, is to have this pattern of prehension. And this pattern is the
ontological form of the act of consciousness: the “formal constitution” of
an actual entity that is conscious.
It is important for Whitehead that consciousness is just another form
of prehension, and not something that exists in a world apart from the
physical in nature. As he writes:
Locke inherited [from Descartes] the dualistic separation of mind from body. If
he had started with the one fundamental notion of an actual entity, the complex
of ideas disclosed in consciousness would have at once turned into the complex
constitution of the actual entity disclosed in its own consciousness, so far as it is
conscious – fitfully, partially, or not at all. (p. 53)
Here is a dramatic statement of monism in Whitehead’s scheme. There is
but one fundamental ontological structure in every actual entity (not two,
one for the mental and one for the physical): the structure of prehension. And consciousness is a specific variation on this one fundamental
structure.
Consciousness and Actuality 231
What variety of prehension, then, is consciousness? Whitehead’s
answer begins after the analysis of propositional feeling:
The nature of consciousness has not yet been adequately analysed. The initial
basic feelings, physical and conceptual, have been mentioned, and so also has the
final synthesis into the affirmation-negation contrast. But between the beginning
and the end of the integration into consciousness, there lies the origination of a
“propositional feeling.” A propositional feeling is a feeling whose objective datum
is a proposition. Such a feeling does not in itself involve consciousness. But all
forms of consciousness arise from ways of integration of propositional feelings
with other feelings, either physical feelings or conceptual feelings. Consciousness
belongs to the subjective forms of such feelings. (p. 256)
The “subjective” form of a feeling is the form of the prehension as it
is absorbed, as it were, by the actual entity (pp. 22, 24), and consciousness is a prehension of a proposition. But there is more. Consciousness
originates, or begins to take form, in awareness of the yes and no, in affirmation and negation. And its final form involves the forms of perception,
imagination, judgment, and the like.
Whitehead finds the crux of consciousness in something utterly
fundamental:
Consciousness is the feeling of negation: in the perception of “the stone as grey,”
such feeling is in barest germ; in the perception of “the stone as not grey,” such
feeling is in full development. Thus the negative perception is the triumph of consciousness. It finally rises to the peak of free imagination, in which the conceptual
novelties search through a universe in which they are not datively exemplified
[that is, part of the datum prehended].
Consciousness is the subjective form involved in feeling the contrast between
the “theory” [or proposition] which may be erroneous and the fact which is
“given.” Thus consciousness involves the rise into importance of the contrast
between the eternal objects designated by the words “any” and “just that.” Conscious perception is, therefore, the most primitive form of judgement. (p. 161)
Notice that negative perception is a positive prehension of a negative fact;
it is not a negative prehension, or not feeling something.
Why is feeling negation at the foundation of consciousness?
Whitehead’s motive here lies in his particular conception of eternal objects or forms, and thus the ontology of propositions, and thus the variety
of propositional feeling that defines consciousness. An eternal object
or form is, for Whitehead, a capacity or potential, and a potential is a
232 Mind World
tendency that might or might not be realized. Accordingly Whitehead
writes:
In awareness actuality, as a process in fact, is integrated with the potentialities
which illustrate either what it is and might not be, or what it is not and might
be. In other words, there is no consciousness without reference to definiteness,
affirmation, and negation. Consciousness is how we feel the affirmation-negation
contrast. Conceptual feeling is the feeling of an unqualified negation; that is
to say, it is the feeling of a definite eternal object with the definite extrusion
of any particular realization. Consciousness requires that the objective datum
should involve (as one side of a contrast) a qualified negative determined to
some definite situation. (p. 243)
So consciousness, or “awareness,” always involves some feeling of the contrast between actuality and potentiality. This is the fundamental ontological
structure of consciousness: it is a prehension of this contrast. To embellish
Whitehead’s example (quoted earlier from p. 161): when I have a perception of “the stone as gray,” I have an awareness of the stone’s actually
being determined as gray and therein potentially being not determined
as gray (say, if the stone’s temperature changed sufficiently to alter its
color). Husserl would have said this awareness of potentiality is part of the
“horizon” of the awareness of actuality.8 Presumably, Whitehead thinks
this “horizonal” awareness of potential negative facts is characteristic of
consciousness but not other types of prehension.
Specifically, consciousness always involves feeling a proposition. And
on Whitehead’s analysis, the ontology of propositions is that of a contrast
between actuality and potentiality, namely, actual entities and forms:
[T]he many components of a complex datum have a unity: this unity is a “contrast” of entities. For example, a proposition is, in a sense, a “contrast.” The most
important of such “contrasts” is the “affirmation-negation” contrast in which a
proposition and a nexus obtain synthesis in one datum, the members of the nexus
being the “logical subjects” of the proposition. (p. 24)
When “different” actual entities are formed into a complex, the resulting
unity depends on the contrast between the entities combined. A proposition combines actual entities with eternal objects, which contrast with
each other precisely because the former are actual and the latter are not.
This is an ontologically fundamental contrast: between beings that are
realized (affirmation) and beings that are not yet realized (negation).
Whitehead claims, then, that consciousness arises most fundamentally in
“feeling” this contrast in the constitution of a proposition. The form of
Consciousness and Actuality 233
(form + actual entity) (propositional feeling) act of consciousness
proposition
negation-affirmation
figure 7.4. The form of consciousness.
consciousness is depicted in Figure 7.4, where an act of consciousness is
a type of actual occasion.
Formal and Material Ontology of Consciousness
What else distinguishes consciousness from propositional feeling in
general? I have not found an answer in Whitehead, and I suspect there
is a reason why I have not.
Whitehead’s further analysis of consciousness fans out into analyses of
particular types of “higher phases” of prehension: in perception, imagination, belief, judgment (pp. 266ff.). Here, I believe, we should proceed
instead into the rich analyses of these phenomena that populate the literature of phenomenology, starting with Husserl’s results on such things,
which hark back to Hume, Leibniz, and others in ways that Whitehead
would approve. In fact, there is a methodological point to be pressed
here.
My point assumes the distinction between formal and material ontology, along lines charted by Husserl. I believe Whitehead uses such a
distinction in practice, without the terminology. Both were mathematicians who turned to a broader canvas, and in this distinction we see the
intellectual habits of the pure mathematician. Roughly, formal ontology
analyzes structure that is invariant, applying to very different domains,
ideally to all domains, whereas material ontology analyzes structure within
a specific domain.
Whitehead approaches the ontology of consciousness through the
analysis of prehension, propositional feeling, and feeling the affirmationnegation contrast in a proposition. It is in this latter feeling of contrast,
Whitehead holds, that consciousness begins to emerge, that is, as a distinct type of prehension, leading into higher phases of prehension. But
here, I believe, the formal ontology ends and the material ontology begins. For the structure of prehension – even of feeling a proposition and
feeling the contrast it involves – is purely formal, applying invariantly to
all prehension up to that level. But the structure of our own characteristically human forms of consciousness is partly “material,” in that the forms
of feeling in our sensory perceptions, our everyday judgments, our desires and volitions are partly conditioned by the special structures of our
234 Mind World
peculiarly human world. Here are forms of prehension that are special to
beings like us, in our earthly environment, in this “epoch” as Whitehead
allows. Perception, judgment, imagination, and emotion have their formal constitution in what Husserl called intentionality and intentional
content, but they also have their specific “material” constitution.
For instance, I see objects around me from the perspective of two eyes
looking binocularly toward things I may touch with my two symmetrically
placed hands, and some of these things are fellow human beings who
share my values and ways of walking and talking and thinking and seeing.
There is much to be said about how these “material” ways of prehending
(or intending) realize the formal ways of prehending that Whitehead has
analyzed. Whitehead the cosmologist has his eyes on the formal structure
of prehension, with much less to say about the material structures of
perception, imagination, and other processes.
Reading Whitehead in this way, the formal structure of consciousness
is that of feeling a proposition and the contrast it involves, whereas the
material structure of, say, perception or imagination is that of feeling a
nexus of actual entities in a region of space-time.
Reflexive Awareness?
The formal structure of consciousness seems to require one further feature. For an act of consciousness is not only a consciousness of X – a
Whiteheadian proposition (we assume for present purposes). It is also
eo ipso a consciousness of itself, of its being a consciousness of X. Without
this reflexive awareness of itself, the act would not be conscious. Along
these lines Brentano and Husserl held that every act includes a primary
intention directed toward its object and a secondary intention directed
toward itself – but in such a way that no infinite regress ensues (with a
third directness toward the second, etc.). Alternatively, I have argued, the
reflexive character is a modification of the intention of X, rather than a
supplementary intention of the intention-of-X.9 (See Chapter 3.)
Whitehead does not explicitly address this reflexive structure in consciousness, but he comes close to ruling it out on formal ontological grounds. An actual entity is in process of becoming, and the final
phase of its concrescence Whitehead calls “satisfaction.” But the structure of concrescence, Whitehead argues, imposes a certain limitation on
consciousness: “No actual entity can be conscious of its own satisfaction;
for such knowledge would be a component in the process, and would
thereby alter the satisfaction” (1978: 85). Whitehead’s argument here
Consciousness and Actuality 235
is elliptic. Becoming cannot be continuous, resolvable into smaller and
smaller becomings, Whitehead has argued with reference to Zeno (p. 35).
Similarly, the satisfaction of an entity – the final phase of its becoming –
cannot be resolved into smaller and smaller component satisfactions.
Here the argument may be that satisfaction cannot be resolved into successively nested satisfactions. That is, if an actual entity were to prehend
its own satisfaction, then its satisfaction would require the satisfaction
(through prehension) of its own satisfaction. With Zeno in mind, this
begins to look like a vicious regress.
Whitehead seems to be propounding a formal ontological principle of
complete generality: an actual entity cannot prehend its own satisfaction.
If we look to the special case of consciousness, however, we find ourselves
in more familiar territory: an act of consciousness cannot be conscious of
its own becoming. And then Whitehead’s principle rules out the reflexive
structure that our consciousness seems intuitively to have.
But perhaps we are looking for consciousness in the wrong places.
Given Whitehead’s “atomism,” the things we know in everyday life are
not simple “actual entities,” but highly complex groupings or “nexuses”
of simple actual entities. Perhaps our everyday conscious experiences are
such nexuses. Thus, when I see a dog, my conscious perceptual judgment
that-this-is-a-dog is a nexus that combines two prehensions: my perceptual
prehension of the proposition that-this-is-a-dog and my reflexive prehension of that perception. These are distinct prehensions, neither of which
includes a prehension of itself, of its own becoming. And my conscious
perception consists of this nexus. Moreover, the dog and I are ourselves
a complex nexus of actual entities. Indeed, Whitehead had his eye on
basic physics, and the philosophy of physics must explain the correspondence between basic physical states and everyday affairs.
Husserl’s phenomenology of time consciousness, in fact, elaborated
such a complex form of awareness. On Husserl’s analysis, my current
phase of perceptual consciousness includes not only a perception of X but
also a spread of “retentions” of successively prior phases of the ongoing
perceptual consciousness, and indeed a spread of “protentions” of anticipated upcoming phases of perceptual consciousness. My current ongoing
experience thus consists of this complex. And my reflexive awareness of
the ongoing experience, we might say, consists in the complex of retentions and protentions. But, as Whitehead requires, no “point” awareness
is an awareness of itself.10
There remains one further wrinkle by which Whitehead’s ontology
might capture what we experience as reflexive awareness of experience.
236 Mind World
proposition X act B reflexion
figure 7.5. Reflexive awareness.
Whitehead allows for the “mediation” of feeling through an actual entity
(p. 226): if A feels B (in A’s actual world), and B feels C (in B’s actual
world), then A feels C not directly but mediately. Thus, if B is conscious
of a proposition X and A prehends B, then A has a mediate prehension
of X. Perhaps then A’s prehension of B together with its indirect prehension of X constitutes a “reflexive” awareness of B’s consciousness of
X. See Figure 7.5. Then the act B does not include a component prehending itself, but is rather accompanied (immediately afterward) by a
further “reflexion” that prehends it. [Consider the levels and biases of
consciousness distinguished in Chapter 3.]
The remaining problem is how well the phenomenology fits with the
ontology.
Critical Reflections
We have sketched on Whiteheadian lines a fundamental ontology and its
application to consciousness. I should like to close with a brief appraisal
of the chief virtues and problems I see in this Whiteheadian system.
The Structure of Consciousness
As Husserl observed, in the wake of Brentano, conscious experience is
paradigmatically intentional: as cognitive science puts it today, mind is
representational. Some states of consciousness (like feeling dizzy) are not
intentional, but most are. Whitehead captures the structure of intentionality in “prehension.” So far, so good. He then analyzes consciousness
as prehension of a proposition. But while it is often assumed that intentional states are essentially propositional in form (like believing that such
and such is the case), some intentional states (like seeing this dog) are
not propositional, and so cannot consist in prehending a proposition.
Whitehead touches on specific forms of consciousness including perception, judgment, and imagination, but the details do not really further
his basic analysis, and we must look elsewhere for the cognitive or phenomenological structures of perception, thought, desire, and the like.
What we should learn from Whitehead about cognition is that we need a
truly fundamental ontology – in some sense a formal ontology – in order
to articulate the structure of cognition and specifically consciousness.
Consciousness and Actuality 237
The Ontology of Propositions
On Whitehead’s analysis, consciousness begins to emerge in “feeling” a
proposition: a hybrid of actual entities and form (say, that a R b), where
the form (the relation R) is a “potential” for definiteness in the actual
entities (a and b). Whitehead may have had in mind a sort of superposition of phenomena as envisioned in quantum mechanics. Alternatively,
what is potential is the possible state of affairs combining these things (that
a R b), which consciousness may prehend indirectly through a propositional meaning entity (the thought that “aRb”), which itself comes into
being with the act of consciousness. Whitehead’s intriguing conception
of propositions, somewhere in between actuality and potentiality and
thereby opening into consciousness, should be parsed, I suspect, into
different ontological structures: actual entities, forms, potentiality, and
meanings.11 In any event, all these things will be subject to the “process”
of becoming in Whitehead’s overall ontology.
The Ontology of Consciousness
The “hard” problem of consciousness, it is said in philosophy of cognitive science today, is how to account for subjectivity: the felt quality of
experience, what it is like to have a certain form of experience. What is
hard is precisely fitting consciousness, in all its phenomenological glory,
into a world of particles in the void. Whitehead took modern physics
to heart, embracing relativity and quantum phenomena, and he developed a metaphysical vision in which everything consists in interactions
of prehension whereby actual entities come into being bearing forms.
Consciousness and causality are then two types of prehension, and mind
and body find their place as different types of nexuses of actual entities,
forms, and hybrids thereof. The details of this way of distinguishing consciousness and causality require, shall we say, further work. In particular,
are propositions as hybrids a good idea? In any event, the architecture
of Whitehead’s ontology is admirable: we must look to fundamental ontology to solve the mind-body problem, so that the distinctive structures of
mind and body emerge respectively from more fundamental ontological
structures something like ontological becoming.
The Principle of Becoming
In broadest strokes, Whitehead’s ontology is a radical revision of the
most basic assumption of classical Western metaphysics: that the world is
fundamentally structured into forms and substantial particulars related
238 Mind World
by exemplification. Plato and Aristotle, and nearly all since, began with
this assumption, while differing on the status of the forms. The traditional
languages of logic – including quantified predicate logic in Principia Mathematica and more recent modal logics – reflect this metaphysics of substances and attributes (including relations). According to Whitehead’s
ontology, however, all this structure emerges from a more fundamental
structure of becoming, or concrescence, through prehension. The principle of ontological becoming, or coming to be an entity, I submit, carries Anaximander’s assumption that the order of “determinate” beings –
what Aristotle would later call substances (ousia: beings) and their species
and attributes – emerges from a different order of the “nondeterminate”
(apeiron). Whitehead begins with such an assumption in the category of
the “ultimate,” becoming. However, he does not treat substances and
attributes in the same way, as “determinates” formed by concrescence.
For although he treats Aristotelian substances as products of concrescence, he leaves Platonic forms as “eternal” objects (albeit potentials).
This disparity between everyday objects and their forms calls for further
evaluation.
The overarching lesson from Whitehead, then, is to see how this principle of becoming might ground all ontological structure. The structure
of consciousness is then to be a special case.
Notes
1. Here I refer to the PACIS system developed in different phases, by
Ontek Corporation in Laguna Hills, California. PACIS is a high-level database
system, designed to represent all kinds of entities in a unified way. I think
of PACIS, philosophically, as a computational phenomenological ontology,
a system of fundamental categories of ontology (what there is) and phenomenology (how we experience or represent what there is) expressed in its
own computer language (how we codify our representations of what there
is). The ontology has been developed by a team consisting of the present
author, Charles W. Dement (Ontek Corporation), and Peter Simons (University of Leeds), with help from Stephen DeWitt and John Stanley (Ontek
Corporation).
2. The dynamicist approach to mind is presented in Port and Gelder 1995.
As the editors write, “Dynamicists from diverse areas of cognitive science
share more than a mathematical language; they have a common worldview”
(p. vii). Their world view, I suggest, is Whiteheadian. That is to say, the greatest classical metaphysical statement of the dynamicist world view is found
in Whitehead, with precursors tracing to Hume and all the way back to
Heraclitus.
Consciousness and Actuality 239
3. The distinction between formal and material ontologies is explicated, in my
own terms, in D. W. Smith 1995. I do not here restrict myself to the details of
Husserl’s particular conception of the distinction, as used in Husserl’s categorial ontology. Rather, I want to unfold a version of the distinction framed
within Whitehead’s very different categorial ontology. Whitehead did not
draw the distinction himself, nor had he read Husserl (to my knowledge).
However, as a mathematician, like Husserl, he would have implicitly understood the distinction. For it is common to think of pure mathematics as
developing formal theories that can be applied to very different domains.
For instance, the theory of differential equations may be applied to the motion of waves of water in fluid mechanics or equally well to the flow of waves
of radiation in electromagnetism theory. Formal ontology, however, is not
concerned with formal structures of mathematical language that describe different domains. Rather, formal ontology is concerned with formal structures
of reality that are realized in different domains.
4. Mayr and Ashlock 1991: 256. The PACIS ontology has been influenced by
the search for categorial complexity in biological systematics, although the
goal of PACIS is that of a “formal” ontology rather than that of a “material”
science like biology.
5. The extant ontology of PACIS develops this ontological architecture, in a
particular system of categories, with an eye to both Anaximander and
Whitehead. The PACIS scheme, and its Anaximandrian form, are expounded
in D. W. Smith 1997. There are important differences between the PACIS
system and the Whitehead system. I note one problematic feature of Whitehead’s treatment of forms: insofar as forms are prehended, they are entities;
but insofar as forms are “pure potentials” for determinateness, they seem to
be modes or ways of becoming. The PACIS system clearly distinguishes these
phenomena.
6. See Dretske 1981.
7. The case for nonpropositional intentional acts is detailed in Smith and
McIntyre 1982 and D. W. Smith 1989. The former book integrates a
Husserlian model of intentionality with Jaakko Hintikka’s model of propositional attitudes: compare Hintikka 1969. For Hintikka, intentionality is
analyzed as propositionality, so that an attitude of belief is in effect directed
toward a range of possible states of affairs or “worlds” (compatible with the
content of belief). Such doxastically possible states of affairs resemble the
“potentialities” that Whitehead speaks of. Even if seeing a lizard is not a
propositional act, though, it may be analyzed as embracing a “horizon” of
possible states of affairs in which a lizard is potentially before the perceiver.
8. See Smith and McIntyre 1982 for a detailed reconstruction of Husserl’s
notion of horizon.
9. This reflexive structure of consciousness is studied in D. W. Smith 1989:
chap. 2.
10. See Miller 1984 for a precise reconstruction of Husserl’s analysis here. On
the proposal I am noting, with an eye to Whitehead, what we experience as
a reflexive awareness within the act of perception is analyzed into smaller
“awareness” in the form of retentions and protentions. The problem for this
240 Mind World
proposal is that we really are not aware of these distinct phases of retention and protention, and so the reflexive character that we experience in
conscious perception is analyzed into “awareness” that we do not actually
experience. These issues are discussed in Chapter 3.
11. The alternative model of intentionality is developed in Smith and McIntyre
1982, integrating a Husserlian model of intention via sense and a Hintikkian
model of propositional attitudes as unfolding an array of possible states of
affairs or “worlds.” Compare Hintikka 1969. My concern here is how to understand what Whitehead means by “potentials,” if not something definable
in more recent modal ontology. In the PACIS ontology, sketched in D. W.
Smith 1997, intentional contents or meanings are treated as entities that are
dependent on acts of consciousness and do the work of “intending” entities
within consciousness.
References
Bergson, H. 1991. Matter and Memory. Translated by Nancy Margaret Paul and W.
Scott Palmer from the French 5th edition of 1908. New York: Zone Books.
French original, 1896.
Dretske, F. 1981. Knowledge and the Flow of Information. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
1995. Naturalizing the Mind. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Hintikka, J. 1969. Models for Modalities. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Mayr, E., and P. D. Ashlock. 1991. Principles of Systematic Zoology. 2nd ed. New York:
McGraw-Hill.
McTaggart, J. M. E. 1927. The Nature of Existence. Vol. 2. Edited by C. D. Broad.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Miller, I. 1984. Husserl, Perception and Temporal Awareness. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
Port, R. F., and T. van Gelder, eds. 1995. Mind and Motion: Explorations in the
Dynamics of Cognition. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Russell, B. 1971. “The Philosophy of Logical Atomism.” 1918. In Russell, Logic
and Knowledge: Essays, 1901–1950, edited by Robert C. Marsh. New York:
Capricorn Books, G. P. Putnam’s Sons.
Smith, B., and D. W. Smith. 1995. The Cambridge Companion to Husserl. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press.
Smith, D. W. 1989. The Circle of Acquaintance. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic
Publishers.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In B. Smith and D. W. Smith, eds., The Cambridge Companion to Husserl, pp. 323–93. Cambridge: Cambridge University
Press.
1997. “Being and Basis.” Unpublished manuscript, extending my presentation
under the same title at the Second European Congress for Analytic Philosophy, Leeds, England, 5–7 August 1996.
Consciousness and Actuality 241
Smith, D. W., and R. McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality. Dordrecht: D.
Reidel.
Whitehead, A. N. 1978. Process and Reality. Edited by David Ray Griffin and Donald
W. Sherburne. New York: Free Press, Macmillan. First edition, 1929.
Wittgenstein, L. 1994. Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus. Translated by D. F. Pears and
B. F. McGuinness. London: Routledge. German original, 1921.
8
Basic Categories
Abstract. This essay pursues basic ontological categories. The strategy is to
develop a sense of systematic ontology by crafting a series of increasingly
sophisticated category schemes. We move from an austere scheme of physical
particles and sets to the traditional categories of substance and attribute,
to a modern view of modality and intentionality, to the distinction between
formal and material categories, and various candidates thereof, to a notion
of categorial “depth.” Along the way we keep an eye out for where mind
or consciousness falls in each category scheme. This study indicates that a
piecemeal ontology will not deal adequately with basic ontological structures, including the place of consciousness in the world. The methodological lesson to be learned is that the systematic organization of categories is
crucial to the practice of ontology.
Segue. In previous essays we explored structures of consciousness and
different types of ontology that might help to account for features of
Parts of this chapter follow a series of four lectures I gave at the 1997 Bolzano International
Schools in Cognitive Analysis at the conference “Categories: Ontological Perspectives in
Knowledge Representation,” Bolzano, Italy, 15–19 September 1997. The chapter also re-
flects a series of two lectures I gave as “Where Mind Meets World” in January 2001 at the
University of Miami. This chapter benefited from the discussion on those occasions. In
the background lie eighteen years of invaluable discussion with colleagues in the Ontek
research program in computational phenomenological ontology: my thanks to Charles W.
Dement, Peter Woodruff, Peter Simons, and Steve DeWitt, for wide-ranging discussions of
grand metaphysical issues.
See D. W. Smith 1997 on the ontology of “being and basis,” featuring basic “modes
of being.” See Simons 1994–95 with a partial list of the categories, which I call “modes
of being.” Both of these presentations sketch aspects of the system of ontology developed
within the research program at Ontek Corporation in the early 1990s. Much of the groundwork for that system was developed in my weekly discussions with Charles W. Dement of
Ontek. The conception of ontological systematics evolved within the research at Ontek in
the 1990s.
242
Basic Categories 243
consciousness including its intentionality and its dependence on both neural activity and cultural background. In this essay we turn exclusively to the
problem of developing a detailed category scheme that allows us to deal
with a variety of structures of the world, including the fundamental ontological differences among causal relations in nature, intentional relations
in consciousness, social relations in culture – and ultimately with the organization of very basic categories or modes-of-being, including dependence,
intentionality, unity, and process.
In this chapter we explore a series of category schemes drawn, with creative interpretation, from prominent systems of ontology discernible in
Quine, Aristotle, Descartes, Husserl, and Whitehead. The point is to assess the categories and architectures in these schemes by studying the
systems in proximity to one another. Along the way, we note where mind
or consciousness would fit into each scheme, keeping an eye on where
phenomenology intersects with categorial ontology.
This series of category schemes looks toward the ideal of a comprehensive, up-to-date system of categories sensitive to the most basic structures
we find in the world around us, including our own conscious experience.
From this study we hope to learn something about ontological “systematics,” about the organization of categories in a basic ontology.
The notion of ontological categories once seemed to me the least illuminating part of philosophy: a mere list of broad kinds of things. However, by comparing different category schemes, with an eye to concrete
things in everyday life, we may come to realize that the organization we
posit among basic categories sharply defines the form of the world as we
know it. That strangely abstract level of reflection, I think, we need in
philosophy today, not least in order to reassess naturalism and our theory of mind. The explorations here are meant to proceed in this spirit of
developing a greater sense of system in ontology.
Systematic Ontology and Category Schemes
In biology systematics is defined as “the science of the diversity of organisms.”1 Systematics classifies organisms into species and larger (and
smaller) taxa, ranks taxa in categories, traces the evolutionary descent
of species, and decides what determines the identity of a species, a taxon,
a category, and so on. According to current evolutionary biology, each
species has a treelike path of descent from other species; this path of
phylogenetic descent is called its “clade.” There have been vigorous debates about whether a species is defined properly in terms of phenotype
244 Mind World
(observable characteristics), genotype (genetic constitution), molecular
constitution, or clade and about what determines various biological
groups and their organization. In biological systematics the term “category” is used not simply for important groups or taxa, but for “rank in a
hierarchy of levels to which taxa are assigned, such as subspecies, species,
and genus.”2 Thus, there is far more to biological systematics than a listing of species: the definition and organization of groups is crucial, even
in determining what makes a group of organisms a species.
Now, philosophy needs to develop its own ontological systematics, which
we may define as the theory of the diversity of basic kinds of entities in
the world – not just living things but anything at all. Such a “science of
diversity” is what this essay is exploring.
A basic ontology, let us say, is a theory about the most basic structures
of the world, of what there is, beginning with the most basic divisions
among things in the world. Within traditional philosophy, basic ontology begins with basic categories of entities, and in the idea of a scheme of
categories we find philosophy’s first approach to an ontological systematics.
The explicit conception of ontological categories began with Aristotle,
who posited the categories of“substance” and various types of“attribute.”
Many philosophers implicitly assume categorial distinctions, as between
universal and particular, or between mind and body, or between fact and
value. Ontology becomes systematic, however, when it organizes such distinctions, seeking a unified system of divisions that define very basic kinds
or categories of entities. A system or scheme of categories organizes such
fundamental divisions in the world, somewhat as biological systematics
organizes fundamental divisions in the biosphere.
Roughly, ontological categories are abstract kinds defining entities with
fundamental roles in the structure of the world. Logically, they are designated by general terms or common nouns such as “individual,” “attribute,” “relation,” “event,” and “causation.” It is the task of basic ontology to specify categories and their roles in defining the structure of the
world. We use terms like “entity” and “thing” in the widest possible sense
to cover anything in the world, including whatever falls under basic categories – things as diverse as relations and events, and not merely palpable
objects like stones or sticks or birds or people.
A well-formulated basic ontology will include a scheme of categories of
things in the world plus a system of principles about entities in the categories (and how they relate to each other, if they do). If a theory is
articulated as a formal axiom system, it is launched by a list of terms and
a list of axioms, from which logic permits the deduction of theorems.
Basic Categories 245
In principle, a basic ontology may be expressed in the style of a formal
theory, with a list of category words and a list of axiomatic principles.
In practice, however, ontologies (their categories and their principles)
are usually expressed informally, not least because we must capture intuitions whose axiomatization is itself in question, but also because we
do not understand categories initially – naturally and intuitively – in a
formal axiom system. An axiom system is something we aim for when
we seek a certain type of precision. In any case, whatever the style of
expression, a category scheme is concerned to map out the most basic
divisions among things in the world, divisions taken for granted in other
ranges of theory. Principles about things falling in these divisions then
ensue.
Because categories reflect the most basic divisions among entities, they
are the most basic part of the structure of the world, and so specifying
a system of categories is the most basic part of an ontology. However,
what counts as a category will itself vary with the system of categories.
For how we divide the world into basic categories of things-in-general
will depend on how we think the world is structured, even at the basic
level of categories. Is the world entirely composed of particles in physical
space-time? Is it composed rather of ideas in many minds or perhaps
in one great mind? Or is it composed, as some seem to imply recently,
of evolving modes of discourse or cultural practice, from the linguistic
to the political? Or is it composed entirely of temporal process itself,
rather than the discrete things we encounter in everyday business, either
physical objects or ideas or political institutions like traffic laws? What
types of distinctions among such things define categories?
When empirically minded philosophers and scientists attack “metaphysics,” it is usually on the assumption that metaphysics is an a priori
discipline putting forth speculations that precede and outrun all empirical observations, even in principle, or at least all current scientific results.
Is basic categorial ontology a priori and speculative in that way? I think
not. We begin with a large base of empirical knowledge, ranging from
our everyday, commonsense knowledge of things around us to our best
current science. The task then is to ferret out what seem to be the most
basic categories assumed, often implicitly, in that knowledge base. And
then the task is to organize these categories in a systematic way, thus
characterizing the basic structures of the world to the best of our current knowledge. Categorial ontology, carried out in this way, is not blind
speculation from the armchair; it is a form of theory in the best sense,
abstract theory about what there is in the world, but it is an abstraction
246 Mind World
from empirically gained knowledge, spread out from common sense into
science.
Basic ontology is broadly empirical in this way, or a posteriori, because
we all have acquired a mass of knowledge from our culture and our own
experience long before we can begin to write out an ontology. Still, basic
ontology, beginning with categories, is not simply generated by making
observations or running experiments. Rather, with a range of experience
and experiments under our belts, we begin to fit an organization – a
structure of patterns – onto our knowledge of what there is in the world
around us. And this task is the proper business of ontology, as distinct
from either empirical science or journalism or humanistic interpretation
of cultural phenomena. Somewhat as physicists cast about for appropriate
mathematics to organize their results into a proper theory, so ontologists
cast about – at a high level of abstraction – for different categories and
organizations of categories. In this way ontology is broadly a priori. But
then ontology is to one extent a priori and to another extent a posteriori. As W. V. Quine has characterized knowledge formation, there is no
sharp distinction between those elements of knowledge that we might
call a priori and a posteriori. The more a priori principles concern abstract forms, including mathematical and logical forms, but also basic
ontological structures and categories. And the more a posteriori principles concern more concrete forms of entities we encounter, to begin with
in sense perception.3 The pedagogical problem for the philosopher in
modern culture is that ontology is often a more abstract kind of theory
than we are used to, even in mathematical physics. (Mathematical language is not the only measure of abstract thinking; witness the poetic talk
of “being” in the contemplative disciplines.)
Methodology aside, the best way to understand what is basic in ontology, and what constitutes an ontological category, is to study a variety of
category schemes.
Particles and Sets (Quine)
We begin with a lean and modern category scheme, abstracted from the
philosophy of Willard Van Orman Quine (1908–2000). This scheme will
serve as a foil to the more complex schemes we address along our way.
W. V. Quine has been the most influential of recent thinkers carrying
forth the philosophical legacy of modern logic (since Frege, Whitehead
and Russell, Godel, Tarski, et al.). Quine has put forth an extremely eco- ¨
nomical ontology reflecting a basic naturalism informed by the methods
Basic Categories 247
of logic in service to mathematics, itself in service to physical theory. To
parody:
The universe is composed of physical particles.
Their behavior is described by mathematics.
Mathematics is reducible to set theory plus logic.
Logic consists in transformations on sentences, which are patterns of
sound, ink, or information bits in brains or computers, all composed
of physical particles.
So all there is in the world are particles and sets.
Quine’s actual views are more nuanced.4 But for our purposes here, let
us address the austere variant of Quinean ontology, which is nearly a
commonplace world view for many philosophers today who seek hardnosed science governed by exact mathematics in accord with precise firstorder logic.
On the received view, all the sciences rest on physics, as our overall
physical theory builds from particles in fields to atomic and molecular
structures, to chemical interactions, to biological activities and evolution, to psychological and social phenomena in biological organisms and
species, and on up the scale to cosmological phenomena.5 In short, today’s naturalism holds that the universe in its entirety is composed of
physical particles in physical fields: in a gloss, “particles in the void” – as
the atomists of ancient Greece guessed. What distinguishes today’s physical ontology from the ancient (besides a lot of experimental detail) is
mathematics: the laws of gravitation, electromagnetism, quantum waveparticle superposition and collapse, and so on are formulated in terms of
mathematical structures (starting with the calculus). And on the standard
view, all mathematics reduces to set theory. And all mathematical proof
follows logic, which is systematized today in first-order logic. Accordingly,
the scientific ontologist structures this view of the world with the Quinean
category scheme of particles and sets.
The category scheme in this ontology is remarkably simple:
A Quinean Category Scheme
Categories
1. Particle
2. Set
The great virtue of this scheme is its economy. Ockham’s razor has
been deftly applied to our contemporary scientific world view. William
of Ockham, in the thirteenth century, pared the reigning Aristotelian
248 Mind World
ontology down to the lone category of “substance,” or concrete particulars. Quine, in the twentieth century, added one category of abstract
particulars – namely, sets – to accommodate modern mathematics.
According to this Quinean ontology, there are no universals (kinds,
qualities, relations) beyond sets and ordered tuples (universals “in extension”). And there are no modalities such as necessity (which apply
to entities such as propositions or states of affairs, whose identity conditions are for Quine too unclear to be acceptable). And there are no
mental events or ideas unless they reduce to the behavior of particles
in neurons or perhaps computers. Nor is there any mental representation or intentionality beyond physical processes in a brain or computer.
If consciousness is to be accommodated in this ontology, it will have to
be defined somehow in terms of patterns (defined in terms of sets) of
physical processes of particles in neurons in brains (or some other extraterrestrial physical processes).
Are there categories, then, in the world? If categories are high-level types
(kinds“in intension”), then the Quinean ontology posits no such entities.
Instead, there are two “categorial” supersets: the set of all particles (for
all space-time) and the set of all sets (enter set theory to resolve potential
paradoxes).
The preceding scheme can be seen as a twentieth-century mathematical-scientific heir to Plato’s original distinction between the concrete
and the ideal. As we work through more complex category schemes,
we may watch how further categorial distinctions bring in more and
more ontological structure. The challenge for this austere scheme is to
make the case that we can really do without these further ontological
distinctions. I think we cannot, contrary to our neo-Quinean naturalistic
Zeitgeist.
Substance and Attribute (Aristotle)
Categorial distinctions were already at work in Plato, not least in discussions of “the one and the many,” as in the Sophist. Yet the theory of
ontological categories began officially with Aristotle in the Categories (ca.
350 b.c.). The Greek term kategoriai originally meant what one can say
against someone in court. Aristotle offered a list of ten “types of predicate,” which he sometimes called simply “the predicates,” or kategoriai,
and which later philosophers came to call the “categories.”Thus, Aristotle
redefined the term for his purposes to mean the kinds of things one can
say about something (kinds of predication) and thus the basic kinds of
Basic Categories 249
CATEGORIES Examples
1. substance
a. primary substance [individual] this man [Socrates], this horse
b. secondary substance [species] man [kind], horse [kind]
2. quantity
a. discrete four cubits
b. continuous [much (water)]
3. quality
a. state/condition grammatical (in the soul)
b. capacity [rational]
c. affective quality white
d. shape [square]
4. relative [relation?] double, half, larger [than]
5. where [place] in the Lyceum, in the marketplace
6. when [time] yesterday, last year
7. position [arrangement] lying, sitting
8. having has shoes on, has armor on
9. doing [action] cutting, burning
10. being affected [acted upon, passion] being cut, being burned
figure 8.1. Aristotle’s category scheme.
things that can be said to be. The categories he proposed reflect everyday grammar (in ancient Greek) and define answers to familiar forms
of question. Each category answers the general question, What is it?
and a more specific question, Which is it? What kind? How many? How
qualified? Where? When? Aristotle’s categories are sometimes misread as
grammatical categories, or“predicate”types. However, they are ontological
categories: Aristotle is focused not on forms of language but on forms of
“being.”6
Aristotle listed ten categories, and several subcategories, with examples
of each. His category scheme may be summarized as shown in Figure 8.1
(the organization and examples are his).“Of things not in combination,”
Aristotle said, there are these ten categories. We address “things in combination” later, including states of affairs. Aristotle said nothing explicit
about them in the Categories, but his phrase implies a place for them in a
complete ontology.
For Aristotle, these ten categories are the most general types of things in
the world. Every entity falls under one and only one of the categories. Yet
primary substances occupy a distinguished niche. For species, quantities,
qualities, and the like are each “predicated” of primary substances: that
is, a primary substance is such and such, for each remaining type of thing.
Thus, Socrates is a human, is one in number, is rational, is smaller, is in
250 Mind World
the marketplace, is at noonday, is standing, is sandaled, is criticizing, is
criticized. There are accordingly ten types of predication, or being suchand-such, for species, quantities, qualities, etc.
The Aristotelian scheme differs from the Quinean by adding to “primary substances” (ultimately, for the Quinean, particles) some ten types
of “predicate” or “attribute” (categories 1b and 2–10), all of which the
Quinean must explicate in terms of sets or else eliminate. In retrospect,
an Aristotelian approach distinguishes different categories expressed by
various forms of predicate in everyday language, whereas a Quinean approach follows today’s predicate logic in assimilating all predicates to one
form (“Rxy”) with which is correlated a set or ordered tuple of entities.
The most vexing term in Aristotle’s discourse is“substance.”The Greek
word is ousia, which strictly means that which is, a being or entity. The traditional translation as “substance” is completely misleading in English,
but Aristotle’s examples make it plain that “primary beings” are simply
particular, concrete entities – what we may call concrete individuals. In
Aristotle’s scheme, concrete individuals form the first and most basic
category (or subcategory), that of “primary beings/substances,” because
they are the kind of entity that most properly has being, or is most fundamental in being. Species are the second most fundamental kind of
entity, and so form the (sub)category of “secondary beings/substances.”
An individual’s species is essential to it and constitutes its“real definition”;
individuals and species are together the most proper“beings” and so form
the category of“being/substance.” Aristotle’s paradigm here is that of living organisms. In light of evolutionary biology today, it was prescient of
Aristotle, the founder of the science of biology, to give such pride of place
to species – notwithstanding today’s rejection of his essentialist theory of
the real definition of species.7
If Aristotle’s ten basic kinds of entity are propercategories, then not only
are these ten kinds distinct, but these ten kinds of entity have unique ontological roles and stand in unique ontological relations to one another.
Accordingly, Aristotle says that a quality is “in” a primary substance (this
whiteness is in this piece of paper), whereas a species is not“in” a primary
substance but rather is “said of” it (Man is said of Socrates). In more congenial idiom, we may say that a quality inheres in an individual while an
individual belongs to a species. Then inherence and belonging are distinct
types of “predication,” which are modes of connection between entities
in different categories. To complete the ontology, we would specify the
various types of connection between entities in the various categories,
especially the types of predication that tie concrete individuals to their
Basic Categories 251
species, quantities, qualities, relatives, places, times, and so on. Ontological dependence is an important feature of the connection between certain
entities of different categories (though Aristotle did not use a term for
dependence). Specifically, Aristotle holds, a quality cannot exist apart
from a substance in which it inheres, while the substance could exist
apart from that quality (as when the substance changes). Thus, a quality
is a particular entity, not something shared like a species (or, for that matter, a Platonic form). Husserl would later call such entities “moments,”
or “dependent parts”; today these particularized properties are called
“tropes.” By contrast, a species is shared by its members and can exist
apart from any one of its members, though an individual cannot exist
without its species. It is tempting to think that Aristotle believed that entities of the second through tenth categories could not exist apart from
primary substances (and the species to which they belong).
Some of Aristotle’s categories look odd or half-baked today (we may
lose something in the translation). Why “relative” instead of relation?
(Philosophers had trouble with relations until the twentieth century,
partly because Aristotelian logic recognized only monadic predicates,
whereas modern logic recognizes n-place predicates modeled on mathematical functions with n arguments.) Why add “position” – isn’t this a
complex relation of elements? What is “having” in the relevant sense,
other than a type of relation? Why “passion” in addition to “action” –
isn’t passion just the inverse of action? Is “action” intentional action or
merely causal action? And where is mind in all this? And is intentionality
all packed into “action” or is it a special form of relation, or “relative”?
Rather than dig further into these details, we shall outline next a more
modern version of broadly Aristotelian categories, based on the distinction between substance and attribute, or individuals and their properties,
but recognizing further features like dependence and intentionality.
Aristotle ramified his ontology in the Metaphysics, with well-known
doctrines: the “hylomorphic” principle that a concrete being is matter
shaped by form; the account of change wherein a being’s qualities (but
not species) vary over time; and the theory of cause, divided into four
types, namely, formal, material, efficient, and final causes. Also, in De
Anima (Of Spirit, anima in Latin, psyche in Greek) Aristotle posited the
mind (psyche) as part of the form of the body, and there he observed what
Husserl (after Brentano) theorized as the intentionality of perception
and knowledge. (In perception, for Aristotle, the mind takes in the form
but not the matter of the object known.) To complete an Aristotelian
ontology, then, we would have to explicate these structures of the world
252 Mind World
and show exactly how they all play in the category scheme. Specifically,
we would have to decide where mind figures in the scheme. Presumably,
a mental act is a quality (a condition) in a primary substance such as
Socrates, and this quality is shared by the act’s object.
Starting from natural language, as Aristotle did implicitly (sometimes
explicitly), is not a bad way to begin sifting through our knowledge base
in search of what we take to be the most basic kinds of entity in the world.
For our language, be it Greek or English or Chinese, is the residue of
thousands of years of dealing with the world in very practical terms. But
let us remember that we are seeking basic categories of beings in the
world around us, not logical or grammatical categories of expressions
in our language. That said, we articulate and represent ontological categories, either explicitly or implicitly, only within a system of thought and,
realistically, within a language that expresses a theory about entities in
the world.
Plus Intentionality and Modality (Aristotle Modernized)
Suppose we wanted to preserve as much of Aristotle’s ontology as possible today, while recognizing more modern conceptions of relation, set,
part-whole, causation, dependence, modality, and intentionality (all of
which Aristotle addressed in some form in works after the Categories). I
have in mind approaching Aristotle’s metaphysics in a spirit like that in a
rich study by Montgomery Furth,8 and then folding in intentionality and
modality. The categories we would recognize include forms of complexity
beyond “things not in combination.”
In this spirit, we might modernize Aristotle’s category scheme along
the lines shown in Figure 8.2 (deleting some of Aristotle’s categories and
adding other categories).
In this category scheme, we begin with a variation on the distinction between substance and attribute. “Primary beings,” or “substances,” are replaced by individuals, including concrete particulars, but perhaps also abstract particulars such as numbers and sets. Individuals are the “substrate”
of all “attributes,” or “properties” (to choose a slightly more modern
term). Properties of individuals are divided (in an Aristotelian spirit)
into some four distinct types: kinds or species (sortal properties including natural kinds such as biological species and chemical substances,
but also including man-made kinds or artifacts), qualities (nonsortal,
monadic properties), and relations (polyadic properties, with plural subjects). Quantities are a different type, aligned with numbers but arguably
Basic Categories 253
CATEGORIES
1. individual
2. species
3. quantity
4. quality
5. relation
6. location
7. intentionality
8. combination
9. dependence
10. modality
— where:
6. location covers extension in space-time
7. intentionality includes
perception
thought
imagination
desire
volition
8. combination includes
set
whole
state of affairs
9. dependence includes
causation
(ontological) foundation
10. modality includes
possibility
necessity
actuality
— and where:
Intentionality is a mental act’s being directed toward an appropriate entity.
A state of affairs is a combination formed by an individual’s belonging to a
species or bearing a quality or standing in a relation to one or more
individuals (or thinking about something or . . .).
A state of affairs is possible or necessary or actual.
figure 8.2. A Modernized Aristotelian category scheme.
grouped under properties of individuals en masse, or properties of sets
(which are abstract individuals). (Various kinds of mathematical entities
would need to be appraised, deciding inter alia whether all mathematical
entities can be built up from sets; we do not delve into these issues here.)
Entities in the remaining categories – such as locations, intentionalities, combinations – might be thought of as properties with special
254 Mind World
importance. But here they are instead grouped as something other than
properties of individuals. Let us call them “modes,” borrowing a late medieval term for properties. Here we are beginning to group these “special” properties in an ontological niche of their own, and we make more
of this categorial maneuver in other category schemes considered later.
Thus, locations place individuals (and their properties) in space-time.
Intentionalities direct mental acts (a kind of individual) toward various
entities. Combinations unite entities in heaps, sets, wholes, and the like.
Dependencies tie entities together in their existence, either as one event
causes another or as a quality depends on a particular in which it inheres.
Modalities modify the existence status of entities, with the so-called alethic
(truth-related) modalities of actuality, possibility, and necessity. Finally, intentionality is ontologically unique (it is neither a quality nor a relation
nor anything else), warranting its own category. Thus, individuals form a
substrate for properties of different types, and different types of modes
modify entities formed from individuals and various types of properties.
Our purpose in sketching (so tersely) this neo-Aristotelian scheme is
to bring out some of the complexity that unfolds in an updated broadly
Aristotelian ontology. Thus, we distinguish three types of categories in this
scheme, reorganizing the scheme as shown in Figure 8.3.
William of Ockham famously rewrote Aristotle’s category scheme
(ca. 1300) by reducing the original ten categories to one, if you will,
the category Individual, “nominalizing” or conceptualizing the rest. The
Quinean follows suit but finds need for sets. By contrast, our neoAristotelian refines Aristotle by eliminating some categories, adding
others, and then grouping importantly different categories – a far cry
from Ockham’s list-of-one. This neo-Aristotelian holds that we are not
A. Substrate
1. individual
B. Property
1. species
2. quantity
3. quality
4. relation
C. Mode
1. location
2. intentionality
3. combination
4. dependence
5. modality
figure 8.3. An ordered neo-Aristotelian category scheme.
Basic Categories 255
multiplying entities beyond necessity. We are instead articulating ontological distinctions that we need in order to account for the complexity we find in the world. Ockham’s razor is wielded with different
results.
In this latter scheme we begin to recognize categories of a higher order.
Aristotle assumed a flat list of categories, with subcategories, although
Primary Substance has a privileged status. Here we group the categories
with a sense of ontological priority (still in the spirit of Aristotle). And
we go well beyond a Quinean ontology by positing a variety of nonextensional categories including both properties and “modes” of various
types.
We note that mind and consciousness appear in this scheme with intentionality, which does not reduce to physical composition or causal
dependence or functional relations or anything else.
Substance-Attribute Applied to Mind-Body (Descartes)
A familiar touchstone in metaphysics is the dualism developed in Rene´
Descartes’s Meditations on First Philosophy (1641). Descartes (1596–1650)
assumed a neo-Aristotelian distinction between substance and attribute
(or “mode” in Descartes’s preferred idiom,9 a different use of the term
than mine just presented). Then Descartes argued for the “real distinction” between mind and body. But the first distinction cuts across the
second. This dual dualism leads into an instructive system of ontological
categories. For here we find two types of category: one including Substance and Attribute, the other including Mental and Corporeal or (as
we say today) Physical. Moreover, the first applies to the second, so the
two types cross to form a “Cartesian product” of the two types (to play
on a term from mathematics). Thus, we may find in Descartes’s ontology
a two-dimensional category scheme (entering in the boxes in Figure 8.4
the kinds of entity that fall under the crossed categories). As noted,
Aristotle’s category scheme was a flat sequence of ten categories, with
subcategories. And the structured neo-Aristotelian scheme followed the
same architecture, albeit with specially grouped subcategories. But with
CATEGORIES
A. mental B. physical
1. substance minds bodies
2. attribute thought extension
figure 8.4. Descartes’s category scheme.
256 Mind World
Descartes’s scheme, as organized here, we find a new kind of architecture
in category schemes, where two types of category cut across each other.
(Here let us assume the Aristotelian and neo-Aristotelian categories are
simplified to Substance and Attribute, as our concern is how these categories cut across Mental and Physical.)
Of course, mind is at the root of the architectural innovation. Where
Aristotle at best treated mind as a quality in certain bodies (consonant
with today’s physicalism), Descartes gave the mental its own category as
distinct from the physical. However, the point of the reconstruction here
is not that the mental and physical form distinct categories. Rather, the
point is that there are two types of category cutting across each other. If
Cartesian substance-dualism is untenable, attribute dualism is nonetheless a step in the direction of diversity among properties, and the moral
of the story is categorial complexity.
Most philosophers today reject Cartesian dualism for substances and
worry about it for attributes (compare Chalmers 1996). But if I am right,
there is something quite different at stake in Descartes’s ontology. In retrospect, we may see in the Cartesian category scheme the abstraction
of ontological form from ontological content. Thus we may see the
Substance-Attribute distinction as “formal” and the Mental-Physical distinction as “material.” In this view, the Substance-Attribute distinction
applies to any substantive or material (= physical) domain of entities,
and it happens that Descartes posits two such substantive domains harboring minds and bodies respectively.10 However, we are getting ahead
of our story, applying lessons learned from more recent philosophical
movements. The gist of this view is that ontology mirrors logic in discerning formal ontological categories, and that is the tack followed explicitly
by the early Husserl (nodding to Leibniz and Bolzano).
Fact and Essence and Sense (Husserl)
In Edmund Husserl’s Logical Investigations (1900–1) and Ideas I (1913)
we find, along with the new discipline of phenomenology, a sprawling
ontology. This ontology can be drawn together, I propose, as a basic ontology that accommodates many of the lessons of the previous category
schemes. In fact, Husserl (1859–1938) can be read as integrating several prominent lines of thought from Plato and Aristotle onward: the
ontology of universals, the logic of sense and reference (modifying Frege
et al.), the epistemology of sensory-conceptual knowledge formation
(modifying Hume, Leibniz, Kant, et al.), and the theory of intentionality
Basic Categories 257
(going beyond Brentano), which is foundational for phenomenology. In
Husserl’s system, the ontology plays a central role but is interdependent
with the logic, phenomenology, and epistemology. I laid out a Husserlian
category scheme in “Mind and Body” (1995) and explored parts of it
more closely in subsequent essays including “Mathematical Form in the
World” (2002b). Here I should like to construct (or construe) the architecture of the scheme, its implicit ontological systematics. We have to do
the work of systematizing Husserl’s diverse categories, because Husserl
did not explicitly organize his results.
We begin with Husserl’s distinction among “fact,” “essence,” and
“sense” (laid out in opening Ideas I). We shall ramify Husserl’s category
scheme in later sections.
Roughly, the type Fact includes concrete individuals and, presumably,
events: these entities take the place of Aristotelian “substances.” The type
Essence (Wesen, from was-sein, “what” a thing “is”) covers Aristotelian “attributes.” And the type Sense (Sinn) is drawn from logical theory but used
in Husserl’s own theory of intentionality: sense includes ideal intentional
contents (many of which are expressible in language as “meanings”).
We may draw the main outlines of Husserl’s system of ontological categories, then, as shown in Figure 8.5 (forewarning that Husserl used the
term “category” in a more limited way).
In this ontology, Socrates is or was a concrete or “real” (reale) entity in
space-time – a “fact” (Tatsache), in Husserl’s idiom, or, as we might say, a
“factual” entity. Socrates belonged to the species humanity. For Husserl
(like Plato), this species is an “ideal” (ideale) entity not in space-time –
an “essence” (Wesen, from was-sein, what is) or, in the older idiom, a “universal.” But for Husserl (somewhat like Aristotle), Socrates is a human
if and only if a concrete instance of humanity (an instance of the ideal
species) is “in” Socrates: according to Husserl’s ontology of parts, this instance is a dependent part, or“moment” (Moment), of Socrates. Meanings
(sense, Sinn) are also “ideal” entities not in space-time, but they are categorially distinct from essences. Where essences are properties (or kinds
or relations) of concrete individuals (or events), meanings are contents
CATEGORIES Examples
1. fact concrete entities: in time or space-time
2. essence ideal species: universals, eidos, forms
3. sense ideal meanings: intentional contents, propositions
figure 8.5. The basic Husserlian category scheme.
258 Mind World
of intentional acts of consciousness. Thus, the role of properties is to
qualify individuals, whereas the role of meanings is not to qualify or “determine” (bestimmen) individuals but rather to direct mental acts toward
their objects, to “present” or “represent” or “intend” objects “as” experienced. Specifically (to compare with semantics), the proposition (Satz)
“Socrates is a human” is a propositional sense (Sinn) that represents or
“intends” (meinen, vermeinen, intendieren) the state of affairs (Sachverhalt)
that Socrates is a human. This proposition is the content (Inhalt) of my
act (Akt) of thinking or judging that Socrates is a human, and it is thus expressed by the sentence “Socrates is a human” (an expression, Ausdruck,
or sign, Zeiche). The proposition in my thinking “intends” the state of
affairs, which I thereby think “of” or “about.”
Many analytic philosophers today (following Russell) take “propositions” to be made up of properties and sometimes individuals, so that a
proposition is in effect a possible or putative (“proposed”) state of affairs.
This terminology is unfortunate, for it ignores the distinction between
the content and the object of an act of thinking. As often observed, the
same object can be represented by different concepts: we can think of
Socrates as (under the concept) “the teacher of Plato” or as“the husband
of Xanthippe.” By the same token, the same state of affairs in the world
can be represented or intended by different propositions in various acts
of thinking: say, where I think “Socrates argued in the marketplace” and
you think “the husband of Xanthippe argued in the markeplace.” (Allow
that my concept “Socrates” is a type of concept tied to my background
conception of Socrates, formed from my studies and not reducible to
a descriptive concept “the so and so.”) We should thus distinguish ontologically the proposition that serves as content and the state of affairs
that serves as object of a propositional act or attitude. In the preceding
Husserlian scheme, propositions and their constituent concepts fall under the category Sense, whereas states of affairs are formed from properties falling under the category Essence and individuals under the category
Fact. (Russell used the English term “fact” where Wittgenstein used the
term Tatsache, for an actual state of affairs [bestehende Sachverhalt], with a
certain form, whereas Husserl used Tatsache for an actual concrete object
of any type and reserved Sachverhalt for a state of affairs.11 More on
states of affairs later.)
As in the Logical Investigations, Husserl took forms of language to express forms of sense carried as intentional content by experiences of
judgment and perception underlying speech acts of assertion. Husserl offered a complex philosophy of logic, well aware of the new logic of Frege
Basic Categories 259
et alii and the emerging set theory of Cantor et alii. But Husserl dug into
the cognate ontology more deeply than other philosophers of logic. In
any event, our concern here is with ontology rather than philosophy of
logic.
For our purposes, let us assume certain priorities in the preceding
category scheme. The most basic things in the world are concrete or
“factual” entities in space-time. Essences are essences of concrete entities. And senses are senses of various entities including concrete entities,
their essences, states of affairs (formed from concrete entities and
essences), and even senses. So essences presuppose or depend on “factual” entities, and senses presuppose or depend on facts and essences and
combinations thereof. (Husserl experimented with several orders of priority. One reading of his “transcendental idealism” says that everything
depends on intentional content or sense. These issues we leave aside
here, assuming a view of priority closer to Aristotle’s.)
Mind has a salient position in the basic Husserlian ontology, drawn
into the world with the category Sense. On Husserl’s general theory of
intentionality, an act of consciousness – a type of “fact” – is intentional,
a consciousness “of” something, just in case it has or is correlated with a
sense, where its sense prescribes or represents an appropriate object (if
such exists). Thus, an act of consciousness“intends” or is directed toward
an object x if and only if it has a sense that represents x. So consciousness
enters Husserl’s categorial scheme with the category of sense, or intentional contents. Of course, Husserl’s theory of intentionality via sense
is a hallmark of his work and one of his major innovations. Husserlian
phenomenology analyzes consciousness by analyzing the various structures of sense that we find in our acts of consciousness. Phenomenology
is, in Husserl, a logic or semantics of experience. In the preceding category scheme, if an act of consciousness (a concrete event) is directed via
a sense toward a state of affairs, then this relationship involves entities
from all three categories.
Formal and Material Essences (Husserl Ramified)
Husserl drew a crucial and innovative distinction between formal and
material ontology, specifically between formal and material essences. Although the distinction between form and content in language has been
familiar in logical and linguistic theory at least since Aristotle, a clear ontological distinction between the formal and material aspects of the world
took centuries to evolve. In Husserl the distinction is finally explicit. In
260 Mind World
Descartes there is a place for the distinction. In Leibniz and Kant there
are anticipations, but the distinction is limited to ideas or “phenomena.”
In Husserl, by contrast, the different levels of experience, content, language, and world are explicitly emphasized, and formal structure itself
appears in the world beyond language and thought.
Instructively, I think, the formal-material distinction is “shown but not
said”in Ludwig Wittgenstein’s Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus (1921). Thus,
in Wittgenstein’s scheme, form – he calls it “logical form” – applies to
propositions and also to the states of affairs they “picture.” Indeed, according to Wittgenstein, the proposition (Satz) “Rab” pictures and so
represents the state of affairs (Sachverhalt) [Rab] precisely because the
proposition has the same form as the state of affairs it represents. We shall
not linger here with the problems in Wittgenstein’s picture theory of representation (which he famously abandoned). But those familiar with the
Tractatus should recognize the all-important role of form in the structure
of the world. Now, Husserl mapped out this terrain in greater detail some
twenty years earlier.12
Whereas Wittgenstein was attentive to details of logical form – from the
new predicate logic of Frege et alii – in distinguishing objects, relations,
states of affairs, and picturing, Husserl recognized these forms but was far
more expansive on how broadly logical form plays across the spectrum
of logic, ontology, epistemology, and phenomenology. Here I want to
bring out the structure of the rich ontology distributed through Husserl’s
work.
Husserl sharply distinguished formal and material essences (see my reconstruction in Smith 1995). That distinction ramifies significantly the
basic Husserlian – and broadly Aristotelian – category scheme given earlier, which canonized particulars, universals, and meanings. In fact, the
formal-material distinction is the most important metatheoretical notion
I want to bring out in this essay.
Adding the distinction (and key entries under it), we extend the basic
Husserlian scheme as shown in Figure 8.6. Husserl reserved the term “category” for high-level formal essences, including those listed previously.
For our purposes, however, we group all the preceding types of entity
as proper categories (and subcategories) in a Husserlian ontology. For we
are organizing different types of categories, featuring Husserl’s division
of essences into formal and material essences. The ellipsis indicates that
the scheme includes some further entries to be considered later.
Material essences, for Husserl, are reached by “generalization,” moving from fact to species to genus to the highest level of genus under
Basic Categories 261
CATEGORIES
1. fact [concrete or real entity]
2. essence [ideal species, etc.]
2.1. formal essence [“category”]
1. individual
a. substrate [independent individual]
b. moment [dependent part]
c. event [dependent occurence]
2. species
3. property/quality
4. relation
5. state of affairs
...
2.2. material essence [“region”]
1. nature
a. inanimate
b. animate
2. culture [“spirit” (geist)]
3. consciousness
3. sense [ideal meaning (sinn)]
1. individual concept, percept,...
2. predicative concept, percept,...
3. proposition (satz)
4. connective: the meanings “and,” “or,” “not,” “if-then”
figure 8.6. The ramified Husserlian category scheme.
which concrete entities occur. At the highest level of generality are three
“regions”:
1. Nature, embracing physical objects and events and also psychical
states (realized in brains in animal bodies).
2. Culture (or “Spirit,” Geist, as in Zeitgeist, “spirit of the times”), embracing social groups, artifacts, institutions, and values.
3. Consciousness, embracing acts of consciousness and their intentionality (abstracted from their dependencies on the natural and
social).
Formal essences are reached not by generalization, moving up a speciesgenus hierarchy, but by “formalization,” moving from fact and material
essence to formal essence, or form. At the highest level of formalization
are the formal essences: Individual, Species, Property, Relation, State of
262 Mind World
Affairs, et alia. Now, formal essences apply to material essences cum facts,
much as logical “form” applies to “content” in the logical composition
of propositions. Thus, the formal essences of Individual, Species, and
so on pertain to entities under each of the material essences Nature,
Culture, Consciousness. Under Nature, for instance, there are concrete
individuals – bodies, organisms, events – that have species, qualities, and
relations, forming states of affairs in “nature.” Under Spirit or Culture
there are facts – persons and communities – that have kinds, qualities,
and relations, forming cultural states of affairs. And under Consciousness
there are facts – acts – having species, properties, and relations, forming
states of affairs of acts being intentionally directed toward other things,
including natural and cultural states of affairs.
We can now say more about states of affairs. For Husserl, a state of affairs is a “syntactic,” “categorial”formation: individuals are joined “syntactically” with properties or relations to form states of affairs. For instance,
the state of affairs that Socrates is a human is a formal combination of
the individual Socrates with the species humankind; and the state of affairs that Socrates taught Plato is a formal combination of the individuals
Socrates and Plato with the relation of teaching. Obviously, this ontology
of states of affairs reflects the formal structures posited in Fregean-era
predicate logic, and the doctrine is shared by Wittgenstein and other
Austrian philosophers of the early twentieth century. Although formal
semantics in the twentieth century made do with set-theoretic structures
(like models) instead of states of affairs, a state-of-affairs ontology is not
outdated: David Armstrong (1996) has recently argued anew for“a world
of states of affairs.”
Husserl joined this ontology with an epistemological notion of “categorial intuition.” According to Husserl, we grasp intuitively the formal
categorial structures of states of affairs, including predication (Socrates is
a human) and connection between atomic states of affairs (Socrates is a
human and he taught Plato). Our concerns, however, are limited to the
ontology.
Entities under Fact, Essence, and Sense are linked in distinctive ways.
Senses represent entities under these categories, whereas material essences
qualify or “determine” factual entities, and formal essences or “forms”
define or “inform” and so apply to entities under Fact, Essence, and
Sense. We begin to see a complex of links among things under the
three basic categories. There are patterns of recursion in the scheme,
as forms apply to facts and essences, forms have essences, senses have
essences including forms, and senses represent facts, essences, and states
Basic Categories 263
of affairs. A full development of the ontology would map out these types of
linkage.
Remember that Husserl did not assume a dualism, or trialism, of “substance.” As I (1995) stressed, the same “fact” – this subject (“I”) or this
experience – may have aspects or moments (dependent parts) falling
under Nature, Culture, and Consciousness. Husserl’s notion of moment
is a variant on the Aristotelian notion of a particularized quality that
exists only “in” a primary substance. Thus, this white in this piece of
paper is a dependent part of the paper; it could not exist unless the paper existed. We shall shortly factor dependence out as a distinct formal
essence.
Under Sense, we now observe, are such types of sense as Individual
Concept, Predicative Concept, Proposition, and Connective (to adopt
more recent terminology). These types of sense reflect familiar logical
forms, which align at least partly with certain formal essences.
Types of Formal Essence (Husserl Ordered)
Husserl developed a wide notion of formal essence, or form, wider than
that explained just previously. He merged “pure logic” with formal ontology, under which he placed not only the formal categories of states of
affairs and their constituents but also mathematical forms of quantity and
order and ontological forms of part and dependence.13 With some creative interpretation, we may thus distinguish four types of formal essence.
Adding these distinctions, we may order the Husserlian category
scheme in the way shown in Figure 8.7. All these types are discussed
in Husserl’s texts, but their organization is unspecified. Husserl does
not offer an architectonic (say, like Kant’s diamond of four groups of
three categories in the Critique of Pure Reason, 1781/1787.) However,
we may develop the systematics of Husserl’s ontology, I propose, by organizing the categories in the preceding scheme. This architecture is
itself a theoretical hypothesis. The aim here is to build on Husserl’s results by explicitly positing a certain ordering or ranking of these various
categories.
A select group of formal essences in the Husserlian scheme are those
we may call predicative or syntactic essences:
Individual, Species, Property, Relation, State of Affairs.
These essences are ontological forms (=genera) that mirror logical forms of
expressions (names, predicates, and sentences). And Husserl’s discussion
264 Mind World
CATEGORIES
1. fact [concrete or real entity]
2. essence [ideal entity]
2.1. formal essence or form
2.1.1. predicative or syntactic form
1. individual
a. substrate [independent individual]
b. moment [dependent individual]
c. event [dependent occurence]
2. species
3. property/quality
4. relation
5. state of affairs
6. connection: and, or, not, if-then (in states of affairs)
2.1.2. mathematical form
1. unity
2. plurality
3. number
4. set
5. manifold
2.1.3. ontic form
1. mereological form: part, whole
2. dependence
2.1.4. intentional form
1. intentional character
2. intentional relation
2.2. material essence or region
1. nature
a. inanimate
b. animate
2. culture
3. consciousness
3. sense [meaning entity]
1. individual concept, percept,...
2. predicative concept, percept,...
3. proposition
4. connective: “and,” “or,” “not,” “if-then”
figure 8.7. An ordered Husserlian category scheme.
of formal essences (in Ideas I) rests on his extensive prior discussion of
logical structure (in Logical Investigations). Yet these “syntactic”formations
are ontological; they are not grammatical categories of expressions (or
of senses). Thus, Husserl explicitly talks of the “syntactic” form of states of
affairs, and he holds that we have a “categorial intuition” of states of affairs
and their“syntactic”structure. Whereas Wittgenstein in the Tractatus held
Basic Categories 265
that we can merely “show” such forms, Husserl held that we can in some
way “see” them, or grasp them intuitively, and of course we can “say” or
express them in language.
Yet Husserl’s conception of logic was wider than, say, that of Frege
and Russell and Whitehead.14 In the Prolegomena of the Logical Investigations, Husserl defined “pure” logic as a mathesis universalis, suggesting
that“mathematical”form is logic’s aim. Here is the core of the distinction
between formal and material “essence” (drawn in Ideas I). Still, mathematical forms such as Number and Set have their own ontological roles,
in quantifying and grouping entities in any material region. Husserl took
geometry to analyze the material essence of space-time or spatiotemporal
things; yet the mathematical form – of a physical shape of a physical object in space-time – ought to be a formal essence. Generally, for Husserl,
mathematical forms define a type of formal essence distinct from that
of the predicative (and connective) “syntactic” ontological forms that
structure states of affairs.15
In the second of the Logical Investigations Husserl addressed “ideal
species” (called “essences” in Ideas I), treating them rather like Platonic
forms. But if whiteness per se is an ideal species, this whiteness in this piece
of paper is a “moment” of the paper, rather like an Aristotelian universal.
Husserl borrows here from both Plato and Aristotle. Then in the third
of the Logical Investigations Husserl analyzed the formal essences PartWhole and Dependence-Independence, in terms of which a “moment”
is defined as a dependent part. He also uses dependence extensively
when he considers dependencies among the mental and the physical (as
mapped out in Smith 1995).
In the fifth of the Logical Investigations and again in Ideas I, Husserl
analyzed intentionality. Intentionality is part of the material essence
of an act of consciousness. Yet, I believe, its form must be a formal
essence. On Husserl’s analysis, an act’s directedness cannot be treated
as a proper relation to its object: because its object need not exist; because
the directedness involves a sense that represents the object, so the act is
“related”to its object only “under”that sense; because the directedness itself fans out into various possible circumstances; because the directedness
involves a “horizon” of further possibilities about the object “intended.”
Intentional directedness is thus “relation-like,” but it is not strictly a relation, which entails that intentionality has a distinctive form, or formal
essence.16
Factoring out different aspects of form in this way, we may divide the
Husserlian formal essences, or forms, into four types indicated above.
266 Mind World
1. The predicative or “syntactic” forms reflect logical syntax: Individual; Species, Property, Relation; State of Affairs; Connection.
2. The mathematical forms are studied in branches of mathematics:
Number, Set, Manifold, and so on.
3. Part-Whole is treated separately as a formal essence. Then there
is the pivotal formal essence: Dependence. Dependence is formal
because it applies to entities in different material “regions.” But it
has a different role than either predicative or mathematical forms.
It is presupposed, for one thing, in the formal connection between
individuals and relations, forming a state of affairs. We need also to
consider other categories that belong in this third group, including
Modality.
4. Finally, we take intentionality as formally distinctive, as having a
separate type of form, intentional form. We assume the form of
intentionality does not reduce to the form of relation, or to any
other type of formal essence. Hence, intentionality has a unique
ontological role.
Distinguishing these various types of category, on the heels of the previous category schemes, leads to the larger question of higher-order structure in a category scheme, to which we now turn.
“Deep” Structure in Ontology (Whitehead Interpreted)
In Process and Reality (1978/1929) Alfred North Whitehead (1861–1947)
developed an elaborate categorial ontology designed to supersede the
Aristotelian metaphysics of substance-and-attribute, which has reigned
(with variation) for 2,500 years. Whitehead’s categories, and their application to mind, are explored in my “Consciousness and Actuality in
Whiteheadian Ontology” (2001a), reprinted as “Consciousness and Actuality” in Chapter 7. Here I turn to the architecture of Whitehead’s
category scheme. What is new in that scheme, as I interpret it, is a “deep”
structure in the world at large.
Whitehead’s metaphysical vision was shaped by both physics and
biology: everything evolves or “becomes” in the flux of matter-energy in
space-time, and the universe as a whole is itself an evolving “organism.”
Thus Whitehead proposed to replace the Aristotelian category of “primary substance” (that which becomes) with the category of “becoming”:
the process of becoming an “actual entity.” Substance ontology reflects
Basic Categories 267
the subject-predicate structure of grammar – even as developed in the
mathematical logic of Whitehead and Russell’s Principia Mathematica
(1910–13). By contrast, Whiteheadian process ontology reflects the mathematical structure of the calculus and fits more complex mathematics like
dynamical systems theory developed after Whitehead’s day. From predicate calculus to field calculus, we might say, is the formal reformation
Whitehead sought for ontology. Importantly, Whitehead does not eliminate everyday objects and their properties, where Aristotle began, but
he proposes a different and “deeper” foundation for the category of substantial particulars.
Whitehead starts with Heraclitus’s view that all is flux. The primary entities in the world are accordingly something like point-events, dubbed
“actual entities” or“actual occasions,”in the process of actualizing. Things
like Socrates and his house or even his walking or talking or thinking are
formed from these more basic entities. For Whitehead, each actual entity “feels” or “prehends” a wide variety of other actual entities and also
“eternal objects” or Platonic “forms” (conceived as pure potentialities
for being determined in some way). In the process of becoming, or “concrescence,” one actual entity emerges out of the many actual entities and
forms that it prehends. Prehension subsumes three traditional ontological
relations: causation of one actual entity by another, consciousness of something by an actual entity (of the right sort), and exemplification of a form
by an actual entity. A nexus is a fact of “relatedness” wherein an actual entity prehends (in different ways) other actual entities and/or forms. The
world is thus a flux composed of very many nexuses in which actual entities prehend many other actual entities and many Platonic forms. More
precisely, for Whitehead, “the actual world” of a given actual entity consists of those other actual entities and forms it prehends, from its point
of view as it were. So there is not one overarching world, but rather a
different world relative to each actual entity. The influence of relativity
physics is apparent.
Whitehead is normally read as a “process” philosopher who would reduce everything, in Heraclitean fashion, to temporal flow. But Whitehead
distinguishes two types of flux called “transition” and “concrescence.”
(See my reconstruction in the essay cited.) As I would like to put it, transition is the process of temporal becoming, while concrescence is the process
of ontological becoming. Thus, transition is the temporal “process” by which
one entity emerges from others earlier in time. Time, or space-time, is
an “extensive continuum” of these transitions. By contrast, concrescence, or
ontological becoming, is the ontological “process” by which one actual
268 Mind World
entity becomes – becomes that entity – as it emerges out of the many actual
entities and forms it prehends.
In our terms here (drawn from Husserl), transition is a material “process” and becoming is a formal “process.” So becoming is the formal process in which all things become entities, become what they are in relation
to all else. Time or space-time itself “becomes” in this primordial sense.
As Whitehead remarks: becoming is not temporal; temporality becomes.
In this way, for Whitehead, becoming is the ultimate structure of being:
the “category of the ultimate.”
Adverting to the ancients, I like to see this element of Whitehead
as echoing not Heraclitus but Anaximander. Anaximander, essentially
the first philosopher in the West, around 600 b.c. proposed that all the
world – including the most basic elements (air, earth, fire, water: or
strings, quarks, electrons, etc.) – originates in a more primordial level
called the apeiron, or “nondeterminate”: that which is not “determined”
or defined with the familiar types of properties. In like manner, Whiteheadian ontology posits a “deep” level of structure – Becoming – that
ultimately defines the more familiar levels of structure, including substance and attribute. Everything is thus founded on becoming.
Whitehead organized his ontology around a complex system of categories. He posited four types and levels of categories:
1. The Category of the Ultimate: Becoming.
2. Categories of Existence: of what exists or becomes.
3. Categories of Explanation: of how things are (axiomatic conditions).
4. Categoreal Obligations: preconditions on how things can be (conditions of possibility).
Within this hierarchy, he organized quite a number of categories, as
shown in Figure 8.8. Most of the complexities (and oddities?) in Whitehead’s category scheme we cannot delve into here. (Where Whitehead’s
terminology deliberately sounds mentalistic, think instead of hard ontological form.) Yet it is instructive to study the motivation and architecture
of this scheme, in contrast with the other schemes we have been studying.
To be sure, we have come a long way from the simplicity of the category
scheme we drew from Quine, whose 1932 Harvard dissertation (in logic)
was directed by Whitehead.
What I should like to abstract from Whitehead is an intuitive sense of
how differently “becoming” works in his ontology. Becoming is neither an
object nor a property or relation of an object. The distinctions we drew
Basic Categories 269
CATEGORIES
1. The Category of the Ultimate: becoming
(creativity, concrescence, process)
– the “principle” by which many become or create one; presupposed by all
other categories.
2. Categories of Existence
* 2.1. actual entity (actual occasion)
2.2. prehension (fact of relatedness)
2.3. nexus [fact of togetherness]
2.4. subjective form [form of apprehension]
* 2.5. eternal object (form, potential for definiteness)
2.6. proposition [= state of affairs]
2.7. multiplicity (disjunction-of-diverse-entities)
2.8. contrast (patterned-entity)
– * Where “actual entities and eternal objects stand out with a certain extreme
finality.”
3. Categories of Explanation
27 axiomatic principles about how actual entities, etc., may become.
4. Categoreal Obligations
9 axiomatic principles about preconditions for existence and explanation.
figure 8.8. Whitehead’s category scheme.
among types of essence in Husserlian ontology move in this direction,
when we separate unity, part, dependence, and intentionality from properties that are predicated of objects, properties such as being a human,
being wise, or being a teacher. Whiteheadian becoming is something of
a different order altogether. It is a kind of “deep” structure determining
what it is to be an entity at all, according to Whitehead’s ontology. I am
inclined to call ontological forms at this level “modes of being,” suggesting ways in which an entity comes to be the entity it is. Accordingly, in
Whitehead’s system the category of Becoming is more fundamental than
the categories of Existence, where we find categories closer to others
we have considered. The architecture of the Whiteheadian scheme thus
places Becoming at a distinctive and basic level.
Systematics in Category Schemes
A basic ontology, we said, is a theory about the most basic structures
of the world, beginning with an ontological systematics that posits the
most basic divisions or “diversity” among entities in the world, divisions
defining the basic categories of the world. Logically, a basic ontology
270 Mind World
includes a scheme of categories and a system of principles about entities
in those categories. But there is more to ontological systematics than a
list of categories. As our comparative explorations have been shown, the
organization of categories is crucial. Thus, a category scheme organizes
the basic divisions among things into categories, so that there is a structure in the basic division of entities. In the series of category schemes
explored here, we see an increase in complexity of structure as we
move through the schemes. What is the ontological significance of such
complexity?
The Quinean scheme posits only individuals (ultimately particles) and
sets: no nonextensional entities, and no bona fide categories or types as
opposed to sets. The structure of this scheme is thus very simple. In set
theory, to be sure, Russell’s theory of types adds complexity: a hierarchy of
types of sets. But Russell’s theory concerns only types of sets; at most it can
serve as a partial model of how some ontological types – groups – might
be ordered. Also, in the spirit of the Quinean scheme, particle physics
may lead into complications of quantum and field structure. But still,
in this category scheme, the ontological simplicity of individuals-and-sets
remains, even as set theory and particle physics grow more complicated
as theories.
The Aristotelian scheme posits a flat list or sequence of ten categories,
with branching subcategories for some. The structure of this scheme is
still very simple: a list of mutually exclusive types and subtypes. However, Aristotelian categories are bona fide types (not sets). They are
the most general types of entities that make up the world, the highest
general types, summa genera. If Species is granted its own place, as deserved, then the Aristotelian scheme is a list of eleven categories, which
are the highest genera of entities in the world, prior to combinations
thereof. It is assumed that every noncomposite entity falls under exactly one of the categories: the categories are mutually exclusive and
collectively exhaustive. Beyond that, the only principle of order is that
the category Primary Substance is most basic, because all the remaining categories cover entities that are “predicated” of primary substances,
or concrete individuals. If you will, concrete individuals are first-order
entities, and all other entities are second-order entities predicable of
individuals.
The neo-Aristotelian scheme varies the categories but retains the basic Aristotelian structure of substance and attribute. Thus, different types
of “properties” and “modes” are predicable of concrete individuals, the
Basic Categories 271
ontological “substrates” of the world. We also find composite entities,
notably states of affairs, that are formed by combinations of individuals with properties (featuring the mode of combination), and which
themselves carry modes like possibility. Yet the structure of the category
scheme is still a list of categories with subcategories. And every noncomposite entity in the world falls under one and only one category (or
subcategory).
The interesting question for Aristotelian category schemes is whether
there are different connections of “predication” for the different types
of attribute, the different categories after Substance. The simplest view
posits one kind of link that ties all types of attributes to individuals. Then
we would assume that Socrates is (univocally) a human, one, rational, a
teacher. A more complex view requires different types of link. Then we
would assume there are different basic ontological ties for different categories. The ubiquitous “is” then covers a multitude of sins, so that it is
one type of thing that Socrates is a human in kind, quite another type of
thing that Socrates is one in quantity, quite another that Socrates is rational in quality, and so on. In other words, different types of attribute “do”
different things to an individual, so these types of predication are ontologically distinct and should be kept apart. Despite the increase in complexity, I am sympathetic to this second approach. After all, what makes
Socrates “be” a human is a matter of belonging to an evolving biological
species, whereas what makes Socrates be one is a matter of arithmetic
structure or countability, whereas what makes Socrates be rational is a
matter of how well his mind (or brain?) works, and so on. What could
be more different than species membership, countability, qualifiability?
When we get serious about ontology, these are the kinds of difference that
matter.
Now, the Cartesian scheme presented here introduces a new principle
of organization among ontological categories. The scheme is no longer
simply a sequence of categories, with branching subcategories. Rather,
there are two types of categories, one cutting across the other. To impose
the later terminology, the formal categories of Substance and Attribute
cut across and apply to the material categories of Mental and Physical.
Thus, there are two basic types of type: formal and material. What is
remarkable, in our view here, is not the familiar material division into
mental and physical, for which Descartes is so famous. Instead, whatever
one may think of Cartesian dualism of substance and attribute (substancedualism plus property-dualism), I want to bring out Descartes’s implicit
272 Mind World
distinction between formal and material types or categories. These are
second-order types. What we find then in the Cartesian category scheme,
cast into our idiom, is a new structure of categories: not a sequence, but
a table of rows and columns, a matrix of two dimensions.
Because modern mathematics began with Descartes, we might expect
that subsequent mathematical visions would reshape the organization
of basic categories in ontology, not least when logic itself was tied into
mathematics in the late nineteenth century. Indeed, that is what Husserl –
mathematician turned philosopher – brought into categorial ontology.
Accordingly, in the Husserlian category scheme reconstructed earlier, we
find much greater complexity than in prior ontologies. Emerging there
is a vision of higher-order categories interlinked by distinctive ontological
ties among entities in these categories – ties ranging from predication
to mathematical structuring to part-whole composition to ontological
dependence to intentional representation. Let us step back and appraise
this complexity.
The ordered Husserlian scheme begins with the distinction among
the categories of Fact, Essence, and Sense – requiring that these kinds
of entities be interrelated. Then Essence is divided into the categories of
Formal Essence and Material Essence – requiring that forms apply to entities in different material domains. Then Formal Essence is divided into
some four types of Form – requiring inter alia that various forms define
entities differently. So there are several importantly different types of types
of entities: categories of types of entities. These higher-order categories do
not emerge from a putatively exhaustive listing of entities posited in a
wide-ranging ontology. Rather, they emerge through systematic analysis
of quite different types of things: logical structure, mathematical structure, predication of universals in particulars, part-whole composition,
existential dependence, and (not least) structures of intentionality. It is
in Husserl’s appraisal of these diverse things that we begin to discern a
scheme of higher-order categories – emerging piecemeal without being
so christened. I believe this categorial complexity in Husserl’s ontology
is something new in the history of philosophy: this kind of ontological
systematics, with this degree of organizational complexity. (The story is
far from finished.)
For the Aristotelian, we noted, different categories may reflect different types of predication as we move from species to quantities to qualities,
and so on. What is remarkable, in the ordered Husserlian scheme, is the
complexity of the links (can we say “formal relations”?) among entities in
different categories.
Basic Categories 273
Consider the following basic principles that begin to articulate the
ontological links among entities in the different categories assumed in
the Husserlian scheme:
1. Essences are predicated of entities:
(a) of concrete individuals and events (“factual” entities have
essences),
(b) of essences (essences have essences),
(c) of senses (senses have essences).
2. Material essences “determine” or qualify entities that have them.
(a) Natural essences qualify entities in nature, in space-time.
(b) Cultural essences qualify entities in society, in cultural systems.
(c) Consciousness’s essences qualify entities in conscious experience.
3. Formal essences “define” or form entities that have them.
(a) Predicative essences form entities in states of affairs.
(b) Mathematical essences form entities in various mathematical
structures, such as numerical order, geometrical order, and
sets.
(c) Ontic essences form entities in dependencies.
(d) Intentional essences form entities in intentional structures: as
subjects, contents, or objects of intentional experiences.
4. Senses “mean” or represent entities.
(a) Acts of consciousness “contain” or “entertain” or invoke
senses.
(b) An act of consciousness is directed through its sense toward
that object (if any) which is represented by its sense.
The categories of Fact, Essence, and Sense are themselves defined largely
by such links. These fundamentally different links among entities distributed among the different categories – the links indicated by italics in
the principles in the preceding list – entail a complex structure in the
category scheme. Rather than a sequence of categories, then, we find a
matrix of several dimensions, as entities of different categorial type link
or apply to others in different ways. An exact analysis would be a next step
in spelling out the ontology – details far beyond the scope of the present
essay.
Whitehead, another mathematician turned philosopher, parsed the
structure of the world differently than the preceding. In the Whiteheadian category scheme, however, we find an important architectural principle. The category of Becoming is the most basic, the “deep” structure
274 Mind World
of all being, and other types of category are built up from there. Without lingering over the details, we can begin to regroup basic categories
with an eye to our reconstructions of both Husserlian and Whiteheadian
category schemes.
Whiteheadian forms and Husserlian essences group together, allowing subdivisions like those presented here. Husserlian senses are a more
articulate part of consciousness than Whitehead allowed (compare my
“Consciousness and Actuality” in Chapter 7). What I would like to stress
most, however, is the architectural principle. As Becoming is basic in the
Whiteheadian scheme, I submit that certain formal essences are basic in
the ordered Husserlian scheme: some categories are, in George Orwell’s
phrase, more equal than others. Of the many categories we have considered, I submit, the most basic include those of Predicative Form (being
thus and so), Ontic Form (Dependence, Composition), Mathematical
Form (Number, Set, . . .), and Intentional Form (Sense, Representation).
These types of form we may see as factoring Becoming: these most basic
forms are “modes of being” that formally define what it is to be an entity,
that is, of a type higher than these.(Compare D. W. Smith 1997.) Here in
Whitehead’s ontology we see another great leap in categorial complexity,
in ontological systematics. Unlike Husserl’s systematics, however, Whitehead’s organization and typing of categories are explicit – writing from
the heart of modern logic, cognizant of Russell’s type theory, but with an
eye to abstract metaphysics rather than logic and set theory. (A scheme
of basic modes of being is outlined in D. W. Smith 1997. See also Simons
1994–95.)
Whereas Whitehead recognized one form of “becoming” an entity,
defined by a pattern of prehension, I believe we need to recognize fundamentally different types of entity defined by different basic modes of
being. Essences (“eternal forms”), senses (“eternal” contents of thought
or experience), and concrete individuals and events – these importantly
different types of entities are defined differently by basic forms or modesof-being. Thus, concrete entities are formed by their place in space-time,
while essences (kinds, properties, relations) are formed by their place
in predication, and senses (intentional contents) are formed by their
place in intentionality (which is not properly a relation). In the next section we consider a category scheme that simplifies the results gathered
here.
What I hope is growing clearer and clearer is that a rich ontology –
an ontology rich enough in its systematics to capture the diversity of being
around us – requires a category scheme with a lot of structure ordering
Basic Categories 275
the categorial divisions themselves. Again, we are looking at fundamental
ontological divisions at least among predication, composition, dependence, and intentionality.
A Twenty-First-Century Category Scheme
Bearing in mind the ontological complexities considered here, let me
propose a simpler category scheme that factors the categorial divisions
explored. We distinguish formally distinct types as forms, or formal categories. And we distinguish (differently than Husserl) several materially
distinct types drawn initially from everyday life. Within some of these
categories, formal or material, we note specific subcategories (presented
separately in Figure 8.9, for simplicity). Notice that the categorial niche of
intentional content, or meaning (sense), falls under the formal structure
of intentionality.
I propose this scheme for future adjudication. There is much to be
done to flesh out various parts of the scheme, but I propose the outlines as presented earlier. Most important, for present purposes, are the
divisions of formal ontological types. Observing such divisions, we are
better prepared to face the most pressing ontological issue of our day:
the nature of the connection between mind and body, as we understand
Formal Categories [Ontological Forms]
individual
species/kind, quality, relation, state of affairs
number, set, structure, . . .
part/whole
location [form of space-time]
possibility, necessity, (actuality)
dependence
intentionality
– with subcategories:
Intentionality
subject, act/experience, content/meaning,
object [of intention], intention [intentional “relation”]
Material Categories (Everyday Kinds (of Terrestrial Entities))
object, event, place, time, plant, animal, human being,
mental activity, artifact, institution
–with subcategories:
Mental Activity
perception, thought, emotion, volition
figure 8.9. A contemporary category scheme.
276 Mind World
it in philosophy and science today. Descartes’s ontology notoriously left a
sharp division between mental and physical, a division that leaves philosophy confounded to this day. Husserl’s ontology allowed a crucial improvement, making room for the cultural as distinct from both the mental and
physical. Still, all these materially distinct things occur in one world. The
crucial distinctions among the mental, physical, and cultural, we should
begin to see, are formal rather than material. With the preceding formal
divisions we can, I think, better understand the ontology of these material
phenomena (“material” as opposed to formal, not as opposed to mental
or cultural).
In the long run we might cast the most basic categories not as types
of entity but as modes of being that define entities, drawing on the conception of depth ontology prefigured in Whitehead (as interpreted in
Chapter 7). In that spirit we would distinguish two principal formal
categories: Being and Basis. Under Being would fall the various categories
of entity, such as Individual, Species, and so on. And under Basis would
fall basic categories or “modes” of being that define or “originate” entities
of various categories. Thus, the category Individual would be grounded
in the mode of being distinct (Distinctness), the category Species would
be grounded in the mode of being together (Togetherness), the category
Number would be grounded in the mode of being quantified (Quantifi-
cation), and so on. However, the category Possibility would itself be a
mode, the mode of being possible. Dependence too would be a mode,
the mode of being dependent. And I am inclined also to cast Intentionality as a mode, the mode of being intentional or directed. (Whitehead’s
notion of prehension may be seen in this light.) To detail a category
scheme of this sort would be a very long story, far beyond the scope of
the present exploration. Here we can only gesture toward this approach
to configuring a categorial ontology. (See D. W. Smith 1997 and Simons
1994–95 for brief sketches along these lines.)
Three-Facet Ontology
There is an important ontological division among three basic aspects or
facets of an entity: what we may call its form, appearance, and substrate.
This distinction is elaborated in my “Three Facets of Consciousness”
(in Chapter 1). There I argue that the ontology of consciousness requires this distinction: we need to distinguish – on a categorial level –
the formal structure of intentionality, the way an experience appears in
Basic Categories 277
consciousness (including “what it is like”), and the neural substrate and
cultural background of mental states. However, the three-facet distinction is thoroughly general, or rather “categorial.” How then does this
distinction relate to the preceding category schemes?
Briefly, the distinction runs as follows. The form of an entity includes
its various types of attributes – using “form” in the wide Aristotelian sense
(form plus matter), as opposed here to the narrower Husserlian sense
of formal essence. The appearance of an entity includes the ways it can
be known or, most generally, “intended” in a mental state – as reflected
in various types of sense or intentional content that prescribe the entity.
Finally, the substrate of an entity includes the various types of entities it
depends on for its existence – background conditions including physical
composition, causal genesis, cultural history, psychological motivation, or
whatever, depending on its material type. (The appearance of an act of
consciousness begins with “inner awareness” as appraised in my “Return
to Consciousness,” in Chapter 3. The cultural background of an intentional experience, part of its substrate, is explored in my “Background
Ideas,” in Chapter 5.)
Now, this three-facet distinction can be grounded in any category
scheme that gives pride of place to predication, dependence, and intentionality. For an entity’s form includes the attributes or essences (of
whatever type) that are predicable of it, whereas an entity’s appearance includes the senses (of whatever type) that represent it in an intentional
state; and an entity’s substrate includes the conditions or entities on
which its existence depends. Any entity participates in these ways in predication, dependence, and intentionality. So the three-facet distinction applies categorially to any entity – in a world with predication, dependence,
and intentionality.
The Husserlian category scheme, notably the ordered Husserlian
scheme fashioned here, grounds the three-facet distinction. Indeed, that
scheme was constructed precisely with these, among other, issues in mind.
And the contemporary category scheme of the previous section similarly
grounds the distinction. Again, this simpler scheme was fashioned precisely to distinguish formal categories of:
Individual
Species/Kind, Quality, Relation, State of Affairs
Number, Set, Structure,...
Part/Whole
278 Mind World
Location [Form of Space-Time]
Possibility, Necessity, (Actuality)
Dependence
Intentionality
The three-facet distinction can be seen, then, in this ontology as the
beginning of a systematic categorial ontology, an ontological systematics.
But we do not stop at three basic facets; we parse as many as our ontology
recognizes.
To generalize, or rather to formalize, the contemporary category
scheme outlined here entails that any entity has distinctive ontological
facets of:
attribute
mathematical structure
composition
location (if concrete)
modality
existential dependence
intention (intentional representation)
These categorially distinct ontological facets of an entity are instances
of precisely the several categories posited in that scheme. Importantly,
not every entity admits of facets of all these types. Properties or essences
do not have location, nor do mathematical structures, nor do senses.
Only minds achieve intentional representation. (Language is infused with
mind, and vice versa, and so achieves intention.) Some things depend
for their existence on others, whereas others do not. Of course, these
differences are precisely what lead us to basic categories, basic ontological
forms.
Observing such categorial differences is the lifeblood of ontology, no
matter the domain of application.
Complexity
Quine declared a famous preference in ontology for “desert landscapes”
rather than jungles, meaning he sought simplicity.
However, to vary the metaphor, the Amazon rainforest has spawned
more life forms than any other place on Earth, and we had better acknowledge their diversity. For that matter, the desert biosphere is far from
simple; get down on your knees and you see all kinds of life forms that you
Basic Categories 279
could not observe from a human’s eye level. In any event, I want to close
the present chapter with a plea – against the Zeitgeist – for complexity
in ontology. Much as biology must mark divisions among kinds and order the divisions, so must ontology mark basic divisions and order the
resulting basic kinds or categories. The closer we look at things around
us, from physical to biological to cultural phenomena to – perhaps the
hardest to observe – our own consciousness, the more distinctions we
must draw. Moreover, many of the basic distinctions we draw are formal
rather than material.
But why does the Quinean posit only individuals, and sets of them?
Because modern predicate logic reflects a simple ontology: here lies the
driving background idea. (Compare the influence of such conceptions
according to my “Background Ideas,” in Chapter 5.) As language is structured into terms and predicates only, combined by sentence connectives
and quantifiers, so it seemed to Quine the world is structured into individuals and sets only. To add Husserl’s distinction, a Quinean recognizes
only these two formal categories: all further distinctions in ontology are
left to material ontologies, which in turn are established by the special
sciences, which take over where formal ontology leaves off.
What we learn from these reflections on increasingly complex category
schemes, I believe, is that basic ontology needs to mark out a rather
complicated order of basic types of entities, both formal and material
types. Like biological systematics, ontological systematics finds genuine
complexity in the basic structure of the world around us.
Notes
1. On conceptions of biological systematics, see Mayr and Ashlock 1991 and
Lincoln, Boxshall, and Clark 1998. The definition is from Mayr and Ashlock,
p. 2. The conception of ontology as a formal scheme of“systematics” covering
all possible types of entities – what I am calling “ontological systematics” as opposed to biological systematics – derives from discussions with Chuck Dement
in the Ontek research program. This conception of systematics in ontology
is also informed by a close study of Whitehead’s ontology, as discussed in this
chapter and in Smith 2001a, reprinted in Chapter 7 as “Consciousness and
Actuality.”
2. See Mayr and Ashlock 1991: 430.
3. Quine argued initially against the distinction between analytic and synthetic
truths, those determined by meaning and those determined by empirical fact.
Subsequently, he characterized the “web of belief” as a network tied to empirical observation at the periphery, with mathematical and logical beliefs at
the center. Observations are largely a posteriori, while logical-mathematical
280 Mind World
claims are largely a priori. It is this distinction of role in the formation
of beliefs that I have in mind. Categorial ontology lies at the center of our
web of belief, yet is responsible to the periphery of perceptual observation.
4. See Quine 1992/1990, 1995; Smith 1994.
5. A crisp summation of received naturalist wisdom is found in Kim 1998. Kim
finds room for mind as supervenient on basic physical processes that are ultimately functional states of a physical system composed ultimately of physical
particles.
6. We follow the text in the Irwin and Fine (1995) translation of Aristotle’s
Categories. Fine and Irwin firmly read Aristotle as concerned with ontological,
not grammatical, categories. On Aristotle’s term kategoriai, or“predications,”
and thus the derived term “categories,” see Irwin and Fine’s comments in
Aristotle 1995: notes, pp. 1, 606–7.
7. A perceptive contemporary philosophical study of Aristotle’s full metaphysics, very congenial to our concerns, is Furth 1988.
8. See Furth 1988.
9. Descartes uses the term “mode” to mean a property in a substance, and
“attribute” in a more special sense. Here I substitute attribute for mode in
summarizing Descartes’s ontology, to indicate variation on the Aristotelian
system and to make room here for my own use of mode.
10. My colleague Alan Nelson reads Descartes in a way that I would place squarely
between Aristotelian and Husserlian doctrines of attribute. For Descartes,
on Nelson’s reading, every “mode,” or instance of one of the attributes of
thought and extension, is itself abstracted from a substance only by a specific
mental act of “distinction,” so that, as I understand the view, each mode of
thinking-such-and-such or being-extended-thus-and-so is inseparable from
its substance except by this rational act of distinguishing it in a certain way.
Not only is Descartes beginning to observe the formal-material distinction in
ontology; he is also beginning to articulate a notion of modes as inseparably
dependent elements in proper substances. Both views emerged in full flower
in Husserl’s ontology, as we see later. Nelson’s reading of Descartes, as yet
unpublished, was presented in Paul Weingartner’s seminar on ontological
categories at the University of California, Irvine, in spring 2001.
11. The similarities and differences between Husserl and Wittgenstein on these
issues are traced out in Smith 2002c.
12. See Smith 2002c. See Tougas 1996 on Wittgenstein on the “projection” of
states of affairs.
13. For details see Smith 2002b.
14. See Smith 2002a, 2002d.
15. See the details in Smith 2002b.
16. See Smith and McIntyre 1982, on the structure of intentionality according
to this analysis. The details make the case glossed here that intentionality
cannot be a proper relation, for reasons here assimilated to formal ontology.
References
Aristotle. 1995. Categories. In Aristotle, Selections. Translated by Terence Irwin and
Gail Fine. Indianapolis: Hackett.
Basic Categories 281
Armstrong, David M. 1996. A World of States of Affairs. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press.
Chalmers, David. 1996. The Conscious Mind. Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Descartes, Rene.´ 1984. Meditations on First Philosophy. In The Philosophical Writings of
Descartes, vol. 2, translated by John Cottingham, Robert Stoothoff, and Dugald
Murdoch. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. Latin original, 1641.
Furth, Montgomery. 1988. Substance, Form and Psyche: An Aristotelian Metaphysics.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Husserl, Edmund. 1963. Ideas. Translated by Boyce Gibson. New York: Collier
Books. From the German original of 1913. Originally titled Ideas pertaining
to a Pure Phenomenology and to a Phenomenological Philosophy, First Book.
2001. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. New edition, edited with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a preface by Michael Dummett. London:
Routledge. Translated by J. N. Findlay from revised, second German edition.
London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1970. German original, 1900–1, revised
1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920 (Investigation VI).
Kant, Immanuel. 1997. Critique of Pure Reason. Translated and edited by Paul
Guyer and Allen W. Wood. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. German
original, 1781/1787.
Kim, Jaegwon. 1998. Mind in a Physical World. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press.
Lincoln, Roger, Geoff Boxshall, and Paul Clark, eds. 1998. A Dictionary of Ecology,
Evolution and Systematics. 2nd ed. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Mayr, Ernst, and Peter D. Ashlock. 1991. Principles of Systematic Zoology. 2nd ed.
New York: McGraw-Hill.
Quine, W. V. 1992. Pursuit of Truth. Rev. ed. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University
Press. First edition, 1990.
1995. From Stimulus to Science. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press.
Simons, Peter. 1994–95.“New Categories for Formal Ontology.” Grazer Philosophische Studien 49: 77–99.
Smith, David Woodruff. 1994. “How to Husserl a Quine – and a Heidegger Too.”
Synthese 98 (1): 153–73.
1995. “Mind and Body.” In Barry Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The
Cambridge Companion to Husserl, pp. 323–93. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
1997. “Being and Basis.” Unpublished manuscript, extending my presentation
under the same title at the Second European Congress of Analytic Philosophy, Leeds, England, 5–7 August 1996.
1999. “Background Ideas.” Appeared in Italian translation as “Idee di sfondo,”
Paradigmi (Estratto da PARADIGMI, Rivista di critica filosofica) (Rome), Anno
XVII, no. 49 (January–April): 7–37.
2001a. “Consciousness and Actuality in Whiteheadian Ontology.” In Liliana
Albertazzi, ed., The Dawn of Cognitive Science: Early European Contributors,
pp. 269–97. Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
2001b. “Three Facets of Consciousness.” Axiomathes 12: 55–85.
2002a. “What Is ‘Logical’ in Husserl’s Logical Investigations? The Copenhagen
Interpretation.” In Dan Zahavi and Frederik Stjernfelt, eds., 100 Years of
Phenomenology: Husserl’s Logical Investigations Revisited, pp. 51–65. Dordrecht:
Kluwer Academic Publishers.
282 Mind World
2002b.“Mathematical Form in the World.” Philosophia Mathematica 10 (3): 102–
29.
2002c.“Intentionality and Picturing: Early Husserl vis-a-vis ` Early Wittgenstein.”
Southern Journal of Philosophy 40, suppl.: 153–80.
2002d. “‘Pure’ Logic, Ontology, and Phenomenology.” Revue internationale de
philosophie.
Smith, D. W., and R. McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality. Dordrecht: D.
Reidel.
Tougas, Joseph. 1996. “Hertz und Wittgenstein. Zum historischen Hintergrund
des Tractatus.” Conceptus 29, 75: 205–28.
Whitehead, Alfred North. 1978. Process and Reality. Edited by David Ray Griffin
and Donald W. Sherburne. New York: Free Press, Macmillan. First edition,
1929.
Wittgenstein, Ludwig. 1961.Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus. Translated by D. F. Pears
and B. F. McGuinness. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul. German original,
1921.
Coda: The Beetle in the Box
I found a little beetle, so that Beetle was his name,
And I called him Alexander and he answered just the same.
I put him in a match-box, and I kept him all the day...
And Nanny let my beetle out –
. . . And Beetle ran away.
.........
We went to all the places which a beetle might be near,
And we made the sort of noises which a beetle likes to hear,
And I saw a kind of something...
It was Alexander Beetle I’m as certain as can be
And he had a sort of look as if he thought it must be ME.
A. A. Milne, “Forgiven”
Now someone tells me that he knows what pain is only from his own case! –
Suppose everyone had a box with something in it: we call it a “beetle.” No
one can look into anyone else’s box, and everyone says he knows what a
beetle is only by looking at his beetle. – Here it would be quite possible for
everyone to have something different in his box. One might even imagine
such a thing constantly changing. – But suppose the word “beetle” had a
use in these people’s language? – If so it would not be used as the name of
a thing. The thing in the box has no place in the language-game at all; not
even as a something: for the box might even be empty. – No, one can “divide
through” by the thing in the box; it cancels out, whatever it is.
That is to say: if we construe the grammar of the expression of sensation on the model of “object and designation” the object drops out of
consideration as irrelevant.
Ludwig Wittgenstein, Philosophical Investigations
Friends of Pooh will know this poem. Friends of another teacher of children (who moved from Austria to England in Pooh’s time) will know
283
284 Mind World
the prose passage about a differently boxed beetle. (Would the serious
Austrian philosopher read English children’s poems? “Lewis Carroll” is
one of the few proper names in the index of the Investigations.)
With his play of the beetle in the box, some think, the Bard of Oxbridge
may have undercut (deconstructed?) the very discipline of phenomenology. I think not, for reasons emerging in the chapters in this volume, and
accordingly I should like to remark briefly, in closing this book, on our
familiar background picture of contents in the “box” of consciousness.
Wittgenstein continued, through the Investigations, to ponder questions of consciousness, privacy, introspection, and their role (if any) in
language – in ways not altogether uncongenial (surprise?) to the present
studies. Contrasting the following questions
“Are these books my books?”
“Is this foot my foot?”
“Is this body my body?”
“Is this sensation my sensation?”
Wittgenstein asked, “Which sensation does one mean by ‘this’ one? That
is: how is one using the demonstrative pronoun here? Certainly otherwise than in, say, the first example! Here confusion occurs because one
imagines that by directing one’s attention to a sensation one is pointing
to it” (1997/1953: §411). I find no such confusion in the careful practice
of phenomenology.
We do direct our attention to our own experiences of sensation,
perception, thought, volition: we do so in reflection in the practice of
phenomenology. And we may aptly use demonstrative pronouns in
phenomenological analysis, as we have in the chapters in this volume:
“In this very experience I see this frog.” When I use this sentence to articulate the structure of my own experience, the second occurrence of the
demonstrative (in “this frog”) articulates my perceptual intention of an
object, whereas the first occurrence of the demonstrative (in “in this experience”) articulates my inner awareness of my perceptual experience.
Notice that there is here no higher-order observation accompanying my
experience, wherein I observe “this experience,” as if mentally pointing
to it while I turn my attention to it, with you-my-reader as if peering over
my mental shoulder as I mentally point. Nor am I using the pronoun
“this” while I demonstrate my experience, say, by pointing to the top of
my head (indicating something happening in my visual cortex an inch
below my fingertip). No, carrying out the phenomenological analysis is
not like that. (“What is it like?”) It is not like looking and pointing at
Coda: The Beetle in the Box 285
the contents in one’s own private box of consciousness. Analysis of experience is rather more like attending to what you are saying and then
reflecting on its form and meaning. Thus, we have all experienced perceptions like that exampled. We may call upon our familiarity with such
experiences (by virtue of inner awareness) and our recollections of such
experiences. And we then try to describe, interpret, and analyze the form
and meaning or content of such experiences. One technique of explication and analysis is to formulate a phenomenological description of
the form: “In this experience I see this frog.” In using this sentence I
am relying on my readers’ familiarity with that type of experience, and
I am using that form of sentence to articulate that familiar form of consciousness, including the form of inner awareness of the experience. The
first-person methodology here spreads from the singular to the plural: I
am talking to you. Similarly, Marcel Proust’s first-person descriptions of
his own relived experiences, in In Search of Lost Time, invite the reader to
explore those types of experience as if they were the reader’s own. But
we readers don’t think Proust is pointing his finger at his remembered
experiences!
There is no confusion in either use of the demonstrative pronoun
in the phenomenological description,“In this experience I see this frog.”
Indeed, a number of philosophers have by now used the logic or grammar of demonstratives in the analysis of consciousness, assuaging
Wittgensteinian worries about our inner ostension of our own mental
states or their contents. (If we can’t point at them, we can’t talk about
them? And we can’t direct our attention to them either?)
After Jaakko Hintikka (1962, 1969) developed a modal logic of
(sentences ascribing) intentional attitudes including perception, HectorNeri Castaneda ( ˜ 1966, 1968) laid out an analysis of the use of “indicator”
and “quasi-indicator” pronouns in attributions of belief or perception.
Thus, when Hector says, “David thinks that he himself is a phenomenologist,” Hector ascribes to David a thought David would express by saying,“I
[myself] am a phenomenologist.” And when Hector says,“David sees that
this* frog [before David himself] is jumping,” Hector ascribes to David
a visual judgment David would express by saying, “This frog [before me
myself] is jumping.” Castaneda ˜ ’s aim was partly to resolve the quandary of
“private” language about mental states, by showing how our language allows us to attribute to others their own “private” perspectives, in ways that
are already familiar in ordinary language (regimented a bit for logical
purposes). Indeed, half a century earlier, Husserl had already begun the
appraisal of the use of “this” to express the content of one’s perception
286 Mind World
in saying “This blackbird flies up” (Logical Investigations, 1900–1; I,
§26, V, §5.).
Nodding to Castaneda, John Perry ( ˜ 2001) has recently studied “re-
flexive” thought contents, using “inner demonstratives” to indicate contents of one’s own thoughts whose truth conditions are tied to the mental state in which they occur. And nodding to Perry and Castaneda (as ˜
well as Wittgenstein), while drawing on cognitive studies of somatic proprioception, Jose Luis Berm ´ udez ( ´ 1998: 146) has used demonstratives to
characterize different types of self-consciousness, both bodily and
psychological.
Meanwhile, looking to phenomenological analyses begun by
Brentano, Husserl, and Sartre, I have been using inner demonstratives
(as here) to articulate the formal structure of one’s inner awareness of
one’s own passing experience: “In this experience I see this frog.” (The
background of this line of analysis is found in Smith 1986, Smith 1989,
and Smith and McIntyre 1982, with roots in the original debate between
Hintikka and Castaneda.) ˜
If these post-Wittgensteinian views of consciousness are valid, then
it remains perfectly appropriate to speak of experience as “inner” and
our immediate awareness thereof as “inner.” The question is what that
amounts to, and the chapters in this volume pursue just that question.
Indeed, we should now see that Wittgenstein’s worries about the “beetle in
the box” concern how our public language about experience works, and
not whether we have conscious experience, which Wittgenstein pointedly
affirms (Investigations, §§420, 423). Yes, there is a beetle in the box, and we
can talk about it: not by saying “this” while pointing a finger as if toward
a bug in one’s hair or head, but by using language in ways diagnosed
by Castaneda et alii, and by expressing phenomenological structures of ˜
experience appropriately.
Indeed, Wittgenstein’s own sensibility about consciousness resonates
eerily in contemporary philosophy of mind:
The feeling of an unbridgeable gulf between consciousness and brain-process:
how does it come about that this does not come into the considerations of our
ordinary life? . . . THIS is supposed to be produced by a process in the brain! –
as it were clutching my forehead. – But what can it mean to speak of “turning my
attention on to my own consciousness”? (Investigations, §412)
The mind-body problem, incorporating (in-corp-orating) today’s “hard”
problem of consciousness, remains puzzling even as we both embrace
neuroscience and turn in phenomenological reflection to the structure
Coda: The Beetle in the Box 287
of consciousness as experienced. This combination of phenomenology
and natural science occupied our attention in the preceding chapters.
And what it means to turn my attention to my own consciousness, and to
its typical structure, is: to practice phenomenology, as it has grown out of
its roots in Husserl’s work and as it has evolved in contemporary modes
of analysis. (Indeed, attention itself has a complex phenomenological
structure that commands our attention in phenomenology: see Gurwitsch
1985 and Smith 2003.)
There is a “picture” of consciousness that we undeniably and correctly
hold, as Wittgenstein explicitly stressed (Investigations, §§422–24). It is
the centerpiece of The Picture, the cartoon early in the present book.
That picture is a part of our background world picture: in precisely the
sense appraised in the essay in Chapter 5 called “Background Ideas,”
which drew on Wittgenstein’s conception of “background” (in On Certainty, 1972/1949–52). So familiar is the picture that our everyday cartoon form canonizes it. (And when did the cartoon idiom develop? How
long after the Cro-Magnon cave drawings?) That picture is a guide to the
phenomeno-onto-logical structures explored in these chapters. There we
find “the beetle in the box”: the content in an act of consciousness in the
surrounding world of nature and culture and language.
References
Bermudez, Jos ´ e Luis. ´ 1998. The Paradox of Self-Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.:
MIT Press.
Castaneda, Hector-Neri. ˜ 1966.“‘He’: A Study in the Logic of Self-Consciousness.”
Ratio 8: 130–57.
1968. “On the Phenomeno-Logic of the I.” In Akten des XIX Internationalen
Kongresses fur Philosophie ¨ , 260–66. Reprinted in Q. Cassam, ed., Self-Knowledge.
Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1994.
Gurwitsch, Aron. 1985. Marginal Consciousness. Edited by Lester Embree. Athens:
Ohio University Press.
Hintikka, Jaakko. 1962. Knowledge and Belief. Ithaca, N.Y.: Cornell University Press.
1969. Models for Modalities. Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Husserl, Edmund. 2001. Logical Investigations. Vols. 1 and 2. New edition, edited
with an introduction by Dermot Moran, and with a preface by Michael
Dummett. London: Routledge. Translated by J. N. Findlay from the revised,
second German edition. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1970. German
original, 1900–1, revised 1913 (Prolegomena and Investigations I–V), 1920
(Investigation VI).
Milne, A. A. 1978. Now We Are Six. New York: Dell. First edition, 1927.
Perry, John. 2001. Knowledge, Possibility and Consciousness. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press.
288 Mind World
Smith, David Woodruff. 1986. “The Structure of (Self-)Consciousness.” Topoi 5
(2): 149–56.
1989. The Circle of Acquaintance: Perception, Consciousness, and Empathy.
Dordrecht: Kluwer Academic Publishers.
2003. “The Formal Structure of Context and Context-Awareness.” In Lester
Embree, ed., Gurwitsch’s Relevance for the Cognitive Sciences. Dordrecht: Kluwer
Academic Publishers.
Smith, David Woodruff, and Ronald McIntyre. 1982. Husserl and Intentionality.
Dordrecht: D. Reidel.
Wittgenstein, Ludwig. 1972. On Certainty. Edited by G. E. M. Anscombe and G. H.
von Wright. Translated by Denis Paul and G. E. M. Anscombe. New York:
Harper and Row. First edition, 1969; written 1949–51.
1997. Philosophical Investigations. Translated by G. E. M. Anscombe. Oxford:
Blackwell. First edition, 1953.
Appendix: Background Conceptions of Ontology,
Phenomenology, Philosophy of Mind, and
Historical Philosophy
In the following remarks I try to outline the broad conceptual, methodological, and historical background assumed in the preceding chapters.
This background is part of the unity of views developing in the chapters
themselves, although the chapters are intended to be accessible without
digging into this background. Of course, one’s own background is often
the most difficult part of one’s philosophy to articulate.
The Theory of Consciousness and World in Recent Philosophy
The headwinds in philosophy are strong. They are the winds of fashion.
Metaphysics has been under suspicion for three centuries, first in the
age of science and recently in the era of cultural interpretation. Yet what
we need in philosophy today is a more systematic ontology, framing a wide
metaphysics that is cognizant of discoveries in physics, neuroscience, and
evolutionary biology alongside analyses of our own consciousness and
our cultural practices and institutions.
Phenomenology has been under suspicion for half a century, as philosophy turned away from conscious experience. The tradition of analytic philosophy turned toward language – ordinary language, symbolic
logic, then computer languages – and then toward naturalism, eyeing
the marvels of quantum mechanics, relativity theory, and evolutionary
biology. Continental philosophy too came to stress language, discourse,
text, and cultural practice over consciousness. Yet what we need today,
to understand the phenomena of consciousness much discussed in recent philosophy of mind oriented to cognitive neuroscience, is a more
289
290 Appendix
systematic phenomenology, framing a careful analysis of structures of
subjective experience.
The yearning for these perspectives is all around us. Famous scientists
wax philosophical in popular surveys of quantum physics, cosmology,
neuroscience, evolutionary biology, dynamical systems (“chaos”). Cognitive scientists, especially philosophers of mind, have rediscovered the
importance of consciousness, the hard problem for once promising functionalist models of mind in computers and human brains.
To deal with the basic forms of reality, philosophy must return to systematic metaphysics or ontology. The denunciations of metaphysics –
from Kant to the positivists – were aimed at speculative metaphysical
systems. Yet we need a sense of system that outruns any direct experimentation. Theoretical physics follows this pattern while explaining results
of empirical investigation. As W. V. Quine has well observed, our belief
system – from everyday common sense to current physics – crafts the best
overall theory we can muster in the face of our overall empirical observations. What we have lost in recent philosophy is the really big picture, writ
large but written carefully. First there was Rudolf Carnap’s logical empiricism of the 1930s and 1940s, where the new logic was to formulate our
scientific theories based on reports of sensory perception (formulated
in “protocol” sentences): a Kantian world view written in a language of
symbolic logic (the noumena outrun that language, so we don’t really
talk about them). Then there came ordinary language philosophy in the
1950s, which eschewed metaphysics. P. F. Strawson’s Individuals (1960)
then allowed “descriptive” metaphysics, which would analyze the world
but only as described in ordinary language. Then, since the 1970s, came
the computer revolution: computer languages tell all, from the nature
of mind (artificial intelligence) to DNA reproduction to molecular combination and even molecular computers, as if all reality is constituted by
algorithms in some appropriate language of computation. Meanwhile, in
the continental tradition Jacques Derrida transformed phenomenology
into subtle interpretations of linguistic practices or texts, seeming to jettison not only consciousness but all reality beyond the text. Other French
poststructuralists followed similar lines. The most extreme antimetaphysical rhetoric may lie in Jean Baudrillard’s recent notion of “hyperreality,”
where reality is lost in virtual reality, in the commodity of computer information that increasingly defines social and ultimately political force,
displacing natural languages and the consciousness that phenomenology
said underlies language. The computer model has thus displaced not only
classical theories of mind but social theories as well.
Appendix 291
To deal with consciousness once again, philosophy must return to the
discipline of phenomenology. A century ago consciousness was richly
studied: from Franz Brentano’s Psychology from an Empirical Standpoint
(1874) to William James’s The Principles of Psychology (1891) to Edmund
Husserl’s Logical Investigations (1900–1) and Ideas (1912–13) to the literary practice of interpreting one’s own experience in Marcel Proust’s
In Search of Lost Time (A la recherche du temps perdu ` , beginning in 1913).
Phenomenology then flourished in the continental tradition following
Husserl: in Martin Heidegger, Jean-Paul Sartre, Maurice Merleau-Ponty,
Simone de Beauvoir (even as Heidegger had resisted talk of “consciousness”). But analytic philosophy of mind took an apparently antiphenomenological turn with Gilbert Ryle’s The Concept of Mind (1949), declaring that mind is but a disposition to overt behavior (ascribed in ordinary
language). (In fact, Ryle viewed his own work as a variant practice of phenomenology, as did Wittgenstein his.) There followed the seminal essays
of today’s materialism by U. T. Place, J. J. Smart, and D. M. Armstrong
in the 1950s and 1960s, positing that mind is identical with states of the
central nervous system. By 1970 functionalism set in as a refinement:
mental states are functional states of a physical system – mind is what
the brain does in its physical environment of body in nature, and what
computers can in principle do. Gradually we witnessed the return of consciousness. From Thomas Nagel’s “What Is It Like to Be a Bat?” (1973)
to John Searle’s The Rediscovery of the Mind (1993), philosophers began
to insist that consciousness is real even though realized in the brain in a
physical universe. Specifically, consciousness has essential properties, including intentionality and sensory qualia, that do not reduce to physical
properties of physical particles or even functional properties of systems of
physical particles. Thus was born, or reborn, the “hard” problem of consciousness, as David Chalmers dubbed it in The Conscious Mind (1996).
Gradually the words “intentionality” and “phenomenological” have entered the vocabulary of cognitive science – as scientific philosophy of
mind has been called since the 1970s. And so, merging the rich continental and analytic traditions in philosophy of mind, we do philosophy in
the new millennium with our eyes on consciousness. To develop a proper
theory of consciousness, I submit, we must think through the basic results
of classical phenomenology, starting with Husserl’s monumental work.
These classical results (in the mathematician’s sense of achieved results)
are not yet fully articulate in the analytic tradition (in the writings of
Jerry Fodor, Daniel Dennett, Paul and Patricia Churchland, etc.), where
the important details of phenomenological analysis are largely glossed
292 Appendix
over. Yet we must proceed in phenomenology today with our eyes on the
issues of mind-in-brain that are so sharply focused in recent cognitive
science.
A philosopher well versed in both continental and analytic philosophy
observed to me recently, “It will take two hundred years for philosophy
of mind to catch up with phenomenology.” Indeed, the distinctions and
conceptualizations of phenomenology are well ahead of the literature of
analytic philosophy of mind. On the other hand, these results must today
be worked into the best results of contemporary science. And one day
soon results of neuroscience will help to refine results of phenomenology,
as we learn where and how key structures of consciousness are produced
or realized in particular patterns of neural activity in various parts of the
brain.
To deal with this bewildering complexity, from quarks to consciousness
to human language to computational systems to biological processes,
philosophy needs a proper synthesis of phenomenology and ontology,
a framework able to combine the results of phenomenology on consciousness and the results of ontology on forms of things in the world.
Although doctrines of functionalism and supervenience have stimulated
a great deal of thought about the precise ontological form of mind, there
is more to ontology than meets our eyes in this piecemeal approach to
the mind-body problem – as exciting and fruitful as the recent debates
in philosophy of mind have been. It was Wilfrid Sellars who described
philosophy’s task as seeing together, stereoscopically, the scientific and
manifest images of man. We may say instead: seeing in unity the ontological and phenomenological aspects of the world.
A Shifting Paradigm
We awake and see and hear and smell the things of morning, and the
rest of waking life, and we experience variations on these things when
dreaming. We perceive, think, feel emotion, value, will, move intentionally, act in meaningful ways, and interact socially, with varying degrees
of consciousness. We live among other sentient beings, other subjects,
notably other humans in a highly evolved social context of family and
friends, houses and carpenters, banks and economists, governments and
politicians. And all this occurs in a world we increasingly understand as
founded on elementary particles like quarks and electrons in fields of
gravity, electromagnetism, and quantum superpositions in the cosmos.
We humans, blessed and afflicted with the brain of Homo sapiens sapiens,
Appendix 293
have developed ways of studying these phenomena: the physical, the experiential, the cultural. But our disciplines think in significantly different
ways, and we are as yet unable to unify our divergent views of matter, mind,
and culture.
In the 1930s, as contemporary physics came together, Husserl diagnosed a “crisis” in intellectual history.1 With the development of
mathematical physics since Galileo, he observed, we have increasingly
“mathematized” nature, reducing its essence to mathematical forms that
distance the world of nature so described from the world of everyday life,
the “life world” as Husserl called it. We no longer understand how to
put these two “worlds” (world concepts) together. In particular, we have
produced a “paradox of subjectivity”: our intentional activities in science
have crafted our mathematical models of physical reality, but our subjective activities of consciousness, which produce our scientific theory, find
no place in those models. Indeed, the concepts of “subject” and “object,”
Husserl found, no longer fit together, and this is the culmination of
Kantian theory. Had Husserl lived another half century, he would have
seen a more precise statement of this “crisis.” Today we have “mathematized” the mind, declaring with cognitive science that intentional
activities of thinking, perceiving, and the like are processes of computation, described mathematically by algorithms written in formal computer
languages. But today some philosophers have come to realize that consciousness and, indeed, intentionality do not fit into this model. We face
a profound scientific-philosophical crisis. We simply do not understand
how to put consciousness and the physical world together in a unified
view. More broadly, we do not know how to fit phenomenology together
with the ontology of physical science.
To resolve this paradox in our understanding of consciousness and
world, we need to synthesize ontology and phenomenology. But this synthesis of the ontological and the phenomenological requires a paradigm
shift in our thinking about both consciousness and the world in general: a
shift away from choosing among dualism, physicalism, idealism, culturalrelativism, and so forth and toward seeing consciousness at home in a
world of nature, culture, and consciousness. The current paradigm of
naturalistic philosophy, grounded in philosophy of science, holds that
the world is composed of physical particles in physical fields; mental and
cultural activities must then fit this mold. But consciousness and its interesting properties – intentionality, inner awareness, sensory qualia – simply
do not appear in our best naturalistic description of causal-computational
processes of “brain mechanics.”
294 Appendix
Only gradually have I come to realize that the integration of the phenomenological and the ontological requires a genuine paradigm shift,
somewhat like the shifts Thomas Kuhn described in the history of science.
It has become increasingly clear that the debates in philosophy of mind
about materialism, functionalism, property-dualism, mind-as-brain, and
mind-as-computation were missing both the rich structure of intentionality and the deep structure of ontological categories (or modes of being).
To see these phenomenological and ontological structures in one view is
the shift in perspective I have in mind. One part of the view takes in the
details of phenomenology while another part of the view takes in the wide
field of ontology. The best metaphor is not seeing with two disciplinary
eyes but rather seeing as a hawk does: seeing simultaneously both its prey
and the wider terrain, through different mechanisms in the eyes.
Kant proclaimed a “Copernican revolution”in eighteenth-century philosophy. Copernicus had said the Earth moves around the sun, rather
than the sun around the Earth. Kant then said the objective world of
“phenomena” – things as they appear, even things as described by
physics – rests on our subjective activities (as the necessary conditions
of the possibility of such a world). For Kant, the world spins around us
insofar as our representations of the world are necessarily conditioned
by the structures of our own cognitive faculties of sensation and conceptualization (today we stress language). Kant’s revolution was thus a
philosophical counterrevolution. The problem of subjectivity and objectivity has been with us ever since, either displacing or superimposing itself
atop the problem of mind and body that Descartes had defined in the
seventeenth century. I believe the proper perspective has emerged only
with a correct account of intentionality, beginning with Husserl’s groundbreaking work around 1900. But rather than say that consciousness spins
around physical particles, or alternatively that the physical spins around
mind or language, or that only the physical or the mental or even the
cultural exists – rather, we need a new way of seeing things, a unified story
that puts these things in their place while giving each their due.
Whereas Kant chose the term “revolution” (in the time of the American
and French revolutions), Kuhn in The Structure of Scientific Revolutions
(1962, a time of cultural revolution) coined the term “paradigm shift” in
reviewing the major shifts in science, as from Newtonian physics to relativistic and quantum physics. With such a shift, we do not simply revolt
against a prior view of things; rather we come to see things in a new way
that renders the old way ineffective. In philosophy, as opposed to science,
a major change of views is rarely a bona fide “revolution” because the
Appendix 295
problematic phenomena – say, consciousness, nature, culture, and their
interrelations – do not go away but come to be viewed differently. “Evolution” rather than “revolution” is the way of deep philosophical thinking and often scientific thinking, too (and even political thinking). Our
brain type did not displace the lizard brain type; it grew from it, evolving
radically new abilities but retaining many of the older, well adapted features. And so it is with philosophical theory or understanding. We move
from Anaximander to Plato and Aristotle and on through Avicenna and
Ockham to Suarez and Descartes to Kant to Husserl to Quine and on
to our own best views that grow from prior ideas. The shifting paradigm
of consciousness, bringing the phenomenological into the ontological
and vice versa, follows this pattern of evolution, moving from one species
of view to another about our awareness of the world in which we find
ourselves.
A recurring approach to the mind-body or subject-object problem is to
say that proper background assumptions prevent the problem from arising. It is said that Heidegger, Merleau-Ponty, Wittgenstein, and others –
perhaps Kant or Husserl before them – gave accounts of our activities in
the world, on which the old bugbears of dualism, realism, idealism, and
the like simply do not arise. But in fact, after we have given careful descriptions of our experiences, practices, and language games, after we have a
careful phenomenological analysis of our conscious intentional activities
(and related social-cultural activities), we must extend our story with the
compelling results of today’s physics, biology, neuroscience; these are
not just another “story” for our entertainment. And we find that phenomenological descriptions of our activities of consciousness do not fit
with advancing theory in physical science, with descriptions of activities
from quarks to neurons and DNA – much as Descartes had begun to see in
the seventeenth century. But the ontological maneuvers of dualism, materialism, idealism, antirealism, functionalism, computationalism, connectionism, externalism, evolutionism – so ably explored in recent decades
in philosophy of mind and cognitive science – do not solve, resolve, or
dissolve the problem of fit. The subjectivity and intentionality of consciousness remain just that, not something else like a pattern of particles
bobbing in the void.
We might tackle directly the details of physics, biology, and neuroscience, hoping to find consciousness amid the details. This tack is taken
by many, from physicists like Roger Penrose to biologists like Edward
O. Wilson to philosophers like David Albert, Paul Churchland, Patricia
Churchland, Daniel Dennett, Fred Dretske, Jerry Fodor, Ruth Millikan,
296 Appendix
and others, all seeking to “naturalize” consciousness in one way or
another. Alternatively, I urge, we might tackle directly the details of
phenomenology and ontology, which must be integrated as a basis
for bringing into the picture the results of recent physical-biologicalcomputational science. Here in philosophy lies the “formal” side of the
synthesis; there in empirical science lies the “material” side. And the
distinction between “formal” and “material” ontology is itself part of
ontology.
So we need a new way of looking at consciousness and its place in the
world. We need a systematic integration of the phenomenological and
the ontological (not to be confused with the mental and the physical).
The yearning for this new synthesis, we noted, is all around us. Evidently
the paradigm shift is in progress. However, the core of the synthesis lies in
principles of philosophy, in the integration of two often misunderstood
philosophical disciplines.
Of Ontology and Phenomenology
Ontology is the science or theory of being, of what is and how it is. I make
no distinction here between ontology and metaphysics. Some philosophers have defined “metaphysics” as speculation about being, speculation
beyond the range of our abilities to know, especially beyond all empirical
knowledge. I do not use that definition (respect for Kant notwithstanding). As Quine has stressed with Peirce (and Husserl), all our knowledge
is in some measure speculative, beyond the measure of absolute certainty,
and limited to the range of our sensory and intellectual and intuitive capacities, limited even by our technologies that aid in developing knowledge. We practice ontology by saying, to the best of our current abilities,
what is.
Phenomenology, I assume, is the science or theory of consciousness
as we experience it – literally, the theory of “phenomena” in the ancient Greek sense of “appearances.” Where ontology studies reality, phenomenology studies appearance, namely, the ways things are given in
perception, thought, imagination, volition, and other processes. But
“phenomena” are not simply sense data (as in the British empiricist tradition). Rather, “phenomena” are nearly always intentional presentations
of things: things as given in perception, imagination, thought, desire, will,
and indeed embodied intentional action. (Remember that perception is
itself partly action, as we move our eyes, hands, nose in perceiving things
around us.)
Appendix 297
Phenomenology, as I understand it, is centered in the theory of intentionality via content or meaning, a theory pursued in prior works.2 The
present essays extend this basic conception of intentionality and place it
in a framework of basic ontology.
By phenomenological analysis we learn that consciousness is characteristically intentional: in (nearly) each case it is of or about something,
directed toward some object. And we learn that each act of consciousness “intends” its putative object through some conceptual content or
meaning. So phenomenology studies the meanings things have for us
in our intentional activities of perception, thought, imagination, emotion, volition, and bodily action. Moreover, our conscious intentional activities tie into attitudes, moods, skills, habits, traditions, languages, and
ways of life that are part of our experience even if we are not directly
aware of them. Thus, phenomenology comes down to the study of intentionality via meaning, first in consciousness and then in less-thanconscious activities that carry meaning. Historically, phenomenology
as we know it was launched in 1900 with Husserl’s analysis of intentionality via meaning. Husserl drew on Brentano, Bolzano, Descartes,
Hume, and Kant. In Husserl’s wake, Heidegger defined phenomenology as the study of “phenomena”; however, avoiding the terminology
of “consciousness” and “subject,” Heidegger spoke of our “being” and
“comportment” (verhalten, relating to) in acting, speaking, and thinking.
I adopt a simplified terminology of consciousness, context, subject, act,
content, and object – as appraised in the present essays and in prior
works.3
Phenomenology is a philosophical discipline alongside ontology, epistemology, logic, ethics, and the like. Yet phenomenology is still not so
well understood as these other disciplines. Some philosophers have de-
fined phenomenology as a movement, a historical tradition including the
work of Husserl, Heidegger, Sartre, Merleau-Ponty – and more recently
Gurwitsch, Mohanty, Føllesdal, and many others. I do not follow that defi-
nition (admiration for Husserl, Heidegger, et al. notwithstanding). Other
philosophers have defined phenomenology as the practice of a particular
philosophical methodology: transcendental reflection on the meaning of
our experience, as prescribed by Husserl; or hermeneutic interpretation
of our existence, as prescribed by Heidegger. It is wrong to restrict phenomenology to method. This is a process-product confusion: we practice
phenomenology by a process of analysis following some methodology,
and our results are products thereof. No, phenomenology is a discipline,
the study of consciousness cum meaning, and in its practice we will try to
298 Appendix
settle upon the best methodology. We experience a variety of types of consciousness, we reflect upon them, we describe and interpret and analyze
them as best we can, we expand on the conditions in which we believe
them to arise, physical as well as cultural and environmental conditions.
In short, we do the best we can. Perhaps results of neuroscience or evolutionary biology or quantum physics will one day help us to refine our
phenomenological descriptions of experience as we live it. Or perhaps
only disciplined practices of meditation, like those of Tibetan Buddhists
or Zen masters, can refine our awareness of our own experiences. But in
any event, we must describe, interpret, and analyze our experience as we
find it.
Our best philosophical theory of mind-and-world will unfold within a
system of phenomenology and ontology. This is nearly a tautology, given
the preceding. More significantly, the two disciplines are interdependent. Ontology must accommodate the results of phenomenology, because what exists includes our acts of consciousness and their intentional
structure; moreover, the practice of ontology is a collective intentional
activity that we philosophers engage in. And phenomenology must accommodate the results of ontology, because an act of consciousness has
an identity, properties (including intentionality), relations, and dependencies – all ontological structures of the act of consciousness.
These ties between ontology and phenomenology are apparent in the
classical literature of phenomenology. Husserl famously analyzed structures of consciousness while bracketing questions of the existence of the
objects of consciousness. Yet, within those phenomenological analyses,
he assumed basic principles of what he would call formal ontology –
for example, particular things have properties or “essences,” or they are
dependent beings. And Heidegger famously described our intentional
activities or “comportments” such as hammering or indeed speaking as
modes of “being in the world.” These ontological structures of “being”
are apparent in our own activities.
From a Phenomenological Point of View
When Quine titled his book of essays From a Logical Point of View (1953),4
it was timely to reassert the importance of logic in philosophy. I say reassert because logic has been very much with us ever since Plato and
Aristotle. Looking back on twentieth-century philosophy, we take modern logic for granted – because of the work of Frege, Whitehead and
Russell, Godel, Carnap, Tarski, Quine, and others. Yet, we know, Russell ¨
Appendix 299
and Moore were surrounded by the British absolute idealists, and Harvard
was the heart of pragmatism. (Never mind that Peirce in Cambridge,
Massachusetts, was also a logician and McTaggart in Cambridge, England,
reasoned elegantly.) Quine’s title is vindicated by developments throughout the second half of the century, in the traditions of philosophical logic,
philosophy of language, possible-worlds semantics, the logic and metaphysics of modality, externalism of direct reference and of intentional
content, and indirectly the developments in philosophy of mind under
the umbrella of cognitive science.
It is now timely to reassert the importance of phenomenology in philosophy, to look afresh at mind and its place in the world “from a phenomenological point of view.”I say reassert, because phenomenology has
been with us incipiently in the ancient Greek and Indian thinkers, formatively in the medieval Arabic-Islamic and European-Latin philosophers,
and modernly in Descartes, Hume, Kant, Fichte, Bolzano, and Brentano.
Of course, phenomenology has been with us explicitly, and prominent in
European thought, since 1900 when Husserl crystallized the theory of intentionality and the discipline of phenomenology as science of consciousness – our own conscious intentional experience in perceiving, thinking,
and acting. It is timely now to reassert, and reassess, phenomenology in
philosophy of mind and in metaphysics. For consciousness has drawn
intense interest as science has begun to understand the workings of the
brain in recent decades.
Why must we reassert, if you will, consciousness itself? Why must we
reassert the discipline of phenomenology in the study of consciousness?
Think of philosophy’s trends. Existentialism stressed consciousness;
but poststructuralism forgot it while privileging structures of language.
Philosophical logic in Quine, taking behaviorism as key to the study
of meaning in language acquisition, seemed to bypass consciousness –
though Quine himself says consciousness is not to be denied but rather is
a mystery to be explained.5 Ordinary language philosophy of the 1950s
and 1960s followed later Wittgenstein’s seeming suggestion that mind is
in effect language and talk of“consciousness”is a muddle – although P. F.
Strawson distinguished mental and physical predicates and dug into Kant.
Modal logic led Hintikka into the logic of belief and perception, and intentionality in phenomenology. Føllesdal wrote evenly about Husserlian
intentionality, modal logic, and Quinean linguistic meaning (and indeterminacy). Then cognitive science took the computer as model of mind,
whence consciousness and even intentionality seemed to escape the theory of mind. Neuroscience spawned a different, connectionist computer
300 Appendix
model, but still consciousness remains today the chief stumbling block
for a scientific, physicalistic theory of mind.
Here is our entry. We need to study consciousness itself from the firstperson point of view, from the perspective of each of us who experience
it. And that is precisely the business of phenomenology.
My approach to phenomenology is a syncretic approach that integrates classical phenomenology (building especially on Husserl’s work)
with logical-semantic theory (in the tradition of Frege, Tarski, Carnap,
Hintikka, and Kaplan) – and, I would add, with recent cognitive neuroscience (in the spirit of Searle and others who take consciousness seriously), and indeed with the wider sweep of Western philosophy (from
Plato and Aristotle through Ockham and Aquinas to Descartes, Hume,
and Kant into Bolzano, Brentano, Husserl, and beyond). This integrative
approach is sometimes called “California phenomenology.”6 There is a
wink in this appellation, not least because the relevant philosophers are
not confined by the shores and mountains of the Golden State.
From an Ontological Point of View
A particular type of ontology is part of what I am urging in this book.
It appears in the guise of “formal ontology” and “basic ontology.” I do
not mean ontology written in a formal language such as the predicate
calculus or set theory or the computer language of the day. Rather, formal ontology concerns “formal” structures of reality, such as the formal
categories Individual, Property, State of Affairs, Number, Group, Part,
Dependence, and so on, which govern very different domains such as
the material categories Mind, Body, Culture. By “basic” ontology I mean
the study of particularly fundamental categories, including what I like to
call basic “modes of being,” such as being an individual, being a part,
being dependent, and being intentional.
As our perspective widens from issues of phenomenology to issues of
basic ontology, our conception of consciousness and its place in the world
widens. We come to see the importance of the synthesis of phenomenology and ontology. Only thereby, I believe, can we truly understand the
phenomenon of mind. And contemporary theory of mind needs to approach mind systematically in this way, or so I argue in different ways in
the present chapters.
In fact, we experience certain basic ontological structures. In perception,
for instance, I experience the distinctness and relation between “that
object before me” and myself, or“I.” The articulation of such structures in
Appendix 301
a developed ontology lies beyond the deliverance of our inner awareness
of our experience. Yet we still have a phenomenological hold on part of
the structure of the world.
It is timely now to reassert the importance of ontology in phenomenology and in contemporary philosophy of mind. I say reassert, because
ontology was explicitly used in the classical texts of phenomenology,
in Husserl and indeed Heidegger; and because in philosophy of mind
since the 1950s the mind-body problem has been attacked from positions that identify a mental state with a brain state or a functional state
of the body or a social condition of the person, or from other stances
that are specifically ontological. What is needed now is a more systematic
approach to both the phenomenological and ontological structures of
mind, especially consciousness. This metaphilosophical thesis is a corollary of the present collection of essays, which study a variety of these
aspects of phenomenology and ontology, aspects that are less than systematically appraised in the rich literature on philosophy of mind in the past
decades.
From a Historical Point of View
My aim in this book is a philosophical account of aspects of consciousness
and world. My technique is partly what may be called historical philosophy.
By this I mean that I draw philosophical analysis partly from historically
significant works, relying on interpretation of key texts along the way,
although my aim is neither exclusively nor primarily “historical.”
Many philosophers today seem to think that philosophy is done in the
absence of the voices of Plato, Aristotle, Descartes, Hume, Kant, Husserl,
Russell, Quine. “To the arguments themselves, to the concepts and theories themselves, to the phenomena themselves,” we cry. Indeed. But the
best philosophical ideas we have nearly always begin their lives clothed
in texts of the great thinkers of the past, and often we must go back and
work at understanding classical texts in order to move on with the theories and arguments themselves. Our philosophical theories are historical
products, and much of their real content lies in their evolution, in debates
along the way. Most important, in the ontology and phenomenology of
consciousness, the best groundwork is laid not in the current works of
Fodor, Dennett, and others (as exciting as these are), but in penetrating
investigations by Descartes, Kant, Brentano, Husserl, Sartre. To make real
progress, we must develop new conceptual tools sharpened by issues of
neuroscience, computer science, evolutionary theory, social theory, and
302 Appendix
other disciplines. No one I know has a full mastery of all these things, so
the work will be collective.
To understand a philosophical idea, such as the concept of intentionality or indeed of consciousness, we need to address it in texts that speak
to us (in our style and cultural context), in precise formulations (in exact
theories and arguments), and in historical genesis (in dialectic that develops or reveals motivations). These three facets of an idea are instances
of what I have called its appearance, form, and substrate (in the essay in
Chapter 1). For reasons of ontology, then, the content of a philosophical
idea lies partly in its history!
At various points along the way I have drawn on historical philosophical works, by Aristotle, Descartes, Husserl, Heidegger, Wittgenstein,
Whitehead, Quine, and others. I do not see the history of philosophy as
a dustbin of old and dead ideas. Rather, I see our current ideas as evolutionary heirs of the ideas and debates of years past, whether last year or
50 years ago or 300 years ago – or even 2,600 years ago (as I like to nod
to Anaximander at the dawn of philosophy as we know it).
To the Things Themselves
With these metaphilosophical and methodological remarks in the background, drawing on “background ideas” of our philosophical culture, the
present chapters go about their business, looking to consciousness and
its place in the world.
Notes
1. See Edmund Husserl, The Crisis of European Sciences and Transcendental Phenomenology, trans. David Carr (Evanston, Ill.: Northwestern University Press,
1970; from the posthumous German edition, 1954; original German texts
from 1935–38). See especially §§53–54 on “the paradox of subjectivity.”
2. This conception of intentionality was detailed in David Woodruff Smith and
Ronald McIntyre, Husserl and Intentionality (Dordrecht: D. Reidel, 1982), and
ramified in David Woodruff Smith, The Circle of Acquaintance (Dordrecht:
Kluwer Academic Publishers, 1989). A wider ontology for the basic theory
I reconstructed from Husserlian principles in “Mind and Body,” in Barry
Smith and David Woodruff Smith, eds., The Cambridge Companion to Husserl
(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1995), pp. 323–93.
3. See Smith and McIntyre, Husserl and Intentionality (1982, cited above), and
D. W. Smith, The Circle of Acquaintance (1989, cited above).
4. See W. V. Quine, From a Logical Point of View (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard
University Press, 1953, 1961, 1980). The origin of Quine’s title was in fact
Appendix 303
Harry Belafonte’s performance of the calypso melody “From a Logical Point
of View”; see the foreword to the 1980 edition.
5. See W. V. Quine, Quiddities: An Intermittently Philosophical Dictionary
(Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1987), pp. 132–33.
6. The tradition of California phenomenology includes works of Dagfinn
Føllesdal, Jaakko Hintikka, Hubert Dreyfus, Ronald McIntyre, Izchak Miller,
and the present author. Kindred work drawing on ontology includes that of
Dallas Willard, Barry Smith, Kevin Mulligan, and Peter Simons. The Cambridge
Companion to Husserl extends these literatures, including essays by J. N.
Mohanty, Kit Fine, Herman Philipse, and Richard Tieszen. Mohanty’s many
works on phenomenology are sympathetic to analytic philosophy of logic and
language, whereas philosopher-of-language Michael Dummett approaches
Husserl from Frege in the logical tradition. The writings of Aron Gurwitsch,
Lester Embree, Robert Sokolowski, John Drummond, and many others on
phenomenology do not tie directly to the analytic tradition, yet their results
in phenomenology are consonant on many points with results in California
phenomenology – as we should expect if we all turn to “the facts [Sachen]
themselves,” the facts of conscious experience.
